
It was in the early days of April; Bernard Longue- 
ville had been spending the winter in Borne. He 
had travelled northward with the consciousness of 
several social duties that appealed to him from the 
further side of the Alps, but he was under the charm 
of the Italian spring, and he made a pretext for 
liQgering. He had spent five days at Siena, where 
he had intended to spend but two, and still it was 
impossible to continue his journey. He was a young 
man of a contemplative and speculative turn, and 
this was his first visit to Italy, so that if he dallied 
by the way he should not be harshly judged. He 
had a fancy for sketching, and it was on his con- 
science to take a few pictorial notes. There were 
two old inns at Siena, both of them very shabby and 
very dirty.- The one at which Longueville had taken 
up his abode was entered by a dark, pestiferous arch- 
way, surmounted by a sign which at a distance might 
have been read by the travellers as the Dantean 
injunction to renounce all hope. The other was not 



6  

far off, and the day after his arrival, as he passed it, 
he saw two ladies going in who evidently belonged 
to the large fraternity of Anglo-Saxon tourists, and 
one of whom was young and carried herself very 
welL Longueville had his share — or more than his 
share — of gallantry, and this incident awakened a 
regret. If he had gone to the other inn he might 
have had charming company : at his own establish- 
ment there was no one but an aesthetic German who 
smoked bad tobacco in the dining-room. He i-e- 
marked to himself that this was always his luck, and 
the remark was characteristic of the man; it was 
charged with the feeling of the moment, but it was 
not absolutely just; it was the result of an acute 
impression made by the particular occasion; but it 
failed in appreciation of a providence which had 
sprinkled Longueville's career with happy accidents 
— accidents, especially, in which his characteristic 
gallantry was not allowed to rust for want of exer- 
cise. He lounged, however, contentedly enough 
through these bright, still days of a Tuscan April, 
draMring much entertainment from the high pic- 
turesqueness of the things about him. Siena, a few 
years since, was a flawless gift of the Middle Ages to 
the modern imagination. No other Italian city could 
have been more interesting to an observer fond of 
reconstructing obsolete manners. This was a taste of 
Bernard Longueville's, who had a relish for serious 



 7 

literature, and at one time had made several lively 
excursions into mediaeval history. His friends thought 
him very clever, and at the same time had an easy 
feeling about him which was a tribute to his freedom 
from pedantry. He was clever indeed, and an excel- 
lent companion; but the real measure of his bril- 
liancy was in the success with which he entertained 
himself. He was much addicted to conversing with 
his own wit, and he greatly enjoyed his own society. 
Clever as he often was in talking with his friends, I 
am not sure that his best things, as the phrase is^ 
were not for his own ears. And this was not on 
account of any cynical contempt for the understand- 
ing of his fellow-creatures: it was simply because 
what I have called his own society was more of a 
stimulus than that of most other people. And yet 
he was not for this reason fond of solitude ; he was, 
on the contrary, a very sociable animal. It must be 
admitted at the outset that he had a nature which 
seemed at several points to contradict itself, as will 
probably be perceived in the course of this narration. 
He entertained himself greatly with his reflections 
and meditations upon Sienese architecture and early 
Tuscan art, upon Italian street-life and the geological 
idiosjmcrasies of the Apennines. If he had only 
gone to the other inn, that nice-looking girl whom he 
had seen passing under the dusky portal with her 
face turned away from him might have broken bread 



8  

with him at this intellectual banquet There came a 
day, however, when it seemed for a moment that if 
she were disposed she might gather up the crumbs of 
the feast LongueviUe, every morning after break- 
fast, took a turn in the great square of Siena — the 
vast piazza, shaped like a horse-shoe, where the 
market is held beneath the windows of that crenel- 
lated palace from whose overhanging cornice a tall^ 
straight tower springs up with a movement as light 
as that of a single plume in the bonnet of a captain. 
Here he strolled about, watching a brown i^ntadino 
disembarrass his donkey, noting the progress of half 
an hour's chaffer over a bundlf of carroi wishing a 
young girl with eyes like animated agates would let 
him sketch her, and gazing up at intervals at the 
beautiful, slim tower, as it played at contrasts with 
the large blue air. After he had spent the greater 
part of a week in these grave considerations, he made 
up his mind to leave Siena. But he was not content 
with what he had done for his portfolio. Siena was 
eminently sketchable, but he had not been industrious. 
On the last morning of his visit, as he stood staring 
about him in the crowded piazza, and feeling that, in 
spite of its picturesqueness, this was an awkward 
place for setting up an easel, he bethought himself, 
by contrast, of a quiet comer in another part of the 
town, which he had chanced upon in one of his first 
walks — an angle of a lonely terrace that abutted 



 9 

upon the city-wall, where three or four superannuated 
objects seemed to slumber in the sunshine — the 
open door of an empty church, with a faded fresco 
exposed to the air in the arch above it, and an ancient 
beggar-woman sitting beside it on a three-legged 
stooL The little terrace had an old polished parapet, 
about as high as a man's breast, above which was a 
view of strange, sad-colored hills. Outside, to the 
left, the wall of the town made an outward bend, 
and exposed its rugged and rusty complexion. There 
was a smooth stone bench set into the wall of the 
church, on which Longueville had rested for an hour, 
observing the composition of the little picture of 
which I have indicated the elements, and of which 
the parapet of the terrace would form the foreground. 
The thing was what painters call a subject, and he . 
had promised himself to come back with his utensils. 
This morning he returned to the inn and took posses- 
sion of them, and then he made his way through a 
labyrinth of empty streets, lying on the edge of the 
town, within the wall, like the superfluous folds of a 
garment whose wearer has shrunken with old age. 
He reached his little grass-grown terrace, and found 
it as sunny and as private as before. The old men- 
dicant was mumbling petitions, sacred and profane, 
at the church door; but save for this the stillness 
was unbroken. The yellow sunshine warmed the 
brown surface of the city-wall, and lighted the hoi- 



10  

lows of the Etruscan hills. Longueville settled him- 
self on the empty bench, and, arranging his little 
portable apparatus, began to ply his brushes. He 
worked for some time smoothly and rapidly, with an 
agreeable sense of the absence of obstacles. It 
seemed almost an interruption when, in the silent air, 
he heard a distant bell in the town strike noon. 
Shortly after this, there was another interruption. 
The sound of a soft footstep caused him to look up ; 
whereupon he saw a young woman standing there 
and bending her eye3 upon the graceful artist A 
second glance assured him that she was that nice girl 
whom he had seen going into the other inn with her 
mother, and suggested that she had just emerged 
from the little church. He suspected, however — I 
hardly know why — that she had been looking at 
him for some moments before he perceived her. It 
would perhaps be impertinent to inquire what she 
thought of him ; but Longueville, in the space of an 
instant, made two or three reflections upon the young 
lady. One of them was to the effect that she was a 
handsome creature, but that she looked rather bold ; 
the burden of the other was that — yes, decidedly — 
she was a compatriot She turned away almost as 
soon as she met his eyes ; he had hardly time to raise 
his hat, as, after a moment's hesitation, he proceeded 
to do. She herself appeared to feel a certain hesitar- 
tion ; she glanced back at the church d6or, as if under 



 11 

tlie impulse to retrace her steps. She stood there a 
moment longer — long enough to let him see that 
she was a person of easy attitudes — and then she 
walked away slowly to the parapet of the terrace. 
Here she stationed herself, leaning her arms upon the 
high stone ledge, presenting her back to Longueville, 
and gazing at rural Italy. Longueville went on with 
his sketch, but less attentively than before. He 
wondered what this young lady was doing there 
alone, and then it occurred to him that her companion 
— her mother, presumably — was in the church. The 
two ladies had been in the church when he arrived ; 
women liked to sit in churches ; they had been there 
more than half an hour, and the mother had not 
enough of it even yet The young lady, however, at 
present preferred the view that Longueville was 
painting ; he became aware that she had placed her- 
self in the very centre of his foreground. His first 
feeling was that she would spoil it ; his second was 
that she would improve it. Little by little she turned 
more into profile, leaning only one arm upon the par- 
apet, while the other hand, holding her folded parasol, 
hung down at her side. She was motionless ; it was 
almost as if she were standing there on purpose to 
be drawn. Yes, certainly she improved the picture. 
Her profile, delicate and thin, defined itself against 
the sky, in the clear shadow of a coquettish hat; her- 
figure was light; she bent and leaned easily; she 



12  

wore a gray dress, fastened up as was then the 
fashion, and displaying the broad edge of a crimson 
petticoat. She kept her position; she seemed ab- 
sorbed in the view. "Is sHe posing — is she atti- 
tudinizing for my benefit?" Longueville asked of 
himself. And then it seemed to him that this was 
a needless assumption, for the prospect was quite 
beautiful enough to be looked at for itself, and there 
was nothing impossible in a pretty girl having a love 
of fine landscape. " But posing or not," he went on, 
" I will put her into my sketch. She has simply put 
herself in. It will give it a human interest. There 
is nothing like having a human interest." So, with 
the ready skill that he possessed, he introduced the 
young girVs figure into his foreground, and at the end 
of ten minutes he had almost made something that 
had the form of a likeness. " If she will only be 
quiet for another ten minutes," he said, "the thing 
will really be a picture." Unfortunately, the young 
lady was not quiet ; she had apparently had enough 
of her attitude and her view. She turned away, 
facing Longueville again, and slowly came back, as if 
to re-enter the church. To do so she had to pass 
near him, and as she approached he instinctively got 
up, holding his drawing in one hand. She looked at 
him again, with that expression that he had mentally 
characterized as "bold," a few minutes before — with 
dark, intelligent eyes. Her hair was dark and dense ; 
she was a strikingly handsome girL 



 13 

" I am so sorxy you moved/' he said, confidently, in 
English. " You were so — so beautiful." 

She stopped, looking at him more directly than 
ever; and she looked at his sketch, which he held 
out toward her. At the sketch, however, she only 
glanced, whereas there was observation in the eye 
that she bent upon Longuevilla He never knew 
whether she had blushed ; he afterward thought she 
might have been frightened. Nevertheless, it was 
not exactly terror that appeared to dictate her answer 
to LongueviUe's speech, 

" I am much obliged to you. Don't you think you 
have looked at me enough ? " 

'' By no means. I should like so much to finish 
my drawing." 

'' I am not a professional model," said the young 
lady. 

" No. That 's my difficulty," Longueville answered, 
laughing. " I can't propose to remunerate you." 

The yoimg lady seemed to think this joke in in- 
diflferent taste. She turned away in silence; but 
something in her expression, in his feeling at the 
time, in the situation, incited Longueville to higher 
play. He felt a lively need of carrying his point. 

" You see it will be pure kindness," he went on, — 
"a simple act of charity. Five minutes will be 
enough. Treat me as an Italian beggar." 

She had laid down his sketch and had stepped for- 



14  

ward. He stood there, obsequious, clasping his hands 
and smiling. 

His interruptress stopped and looked at him again, 
as if she thought him a very odd person ; but she 
seemed amused. Now, at any rate, she was not 
frightened. She seemed even disposed to provoke 
him a little. 

" I wish to go to my mother," she said. 

*' Where is your mother ? " the young man asked. 

" In the church, of course. I did n*t come here 
alone ! " 

"Of course not; but you may be sure that your 
mother is very contented. I have been in that little 
church. It is charming. She is just resting there ; 
she is probably tired. If you will kindly give me 
five minutes more, she will come out to you." 

" Five minutes ?" the young girl asked. 

" Five minutes will do. I shall be eternally grate- 
ful." Longueville was amused at himself as he said 
this. He cared infinitely less for his sketch than the 
words appeared to imply; but, somehow, he cared 
gi'eatly that this graceful stranger should do what he 
had proposed. 

The graceful stranger dropped an eye on the sketch 
again. 

" Is your picture so good as that ? " she asked 

" I have a great deal of talent," he answered, laughing. 
" You shall see for yourself, when it is finished." 



 15 

She turned slowly toward the terrace again. 

*' You certainly have a great deal of talent, to in- 
duce me to do what you asL" And she walked 
to where she had stood before. Longueville made a 
movement to go with her, as if to show her the atti- 
tude he meant; but, pointing with decision to his 
easel, she said — 

"You have only five minutes." He immediately 
went back to his work, and she made a vague at- 
tempt to take up her position. ''You must tell me 
if this will do," she added, in a moment. 

" It will do beautifully," Longueville answered, in 
a happy tone, looking at her and plying his brusL 
''It is immensely good of you to take so much 
trouble." 

For a moment she made no rejoinder, but presently 
she said — 

" Of course if I pose at all I wish to pose welL" 

" You pose admirably," said Longueville. 

After this she said nothing, and for seveiul minutes 
he painted rapidly and in silence. He felt a certain 
excitement, and the movement of his thoughts kept 
pace with that of his brush. It was very true that 
she posed admirably; she was a fine creature to 
paint. Her prettiness inspired him, and also her 
audacity, as he was content to regard it for the mo- 
ment. He wondered about her — who she was, and 
what she was — perceiving that the so-called au- 



16  

dacity was not vulgar boldness, but the play of an 
original and probably interesting character. It was 
obvious that she was a perfect lady, but it was 
equally obvious that she was irregularly clever. 
Longueville's little figure was a success — a charm- 
ing success, he thought, as he put on the last touches. 
While he was doing this, his model's companion 
came into view. She came out of the church, paus- 
ing a moment as she looked from her daughter to the 
young man in the corner of the terrace ; then she 
walked straight over to the young girl. She was a 
delicate little gentlewoman, with a light, quick step. 

Longueville*s five minutes were up ; so, leaving 
his place, he approached the two ladies, sketch in 
hand. The elder one, who had passed her hand into 
her daughter's arm, looked up at him with clear, 
surprised eyes ; she was a charming old woman. 
Her eyes were very pretty, and on either side of 
them, above a pair of fine dark brows, was a band of 
silvery hair, rather coquettishly arranged. 

" It is my portrait," said her daughter, as Longue- 
ville drew near. " This gentleman has been sketch- 
ing me.** 

" Sketching you, dearest ? " murmured her mother. 
" Was n't it rather sudden ? " 

"Very sudden — very abrupt!" exclaimed the 
young girl with a laugh. 

" Considering all that, it 's very good," said Longue- 



 17 

ville, offering his picture to the elder lady, who took 
it and began to examine it. '' I can't tell you how 
much I thank you/' he said to his modeL 

" It 's very well for you to thank me now," she re- 
plied. " You really had no right to begin." 

" The temptation was so great." 

''We should resist temptation. And you should 
have asked my leave." 

'' I was afraid you would refuse it ; and you stood 
there, just in my line of vision." 

" You should have asked me to get out of it" 

" I should have been very sorry. Besides, it would 

have been extremely rude." 

The young girl looked at him a moment 

''Yes, I think it would. But what you have done 
is ruder." 

"It is a hard case!" said Longueville. "What 
could I have done, then, decently?" 

"It's a beautiful drawing," murmured the elder 
lady, handing the thing back to Longueville. Her 
daughter, meanwhile, had not even glanced at it 

"You might have waited till I should go away," 
this argumentative young person continued. 

Longueville shook his head. 

" I never lose opportunities 1 " 

"You might have sketched me afterwards, from 
memory." 

Longueville looked at her, smiling. 



18  

"Judge how much better my memory will be 
now I " 

She also smiled a little, but instantly became 
serious. 

" For myself, it 's an episode I shall try to forget. 
I don't like the part I have played in it." 

"May you never play a less becoming one ! "cried 
Longueville. " I hope that your mother, at least, will 
accept a memento of the' occasion." And he turned 
again with his sketch to her companion, who had 
been listening to the girl's conversation with this en- 
terprising stranger, and looking from one to the other 
with an air of earnest confusion. " Won't you do me 
the honor of keeping my' sketch ? " he said. " I 
think it really looks like your daughter." 

" Oh, thank you, thank you ; I hardly dare," mur- 
mured the lady, with a deprecating gesture. 

" It will serve as a kind of amends for the liberty 
I have taken," Longueville added ; and he began to 
remove the drawing from its paper block. 

" It makes it worse for you to give it to us," said 
the young girL 

" Oh, my dear, I am sure it 's lovely ! " exclaimed 
her mother. " It 's wonderfully like you." 

" I think that also makes it worse 1 " 

Longueville was at last nettled. The young lady's 
perversity was perhaps not exactly malignant ; but it 
was certainly ungracious. She seemed to desire to 
present herself as a beautiful tormentress. 



 19 

"* How does it make it worse ? " he asked, with a 
frown. 

He believed she was clever, and she was certainly 
ready. Now, however, she reflected a moment before 
answering. 

*" That you should give us your sketch," she said at 
last. 

" It was to your mother I offered it," LongueviUe 
observed. 

But this observation, the fruit of his irritation, 
appeared to have no effect upon the young girL 

" Is n't it what painters call a study ? " she went on. 
"A study is of use to the painter himself Your 
justification would be that you should keep your 
sketch, and that it might be of use to you." 

" My daughter is a study, sir, you will say," said 
the elder lady in a little, light, conciliating voice, and 
graciously accepting the drawing again. 

" I will admit," said LongueviUe, " that I am very 
inconsistent Set it down to my esteem, madam," he 
added, looking at the mother. 

" That 's for you, mamma," said his model, disen- 
gaging her arm from her mother's hand and turning 
away. 

The mamma stood looking at the sketch with a 
smile which seemed to express a tender desire to 
reconcile all accidents. 

" It *s extremely beautiful," she murmured, ** and if 
you insist on my taking it — " 



20  

*' I shall regard it as a great honor." 

" Very well, then ; with many thanks, I will keep 
it." She looked at the young man a moment, while 
her daughter walked away. Longueville thought her 
a delightful little person ; she struck him as a sort of 
transfigured Quakeress — a mystic with a practical 
side. " I am sure you think she 's a strange girl," 
she said. 

" She is extremely pretty." 

" She is very clever," said the mother. 

" She is wonderfully graceful" 

*' Ah, but she *s good ! " cried the old lady. 

"I am sure she comes honestly by that," said 
Longueville, expressively, while his companion, re- 
turning his salutation with a certain scrupulous 
grace of her own, hurried after her daughter. 

Longueville remained there staring at the view, 
but not especially seeing it. He felt as if he had at 
once enjoyed and lost an opportunity. After a while 
he tried to make a sketch of the old beggar-woman 
who sat there in a sort of palsied immobility, like a 
rickety statue at a church-door. But his attempt to 
reproduce her features was not gratifying, and he sud- 
denly laid down his brush. She was not pretty enough 
— she had a bad profile. 



I 
i 



I 



n. 



Two montha later Bernard Longueville was at 
Venice, still under the impression that he was leav- 
ing Italy. He was not a man who made plans and 
held to them. He made them, indeed — few men made 
more — but he made them as a basis for variation. 
He had gone to Venice to spend a fortnight, and his 
fortnight had taken the form of eight enchanting 
weeks. He had still a sort of conviction that he was 
carrying out his plans ; for it must be confessed that 
where his pleasure was concerned he had considerable 
skill in accommodating his theory to his practice. 
His enjoyment of Venice was extreme, but he was 
roused from it by a summons he was indisposed to 
resist. This consisted of a letter from an intimate 
friend who was living in Germany — a friend whose 
name was Gordon Wright. He had been spending 
the winter in Dresden, but his letter bore the date of 
Baden-Baden. As it was not long, I may give it 
entire. 

" I wish very much that you would come to this 
place. I think you have been here before, so that 
you know how pretty it is, and how amusing. I shall 



»< 

s 



I 



22  

probably be here the rest of the summer. There are 
some people I know and whom I want you to know. ) 

Be so good as to arrive. Then I will thank you i 

properly for your various Italian rhapsodies. I can't J 

reply on the same scale — I have n't the time. Do • 

you know what I am doing ? I am making love. I \ 

find it a most absorbing occupatioa That is literally 
why I have not written to you before. I have been 
making love ever since the last of May. It takes an 
immense amount of time, and ever3rthing else has got 
terribly behindhand. I don't mean to say that this 
experiment itself has gone on very fast; but I am * 

trying to push it forward. I have n't yet had time to S 

test its success ; but in this I want your help. You % 

know we great physicists never make an experiment * 

without an 'assistant' — a humble individual who 
burns his fingers and stains his clothes in the cause of 
science, but whose interest in the problem is only in- 
direct. I want you to be my assistant, and I will \ 
guarantee that your burns and stains shall not be \ 
dangerous. She is an extremely interesting girl, and 
I really want you to see her — I want to know what i 
you think of her. She wants to know you, too, for I ^ 
have talked a good deal about you. There you have * 
it, if gratified vanity will help you on the way. 
Seriously, this is a real request. I want your 
opinion, your impression. I want to see how she 
will affect you. I don't say I ask for your advice ; 



I 






 23 

that, of course, you will not undertake to give. But 
I desire a definition, a characterization ; you know 
you toss oflf those things. I don't see why I should n't 
tell you all this — I have always told you everything. 
I have never pretended to know anything about 
women, but I have always supposed that you knew 
everything. You certainly have always had the tone 
of that sort of omniscience. So come here as soon as 
possible and let me see that you are not a humbug. 
She's a very handsome girL" 

Longueville was so much amused with this appeal 
that he very soon started for Germany. In the reader, 
Gordon Wright's letter will, perhaps, excite surprise 
rather than hilarity ; but Lbngueville thought it highly 
characteristic of his friend. What it especially pointed 
to was Gordon's want of imagination — a deficiency 
which was a matter of common jocular allusion be- 
tween the two young men, each of whom kept a 
collection of acknowledged oddities as a playground 
for the other's wit Bernard had often spoken of his 
comrade's want of imagination as a bottomless pit, 
into which Gordon was perpetually inviting him to 
lower himself " My dear fellow," Bernard said, " you 
must really excuse me ; I cannot take these subter- 
ranean excursions. I should lose my breath down 
there ; I should never come up alive. You know I 
have dropped things down — little jokes and meta- 
phors, little fantasies and paradoxes — and I have 



24  

never heard them touch bottom!" This was an 
epigram on the part of a young man who had a 
lively play of fancy ; but it was none the less true 
that Gordon Wright had a firmly-treading, rather 
than a winged, intellect. Every phrase in his letter 
seemed, to Bernard, to march in stout-soled walking- 
boots, and nothing could better express his attach- 
ment to the process of reasoning things out than this 
proposal that his friend should come and make a 
chemical analysis — a geometrical survey — of the 
lady of his love. " That I shall have any difficulty 
in forming an opinion, and any difficulty in expressing 
it when formed — of this he has as little idea as that 
he shall have any difficulty in accepting it when ex- 
pressed." So Bernard reflected, as he rolled in the 
train to MunicL "Gordon's mind," he went on, 
"has no atmosphere; his intellectual process goes 
on in the void. There are no currents and eddies to 
affect it, no high winds nor hot suds, no changes of 
season and temperature. His premises are neatly 
arranged, and his conclusions are perfectly calcu- 
lable." 

Yet for the man on whose character he so freely 
exercised his wit Bernard Longueville had a strong 
affection. It is nothing against the validity of a 
friendship that the parties to it have not a mutual 
resemblance. There must be a basis of agreement^ 
but the structure reared upon it may contain a 



6 

ifc 

1 
III 

s 



mt 



\. 



t 

I 



•. \ 






 25 

thousand disparities. These two young men had 
formed an alliance of old, in college days, and the 
bond between them had been strengthened by the 
simple fact of its having sarvived the sentimental 
revolutions of early life. Its strongest link was a sort 
of mutuai respect. Their tastes, their pursuits were 
different ; but each of them had a high esteem for the 
other's character. It may be said that they were 
easily pleased ; for it is certain that neither of them 
had performed any very conspicuous action They 
were highly civilized young Americans, bom to an 
easy fortune and a tranquil destiny, and unfamiliar 
with the glitter of golden opportunities. If I did not 
shrink from disparaging the constitution of their native 
land for their own credit, I should say that it had 
never been very definitely proposed to these young 
gentlemen to distinguish themselves. On reaching 
manhood, they had each come into property sufficient 
to make violent exertion superfluous. Gordon Wright, 
indeed, had inherited a large estate. Their wants 
being tolerably modest, they had not been tempted 
to strive for the glory of building up commercial 
fortunes-^ the most obvious career open to young 
Americans. They had, indeed, embraced no career 
at all, and if summoned to give an account of them- 
selves would, perhaps, have found it hard to tell any 
very impressive story. Gordon Wright was much 
interested in physical science, and had ideas of his 



26  

own on what is called the endowment of research. 
His ideas had taken a practical shape^ and he had 
distributed money very freely among the investigating 
classes, after which he had gone to spend a couple of 
years in Germany, supposing it to be the land of lab- 
oratories. Here we find him at present, cultivating 
relations with several learned bodies and promoting 
the study of various tough branches of human knowl- 
edge, by paying the expenses of difficult experiments. 
The experiments, it must be added, were often of his 
own making, and he must have the honor of what- 
ever brilliancy attaches, in the estimation of the world, 
to such pursuits. It was not, indeed, a brilliancy that 
dazzled Bernard Longueville, who, however, was not 
easily dazzled by anything. It was because he 
regarded him in so plain and direct a fashion, that 
Bernard had an affection for his friend — an affection 
to which it would perhaps be difficult to assign a 
definite cause. Personal sympathies are doubtless 
caused by something; but the causes are remote, 
mysterious to our daily vision, like those of the par- 
ticular state of the weather. We content ourselves 
with remarking that it is fine or that it rains, and the 
enjoyment of our likes and dislikes is by no means 
apt to borrow its edge from the keenness of our 
analysis. Longueville had a relish for fine quality 
—- superior savour ; and he was sensible of this merit 
in the simple, candid, manly, affectionate nature of 



 27 

his comrade, which seemed to him an excellent thing 
of its kind. Gordon Wright had a tender heart and 
a strong will — a combination which^ when the under- 
standing is not too limited, is often the motive of 
admirable actions. There might sometimes be a 
question whether Gordon's understanding were suffi- 
ciently unlimited, but the impulses of a generous 
temper often play a useful part in filling up the gaps 
of an incomplete imagination, and the general impres- 
sion that Wright produced was certainly that of intelli- 
gent good-nature. The reasons for appreciating Bernard 
Longueville were much more manifest. He pleased 
superficially, as well as fundamentally. Nature had 
sent him into the world with an armful of good gifts. 
He was very good-looking — tall, dark, agile, perfectly 
finished, so good-looking that he might have been a 
fool and yet be forgiven. As has already been inti- 
mated, however, he was far from being a fooL He 
had a number of talents, which, during three or four 
years that followed his leaving college, had received 
the discipline of the study of the law. He had not 
made much of the law ; but he had made something 
of his talents. He was almost always spoken of as 
" accomplished ; " people asked why he did n*t do some- 
thing. . This question was never satisfactorily answered, 
the feeling being that Longueville did more than many 
people in causing it to be asked. Moreover, there 
was one thing he did constantly — he enjoyed him- 



28  

self. This is manifestly not a career, and it has been 
said at the outset that he was not attached to any of 
the recognized professions. But without going into 
details, he was a charming fellow — clever, urbane, 
free-handed, and with that fortunate quality in his 
appearance which is known as distinction. 



m 

He had not specified, in writing to Gordon Wright, 
the day on which he should arrive at Baden-Baden ; 
it must be confessed that he was not addicted to 
specifying days. He came to his journey's end in 
the evening, and, on presenting himself at the hotel 
from which his friend had dated his letter, he learned 
that Gordon Wright had betaken himself after dinner, 
according to the custom of Baden-Baden, to the 
grounds of the Conversation-house. It was eight 
o'clock, and Longueville, after removing the stains 
of travel, sat down to dine. His first impulse had 
been to send for Gordon to come and keep him com- 
pany at his repast ; but on second thought he deter- 
mined to make it as brief as possible. Having 
Ijrought it to a close, he took his way to the Kursaal. 
The great German watering-place is one of the pret- 
tiest nooks in Europe, and of a summer evening in the 
gaming days, five-and-twenty years ago, it was one of 
the most brilliant scenes. The lighted windows of the 
great temple of hazaid (of as chaste an architecture 
as if it had been devoted to a much purer divinity) 
opened wide upon the gardens and groves ; the little 



30  

river that issues from the bosky mountains of the 
Black Forest flowed, with an air of brook-like inno- 
cence, past the expensive hotels and lodging-houses ; 
the orchestra, in a high pavilion on the terrace of the 
Kursaal, played a discreet accompaniment to the con- 
versation of the ladies and gentlemen who, scattered 
over the large expanse on a thousand little chairs, 
preferred for the time the beauties of nature to the 
shufiSe of coin and the calculation of chance ; while 
the faint summer stars, twinkling above the vague 
black hills and woods, looked down at the indifferent 
groups without venturing to drop their light upon 
them. 

Longueville, noting all this, went straight into the 
gaming-rooms ; he was curious to see whether his 
friend, being fond of experiments, ^as trying combi- 
nations at roulette. But he was not to be found in any 
of the gilded chambers, among the crowd that pressed 
in silence about the tables ; so that Bernard presently 
came and began to wander about the lamplit terrace, 
where innumerable groups, seated and strolling, made 
the place a gigantic conversazioTie, It seemed to him 
very agreeable and amusing, and he remarked to him- 
self that, for a man who was supposed not to take 
especially the Epicurean view of life, Gordon Wright, 
in coming to Baden, had certainly made himself com- 
fortable. Longueville went his way, glancing from 
one cluster of talkers to another ; and at last he saw 



 31 

a face which brought him to a stop. He stood a 
moment looking at it ; he knew he had seen it befora 
He had an excellent memory for faces ; but it was 
some time before he was able to attach an identity to 
this one. Where had he seen a little elderly lady 
with an expression of timorous vigilance, and a band 
of hair as softly white as a dove's wing ? The answer 
to the question presently came — ^Where but in a grass- 
grown comer of an old Italian town ? The lady was 
the mother of his inconsequent model, so that this 
mysterious personage was probably herself not far off. 
Before Longueville had time \p verify this induction, 
he found his eyes resting upon the broad back of a 
gentleman seated close to the old lady, and who, turn- 
ing away from her, was talking to a young girL It 
was nothing but the back of this gentleman that he 
saw, but nevertheless, with the instinct of true friend- 
ship, he recognized in this featureless expanse the 
robust personality of Gordon "Wright In a moment 
he had stepped forward and laid his hand upon 
Wright's shoulder. 

His friend looked round, and then sprang up with 
a joyous exclamation and grasp of the hand. 

"My dear fellow — my dear Bernard! What on 
earth — when did you arrive ? " 

While Bernard answered and explained a little, he 
glanced from his friend's good, gratified face at the 
young girl with whom Wright had been talking, and 



32  

then at the lady on the other side, who was giving 
him a bright little stare. He raised' his hat to her 
and to the young girl, and he became conscious, as 
regards the latter, of a certain disappointment. She 
was very pretty; she was looking at him; but she 
was not the heroine of the little incident of the terrace 
at Siena. 

" It 's just like Longueville, you know," Gordon 
Wright went on; "he always comes at you from 
behind ; he *8 so awfully fond of surprises." He was 
laughing; he was greatly pleased; he introduced 
Bernard to the two ladies. "You must know Mrs. 
Vivian ; you must know Miss Blanche Evers." 

Bernard took his place in the little circle ; he won- 
dered whether he ought to venture upon a special 
recognition of Mrs. Vivian. Then it seemed to him 
that he should leave the option of this step with the 
lady, especially as he had detected recognition in her 
eye. But Mrs. Vivian ventured upon nothing special ; 
she contented herself with soft generalities — with 
remarking that she always liked to know when people 
would arrive ; that, for herself, she never enjoyed sur- 
prises. 

" And yet I imagine you have had your share," said 
Longueville, with a smile. He thought this might, 
remind her of the moment when she came out of the 
little church at Siena and found her daughter postur- 
ing to an unknown painter. 



 33 

But Mrs. Vivian, turning her benignant head about, 
gave but a superficial reply. 

"Oh, I have had my share of everything, good and 
bad. I don't complain of anything." And she gave 
a little deprecating laugh. 

Gordon Wright shook hands with Bernard again ; 
he seemed really very glad to see him. Longueville, 
remembering that Gordon had written to him that he 
had been " making love," began to seek in his coun- 
tenance for the ravages of passion. For the moment, 
however, they were not apparent ; the excellent, hon- 
est fellow looked placid and contented. Gordon 
Wright had a clear gray eye, short, straight, flaxen 
hair, and a healthy diffusion of color. His features 
were thick and rather irregular ; but his countenance 
— in addition to the merit of its expression — derived 
a certain grace from a powerful yellow moustache, to 
which its wearer occasionally gave a martial twist 
Gordon Wright was not tall, but he was strong, and 
in his whole person there was something well-planted 
and sturdy. He almost always dressed in light-col- 
ored garments, and he wore round his neck an eternal 
blue cravat When he was agitated he grew very 
red. While he questioned Longueville about his jour- 
ney and his health, his whereabouts and his inten- 
tions, the latter, among his own replies, endeavored to 
read in Wright's eyes some account of his present 
situation. Was that pretty girl at his side the ambig- 

3 



34  

uous object of his adoration, and, in that case, what 
was the function of th6 elder lady, and what had 
become of her argumentative daughter? Perhaps 
this was another, a younger daughter, though, indeed, 
she bore no resemblance to either of Longueville's 
friends. Gordon Wright, in spite of Bernard's inter- 
rogative glances, indulged in no optical confidences. 
He had too much to tell. He would keep his story 
till they should be alone together. It was impossible 
that they should adjourn just yet to social solitude ; 
the two ladies were under Gordon's protection. Mrs. 
Vivian — Bernard felt a satisfaction in learning her 
name ; it was as if a curtain, half pulled up and 
stopped by a hitch, had suddenly been raised alto- 
gether — Mrs. Vivian sat looking up and down the 
terrace at the crowd of loungers and talkers with 
an air of tender expectation. She was probably look- 
ing for her elder daughter, and Longueville could not 
help wishing also that this young lady would arrive. 
Meanwhile, he saw that the young girl to whom Gor- 
don had been devoting himself was extremely pretty, 
and appeared eminently approachable. Longueville 
had some talk with h^r, reflecting that if she were 
the person concerning whom Gordon had written him. 
it behooved him to appear to take an interest in her. 
This view of the case was confirmed by Gordon 
Wright's presently turning away to talk with Mrs. 
Vivian, so that his friend might be at liberty to make 
acquaintance with their companioa 



 35 

Though she had not been with the others at Siena, 
it seemed to Longueville, with regard to her, too, that 
this was not the first time he had seen her. She was 
simply the American pretty girl, whom he had seen 
a thousand times. It was a numerous sisterhood, 
pervaded by a strong family likeness. This young 
lady had charming eyes (of the color of Gordon's 
cravats), which looked everywhere at once and yet 
found time to linger in some places, where Longue- 
ville's own eyes frequently met them. She had soft 
brown hair, with a silky-golden thread in it, beauti- 
fully arranged and crowned by a smart little hat that 
savoured of Paris. She had also a slender little 
figure, neatly rounded, and delicate, narrow hands, 
prettily gloved. She moved about a great deal in 
her place, twisted her little flexible body and tossed 
her head, fingered her hair and examined the orna- 
ments of her dress. She had a great deal of conver- 
sation, Longueville speedily learned, and she expressed 
herself with extreme frankness and decision. He 
asked her, to begin with, if she had been long at 
Baden, but the impetus of this question was all she 
required. Turning her charming, conscious, coquet- 
tish little face upon him, she instantly began to 
chatter. 

"I have been here abbut four weeks. I don't 
know whether you call that long. It does n't seem 
long to me; I have had such a lovely tima I have 



36  

met ever so many people here I know — every day 
some one turns up. Now you have turned up to- 
day." 

" Ah, but you don't know me," said Longueville, 
laughing. 

" Well, I have heard a great deal about you !" cried 
the young girl, with a pretty little stare of contradic- 
tion. "I think you know a great friend of mine, 
Miss Ella Maclane, of Baltimore. She's travelling 
in Europe now." Longueville's memory did not in- 
stantly respond to this signal, but he expressed that 
rapturous assent which the occasion demanded, and 
even risked the observation that the young lady from 
Baltimore was very pretty. " She 's far too lovely," 
his companion went on. " I have often heard her 
speak of you. I think you know her sister rather 
better than you know her. She has not been out very 
long. She is just as interesting as she can be. Her 
hair comes down to her feet. She's travelling in 
Norway. She has been everywhere you can think 
of, and she 's going to finish oflf with Finland. You 
can't go any further than that, can you ? That 's one 
comfort ; she will have to turn round and come back. 
I want her dreadfully to come to Baden-Baden." 

*'I wish she would," said Longueville. "Is she 
travelling alone ? " 

"Oh, no. They've got some Englishman. They 
say he *s devoted to Ella. Every one seems to have 



 37 

an Englishman, now. We "ve got one here, Captain 
Lovelock, the Honourable Augustus Lovelock. Well, 
they're awfully handsome. Ella Maclane is dying 
to come to Baden-Baden, I wish you 'd write to her. 
Her father and mother have got some idea in their 
heads; they think it*s improper — what do you call 
it ? — immoral. I wish you would write to her and tell 
her it is n't I wonder if they think that Mrs. Vivian 
would come to a place that 's immoral. Mrs. Vivian 
says she would take her in a moment ; she does n't 
seem to care how many she has. I declare, she's 
only too kind. You know I 'm in Mrs. Vivian's cara 
My mother 's gone to Marienbad. She would let me 
go with Mrs. Vivian anywhere, on account of the 
influence — she thinks so much of Mrs. Vivian's in- 
fluenca I have always heard a great deal about it, 
haven't you? I must say it's lovely; it's had a 
wonderful effect upon me. I don't want to praise 
myself, but it has. You ask Mrs. Vivian if I have n't 
been good. I have been just as good as I can be. I 
have been so peaceful, I have just sat here this way. 
Do you call this immoral ? You 're not obliged to 
gamble if you don't want to. Ella Maclane's father 
seems to think you get drawn in. I 'm sure I 
have n't been drawn in. I know what you 're going 
to say — you 're going to say I have been drawn out 
Well, I have, to-night We just sit here so quietly — 
there 's nothing to do but to talk. We make a little 



38  

party by ourselves — are you going to belong to our 
party? Two of us are missing — Miss Vivian and 
Captain Lovelock. Captain Lovelock has gone with 
her into the rooms to explain the gambling — Miss 
Vivian always wants everything explained. I am 
sure I understood it the first time I looked at the 
tables. Have you ever seen Miss Vivian? She's 
very much admired, she's so very unusuaL Black 
hair 's so uncommon — I see you have got it too — 
but I mean for young ladies. I am sure one sees 
everything here. There's a woman that comes to 
the tables — a Portuguese countess — who has hair 
that is positively blue. I can't say I admire it when 
it comes to that shade. Blue 's my favorite color, but 
I prefer it in the eyes," continued Longueville's com- 
panion, resting upon him her own two brilliant little 
specimens of the tint 

He listened with that expression of clear amusement 
which is not always an indication of high esteem, but 
which even pretty chatterers, who are not the reverse 
of estimable, often prefer to masculine inattention ; 
and while he listened Bernard, according to his wont, 
made his reflections. He said to himself that there 
were two kinds of pretty girls — the acutely conscious 
and the finely unconscious. Mrs. Vivian's |?ro^^^ was 
a member of the former category ; she belonged to the 
genus coquette. We all have our conception of the in- 
dispensable, and the indispensable, to this young lady, 



 39 

was a spectator ; almost any male biped would serve 
the purpose. To her spectator she addressed, for the 
moment, the whole volume of her being — addressed 
it in her glances, her attitudes, her exclamations, in 
a hundred little experiments of tone and gesture and 
position. And these rustling artifices were so inno- 
cent and obvious that the directness of her desire to 
be well with her observer became in itself a grace ; 
it led Bernard afterward to say to himself that the 
natural vocation and metier of little girls for whom 
existence was but a shimmering surface, was to prat- 
tle and rufile their plumage ; their view of life and 
its duties was as simple cmd superficial as that of an 
Oriental bayadere. It surely could not be with re- 
gard to this transparent little flirt that Gordon Wright 
desii-ed advice; you could literally see the daylight — 
or rather the Baden gaslight — on the other side of 
her. She sat there for a minute, turning her little 
empty head to and fro, and catching Bernard's eye 
every time she moved ; she had for the instant the 
air of having exhausted all topics. Just then a young 
lady, with a gentleman at her side, drew near to the 
little group, and Longueville, perceiving her, instantly 
got up from his chair. 

" There 's a beauty of the unconscious class ! " he 
said to himself. He knew her face very well; he 
had spent half an hour in copying it 

" Here comes Miss Vivian ! " said (Jordon Wright, 



40  

also getting up, as if to make room for the daughter 
near the mother. 

She stopped in front of them, smiling slightly, and 
then she rested her eyes upon Longueville. Their 
gaze at first was full and direct, but it expressed 
nothing more than civil curiosity. This was imme- 
diately followed, however, by the light of recognition 
— recognition embarrassed, and signalling itself by a 
blush. 

Miss Vivian's companion was a powerful, hand- 
some fellow, with a remarkable auburn beard, who 
struck the observer immediately as being imcom- 
monly well dressed. He carried his hands in the 
pockets of a little jacket, the button-hole of which 
was adorned with a blooming rosa He approached 
Blanche Evers, smiling and dandling his body a little, 
and making her two or three jocular bows. 

" "Well, I hope you have lost every penny you put 
on the table ! " said the young girl, by way of response 
to his obeisances. 

He began to laugh and repeat them. 

" I don't care what I lose, so long — so long — " 
So long as what, pray ?" 

So long as you let me sit down by you I " And 
he dropped, very gallantly, into a chair on the other 
side of her. 

"I wish you would lose all your property!" she 
replied, glancing at Bernard. 






 41 

'*It would be a very small stake/* said Captain 
Lovelock. " Would you really like to see me reduced 
to misery ? " 

While this graceful dialogue rapidly established it- 
self, Miss Vivian removed her eyes from Longueville's 
face and turned toward her mother. But Gordon 
Wright checked this movisment by laying his hand 
on Longueville's shoulder and proceeding to introduce 
his friend. 

"This is the accomplished creature, Mr. Bernard 
Longueville, of whom you havQ heard me speak. 
One of his accomplishments, as you see, is to drop 
down from the moon." 

" No, I don't drop from the moon," said Bernard, 
laughing. "I drop from — Siena!" He offered his 
hand to Miss Vivian, who for an appreciable instant 
hesitated to extend her own. Then she returned his 
salutation, without any response to his allusion to 
Siena. 

She declined to take a seat, and said she was tired 
and preferred to go home. With this suggestion her 
mother immediately complied, and the two ladies ap- 
pealed to the indulgence of little Miss Evers, who was 
obliged to renounce the society of Captain Lovelock, 
She enjoyed this luxury, however, on the way to 
Mrs. Vivian's loggings, toward which they all slowly 
strolled, in the sociable Baden fashion. Longueville 
might naturally have found himself next Miss Vivian, 



42  

but he received an impression that she avoided him. 
She walked in front, and Gordon Wright strolled be- 
side her, though Longueville noticed that they appeared 
to exchange but few words. He himself offered his 
arm to Mrs. Vivian, who paced along with a little 
lightly-wavering step, making observations upon the 
beauties of Baden and the respective merits of the 
hotels. 



IV. 

" Which of them is it ? " asked Longueville of his 
friend, after they had bidden good-night to the three 
ladies and to Captain Lovelock, who went off to begin, 
as he said, the evening. They stood, when they had 
turned away from the door of Mrs. Vivian's lodgings, 
in the little, rough-paved German street. 

" Which of them is what ? " Gordon asked, staring 
at hLs companion. 

" Oh, come," said Longueville, " you are not going 
to begin to play at modesty at this hour ! Did n't you 
write to me that you had been making violent love? " 

"Violent? No." 

" The more shame to you ! Has your love-making 
been feeble ? " 

His friend looked at him a moment rather soberly. 

"I suppose you thought it a queer document — 
that letter I wrote you." 

"I thought it characteristic," said Longueville 
smiling. 

" Is n't that the same thing ? " 

"Not in the least. I have never thought you a 
man of oddities." Gordon stood there looking at him 



44  

with a serious eye, half appealing, half questioning ; 
but at these last words he glanced away. Even a 
very modest man may wince a little at hearing him- 
self denied the distinction of a few variations from 
the common type. Longueville made this reflection, 
and it struck him, also, that his companion was in 
a graver mood than he had expected ; though why, 
after all, should he have been in a state of exhilara- 
tion ? " Your letter was a very natural, interesting 
one," Bernard added. 

" Well, you see," said Gordon, facing his companion 
again, " I have been a good deal preoccupied." 

" Obviously, my dear fellow ! " 

" I want very much to marry." 

" It 's a capital idea," said Longueville. 

" I think almost as well of it," his friend declared, 
'' as if I had invented it It has struck me for the 
first time." 

These words were uttered with a mild simplicity 
which provoked Longueville to violent laughter. 

"My dear fellow," he exclaimed, "you have, after 
all, your little oddities." 

Singularly enough, however, Gordon Wright failed 
to appear flattered by this concession. 

" I did n't send for you to laugh at me," he said. 

"Ah, but I have n't travelled three hundred miles 
to cry ! Seriously, solemnly, then, it is one of these 
young ladies that has put marriage into your head ? " 



 46 

" Not at alL I had it in my head." 

" Having a desire to many, you proceeded to fall 
in love." 

" I am not in love ! " said Gordon Wright, with 
some energy. 

" Ah, then, my dear fellow, why did you send for 
me?" 

Wright looked at him an instant in silenca 

" Because I thought you were a good fellow, as weU 
as a clever one." 

" A good fellow ! " repeated Longueville. " I don't 
understand your confounded scientific nomenclature. 
But excuse me ; I won't laugh. I am not a clever 
fellow; but I am a good one." He paused a mo- 
ment, and then laid his hand on his companion's 
shoulder. " My dear Gordon, it 's no use ; you are 
in love." 

"Well, I don't want to be," said Wright 

"Heavens, what a horrible sentiment!" 

" I want to marry with my eyes open. I want to 
Tmow my wife. You don't know people when you are 
in love with them. Your impressions are colored." 

" They are supposed to be, slightly. And you ob- 
ject to color ? " 

"WeD, as I say, I want to know the woman I 
marry, as I should know any one else. I want to see 
her as clearly." 

" Depend upon it, you have too great an appetite 



46  

for knowledge ; you set too high an esteem upon the 
dry light of science." 

" Ah ! " said Gordon promptly ; " of course I want to 
be fond of her." 

Bernard, in spite of his protest, began to laugh 
again. 

" My dear Gordon, you are better than your theo- 
ries. Your passionate heart contradicts your frigid 
intellect. I repeat it — you are in love." 

" Please don't repeat it again," said Wright. 

Bernard took his arm, and they walked along. 

" What shall I call it, then ? You are engaged in 
making studies for matrimony." 

" I don't in the least object to your calling it that. 
My studies are of extreme interest." 

" And one of those young ladies is the fair volume 
that contains the precious lesson," said Longueville. 
" Or perhaps your text-book is in two volumes ? " 

" No ; there is one of them I am not studying at 
all. I never could do two things at once." 

" That proves you are in love. One can't be in 
love with two women at once, but one may perfectly 
have two of them — or as many as you please — up 
for a competitive examination. However, as I asked 
you before, which of these yoimg ladies is it that you 
have selected ? " 

Gordon Wright stopped abruptly, eying his friend. 

" Which shoidd you say ? " 



 47 

"Ah, that's not a faur question," Bernaid tugged. 
''It would be invidious for me to name one rather 
than the other, and if I wete to mention the wrong 
one, I should feel as if I had been guilty of a rude- 
ness towards the other. Don't you see ? " 

Grordon saw, perhaps, but he held to his idea of 
making his companion commit himself. 

" Never mind the rudeness. I will do the same by 
you some day, to make it up. Which of them should 
you think me likely to have taken a fancy to ? On 
general grounds, now, from what you know of me ? " 
He proposed this problem with an animated eye. 

" You forget," his friend said, " that though I know, 
thank heaven, a good deal of you, I know very little 
of either of those girls. I have had too little evi- 
dence." 

" Yes, but you are a man who notices. That 's why 
I wanted you to come." 
- " I spoke only to Miss Evers." 

"Yes, I know you have never spoken to Miss 
Vivian." Gordon Wright stood looking at Bernard 
and urging his point as he pronounced these words. 
Bernard felt peculiarly conscious of -his gaze. The 
words represented an illusion, and Longueville asked 
himself quickly whether it were not his duty to 
dispel it. The answer came more slowly than the 
question, but still it came, in the shape of a negative. 
The illusion was but a trifling one, and it was not for 



48  

him, after all, to let his friend know that he had 
already met Miss Vivian. It was for the young girl 
herself, and since she had not done so — although she 
had the opportunity — Longueville said to himself 
that he was bound in honor not to speak. These 
reflections were very soon made, but in the midst 
of them our young man, thanks to a great agUity of 
mind, found time to observe, tacitly, that it was odd, 
just there, to see his "honor" thrusting in its nose. 
Miss Vivian, in her own good time, would doubtless 
mention to Gordon the little incident of Siena. It 
was Bernard's fancy, for a moment, that he already 
knew it, and that the remark he had just uttered had 
an ironical accent; but this impression was com- 
pletely dissipated by the tone in which he added — 
" All the same, you noticed her." 

" Oh, yes ; she is very noticeable." 

"Well, then," said Gordon, "you will see. I should 
like you to make it out. Of course, if I am really 
giving my attention to one to the exclusion of the 
other, it will be easy to discover." 

Longueville was half amused, half irritated by his 
friend's own relish of his little puzzle. "'The ex- 
clusion of the other' has an awkward sound," he 
answered, as they walked on. "Am I to notice that 
you are very rude to one of the young ladies ? " 

" Oh dear, no. Do you think there is a danger of 
that ? " 



 49 

" Well,** said LoBgueville, " I have already guessed.'* 

Gordon Wright remonstrated. "Don't guess yet 
— wait a few days. I won't tell you now." 

" Let us see if he doesn't tell me," said Bernard, 
privately. . And he meditated a moment. " When I 
presented myself, you were sitting very close to Miss 
Evers and talking very earnestly. Your head was 
bent toward her — it was very lover-like. Decidedly, 
Miss Evers is the object ! " 

For a single instant Gordon Wright hesitated, and 
then — "I hope I haven't seemed rude to Miss 
Vivian 1 " he exclaimed. 

Bernard broke into a light laugh. " My dear Gor- 
don, you are very much in love I " he remarked, as 
they arrived at their hoteL 



V. 

Life at Baden-Baden proved a very sociable affair, 
and Bernard Longueville perceived that he should not 
lack opportunity for the exercise of those gifts of 
intelligence to which Gordon Wright had appealed. 
The two friends took long walks through the woods 
and over the mountains, and they mingled with hu- 
man life in the crowded precincts of the Conversa- 
tion-house. They engaged in a ramble on the 
morning after Bernard's arrival, and wandered far 
away, over hill and dale. The Baden forests are 
superb, and the composition of the landscape is most 
effective. There is always a bosky dell in the fore- 
ground, and a purple crag embellished with a ruined 
tower at a proper angle. A little timber-and-plaster 
village peeps out from a tangle of plum-trees, and a 
way-side tavern, in comfortable recurrence, solicits 
concessions to the national custom of frequent refresh- 
ment. Gordon Wright, who was a dogged pedestrian, 
always enjoyed doing his ten miles, and Longueville, 
who was an incorrigible stroller, felt a keen relish 
for the picturesqueness of the country. But it was 
not, on this occasion, of the charms of the landscape 



 51 

or the pleasures of locomotion that they chiefly dis- 
coursed. Their talk took a more closely personal 
turn. It was a year since they had met, and there 
were many questions to ask and answer, many arrears 
of gossip to make up. As they stretched themselves 
on the grass on a sun-warmed hill-side, beneath a 
great German oak whose arms were quiet in the blue 
summer air, there was a lively exchange of impres- 
sions, opinions, speculations, anecdotes. Gordon 
Wright was surely an excellent friend. He took an 
interest in you. He asked no idle questions and 
made no vague professions ; but he entered into your 
situation, he examined it in detail, and what he 
learned he never forgot. Months afterwards, he asked 
you about things which you yourself had forgotten 
He was not a man of whom it would be generally 
said that he had the gift of sympathy ; but he gave 
his attention to a friend's circumstances with a con- 
scientious fixedness which was at least very far 
removed from indifference. Bernard had the gift of 
sympathy — or at least he was supposed to have it ; 
but even he, familiar as he must therefore have been 
with the practice of this charming virtue, was at 
times so struck with his friend's fine faculty of tak- 
ing other people's afiairs seriously that he constantly 
exclaimed to himself, "The excellent fellow — the 
admirable nature!" 

Bernard had two or three questions to ask about 



52  

the three persons who appeared to have formed for 
some time his companion's principal society, but he 
was indisposed to press them. He felt that he should 
see for himself, and at a prospect of entertainment 
of this kind, his fancy always kindled. Gordon was, 
moreover, at first rather shy of confidences, though 
after they had lain on the grass ten minutes there 
was a good deal said. 

" Now what do you think of her face ? " Gordon 
asked, after staring a while at the sky through the 
oak-boughs. 

" Of course, in future,*' said Longueville, " when- 
ever you make use of the personal pronoun feminine, 
I am to understand that Miss Vivian is indicated." 

"Her name is Angela," said Gordon; "but of 
course I can scarcely call her that." 

" It 's a beautiful name," Longueville rejoined ; " but 
I may say, in answer to your question, that I am not 
struck with the fact that her face corresponds to it." 

" You don't think her face beautiful, then ? " 

" I don't think it angelic. But how can I tell ? I 
have only had a glimpse of her," 

" Wait till she looks at you and speaks — wait till 
she smiles," said Gordon. 

' " I don't think T saw her smile — at least, not at 
me, directly. I hope she will!" Longueville went 
on. JBi^t who is she — this beautiful girl with the 
beautiful name?" 



 ^ 63 

''She is her mother's daughter/' said Gordon 
Wright "I don't really know a great deal more 
about her than that." 

" And who is her mother ? " 

" A delightful little woman, devoted to Miss Vivian. 
She is a widow, and Angela is her only child. They 
have lived a great deal in Europe ; they have but a 
modest income. Over here, Mrs. Vivian says, they 
can get a lot of things for their money that they 
can't get at home. So they stay, you see. When 
they are at home they live in New York. They 
know some of my people there. When they are in 
Europe they live about in different places. They are 
fond of Italy. They are extremely nice ; it 's impos- 
sible to be nicer. They are very fond of books, fond 
of music, and art, and all that. They always read in 
the morning. They only come out rather late in 
the day." 

"I see they are very superior people," said Ber- 
nard. "And little Miss Evers — what does she do 
in the morning? I know what she does in the 
evening!" 

"I don't know what her regular habits are. I 
haven't paid much attention to her. She is very 
pretty." 

" Wunderschon ! " said Bernard. " But you were 
certainly talking to her last evening." 

" Of course I talk to her sometimes. She is totally 



54  

diflferent from Angela Vivian — not nearly so culti- 
vated ; but she seems very charming." 

" A little silly^ eh ? " Bernard suggested. 

" She certainly is not so wise as Miss Vivian." 

" That would be too much to ask, eh ? But the 
Vivians, as kind as they are wise, have taken her 
under their protection." 

" Yes," said Gordon, " they are to keep her another 
month or two. Her mother has gone to Marienbad, 
which I believe is thought a dull place for a young 
girl ; so that, as they were coming here, they offered 
to bring her with them. Mrs. Evers is an old friend 
of Mrs. Vivian, who, on leaving Italy, had come up 
to Dresden to be with her. They spent a month 
there together ; Mrs. Evers had been there since the 
winter. I think Mrs. Vivian really came to Baden- 
Baden — she would have preferred a less expensive 
place — to bring Blanche Evers. Her mother wanted 
her so much to come." 

"And was it for her sake that Captain Lovelock 
came, too f" Bernard asked. 

Gordon Wright stared a moment. 

" I 'm sure I don't know ! " 

"Of course you can't be interested in that," said 
Bernard smiling. " Who is Captain Lovelock ! " 

"He is an Englishman, I believe he is what's 
called aristocratically connected — the younger 
brother of a lord, or something of that sort** 



 66 

* Is he a clever man ? " 

" I have n't talked with him much, but I doubt it. 
He is rather rakish ; he plays a great deal" 

" But is that considered here a proof of rakish- 
ness ? " asked Bernard. " Have n't you played a little 
yourself?" 

Gordon hesitated a moment. 

"Tes, I have played a little. I wanted to try 
some experiments. I had made some arithmetical 
calculations of probabilities, which I wished to test." 

Bernard gave a long laugL 

**! am delighted with the reasons you give for 
amusing yourself! Arithmetical calculations!" 

"I assure you they are the real reasons!" said 
Gordon, blushing a little. 

"That's just the beauty of it. Tou were not 
afraid of being 'drawn in/ as little Miss Evers 
says ? " 

'* I am never drawn in, whatever the thing may be. 
I go in, or I stay out; but I am not drawn," said 
Gordon Wright. 

" You were not drawn into coming with Mrs. Vivian 
and her daughter from Dresden to this place ? " 

*' I did n't come with them ; I came a week later." 

" My dear feUow," said Bernard, " that distinction 
is unworthy of your habitual candor." 

"WeU, I was not fascinated; I was not overmas- 
tered. I wanted to come to Baden." 



66  

" I have no doubt you did Had you become veiy 
intimate with your friends in Dresden ? " 

" I had only seen them three times." 

"After which you followed them to this place? 
Ah, don't say you were not fascinated I'* cried Ber- 
nard, laughing and springing to his feet. 



VI. 

That evening, in the gardens of the Kuisaal, he 
renewed acquaintance with Angela Vivian. Her 
mother came, as usual, to sit and listen to the music^ 
accompanied by Blanche Evers, who was in turn at- 
tended by Captain Lovelock. This little party found 
privacy in the crowd; they seated themselves in a 
quiet comer in an angle of one of the barriers of the 
terrace, while the movement of the brilliant Baden 
world went on around them. Gordon Wright en- 
gaged in conversation with Mrs. Vivian, while Ber- 
nard enjoyed an interview with her daughter. This 
young lady continued to ignore the fact of their 
previous meeting, and our hero said to Kmself that 
all he wished was to know what she preferred — he 
would rigidly conform to it. He conformed to her 
present programme; he had ventured to pronounce 
the word Siena the evening before, but he was careful 
not to pronounce it again. She had her reasons for 
her own reserve ; he wondered what they were, and 
it gave him a certain pleasure to wonder. He en- 
joyed the consciousness of their having a secret to- 
gether, and it became a kind of entertaining suspense 



58 •  

to see how long she would continue to keep it. For 
himself, he was in no hurry to let the daylight in ; 
the little incident at Siena had been, in itself, a charm- 
ing affair ; but Miss Vivian's present attitude gave it 
a sort of mystic consecration. He thought she car- 
ried it off very well — the theory that she had not 
seen him before ; last evening she had been slightly 
confused, but now she was as self-possessed as if the 
line she had taken were a matter of conscience. Why 
should it be a matter of conscience? Was she iii 
love with Gordon Wright, and did she wish, in con- 
sequence, to forget — and wish him not to suspect — 
that she had ever received an expression of admira- 
tion from aiTother man ? This was not likely ; it was 
not likely, at leasts that Miss Vivian wished to pass 
for a prodigy of innocence ; for if to be admired is to 
pay a tribute to corruption, it was perfectly obvious 
that so handsome a girl must have tasted of the tree 
of knowledgS As for her being in love with Gordon 
Wright, that of course was another affair, and Bernard 
did not pretend, as yet, to have an opinion on this 
point, beyond hoping very much that she might be. 

He was not wrong in the impression of her good 
looks that he had carried away from the short inter- 
view at Siena. She had a charmingly chiselled face, 
with a free, pure outline, a clear, fair complexion, and 
the eyes and hair of a dusky beauty. Her features 
had a firmness which suggested tranquillity, and yet 



 69 

ber expression was light and quick, a combination — 
or a contradiction — wbich gave an original stamp to 
ber beauty. Bernard remembered that be bad thought 
it a trifle "bold"; but he now perceived that this 
bad been but a vulgar misreading of her dark, direct, 
observant eye. The eye was a charming one ; Ber- 
nard discovered in it, little by little, all sorts of things ; 
and Miss Vivian was, for the present, simply a hand- 
some, intelligent, smiling girl. He gave her an op- 
portunity to make an allusion to Siena ; he said to 
her that his friend told him that she and her mother 
had been spending the winter in Italy. 

" Oh yes," said Angela Vivian ; " we were in the 
far south ; we were five months at Sorrento." 

"And nowhere else ? " 

" We spent a few days in Bome. We usually pre- 
fer the quiet places ; that is my mother's taste." 

" It was not your mother's taste, then," said Ber- 
nard, " that brought you to Baden ? " 

She looked at him a moment. 

" You mean that Baden is not quiet ? " 

Longueville glanced about at the moving, murmur- 
ing crowd, at the lighted windows of the Conversa- 
tion-house, at the great orchestra perched up in its 
pagoda. 

" This is not my idea of absolute tranquillity." 

** Nor mine, either," said Miss Vivian. '* I am not 
fond of absolute tranquillity." 



60  

" How do you arrange it, then, with your mother ? " 

Again she looked at him a moment, with her clever, 
slightly mo6king smile. 

" As yoii see. By making her come where I wish." 

"You have a strong will," said Bernard. "I see 
that." 

" No. I have simply a weak mother. But I make 
sacrifices too, sometimes." 

" What do you call sacrifices ? " 

" Well, spending the winter at Sorrento.** 

Bernard began to laugh, and then he told her she 
must have had a very happy life — "to call a winter 
at Sorrento a sacrifice." * 

" It depends upon what one gives up,** said Miss 
Vivian. 

" What did you give up ? ** 

She touched him with her mocking smile again. 

" That is not a very civil question, asked in that 
way." 

"You mean that I seexn to doubt your abnega- 
tion ? " 

"You seem to insinuate that I had nothing to re- 
nounce. I gave up — I gave up — " and she looked 
about her, considering a little — "I gave up society." 

" I am glad you remember what it was,'* said Ber- 
nard. " If I have seemed uncivil, let me make it up. 
When a woman speaks of giving up society, what she 
means is giving up admiration. You can never have 



 61 

given up that — you can never have escaped from it 
You must have found it even at Sorrento." 

*' It may have been there, but I never found it It 
was very respectful — it never expressed ifeelf." 

" That is the deepest kind/' said Bernard. 

" I prefer the shallower varieties," the young girl 
answered. 

"Well," said Bernard, "you must remember that 
although shallow admiration expresses itself, all the 
admiration that expresses itself is not shallow." 

Miss Vivian hesitated a moment 

"Some of it is impertinent," she said, looking 
straight at him, rather gravely. 

Bernard hesitated about as long. 

*' When it is impertinent it is shallow. That comes 
to the same thing." 

The young girl frowned a little. 

" I am not sure that I understand — I am rather 
stupid. But you see how right I am in my taste for 
such places as this. I have to come here to hear such 
ingenious remarks." 

"You should add that my coming, as well, has 
something to do with it." 

" Everything ! " said Miss Vivian. 

"Everything? Does no one else make ingenious 
remarks ? Does n't my friend Wright ? " 

"Mr. Wright says excellent things, but I should 
not exactly call them ingenious remarks." 



62  

"It is not what Wright says; it's what he does. 
That 's the charm ! " said Bernard. i 

His companion was silent for a moment " That 's 
not usually a charm; good conduct is not thought 
pleasing." 

"It surely is not thought the reverse!" Bernard 
exclaimed. 

" It does n't rank — in the opinion of most people 
— among the things that make men agreeable." 

" It depends upon what you call agreeable." 

" Exactly so," said Miss Vivian. " It all depends 
on that." 

" But the agreeable," Bernard went on — "it is n't 
after all, fortunately, such a subtle idea ! The world 
certainly is agreed to think that virtue is a beautiful 
thing." 

Miss Vivian dropped her eyes a moment, and then, 
looking up, 

" Is it a charm ? " she asked. 

"For me there is no charm without it," Bernard 
declared. 

" I am afraid that for me there is," said the young 
girl 

Bernard was puzzled — he who was not often puz- 
zled. His companion struck him as altogether too 
clever to be likely to indulge jn a silly aflfectation of 
cynicism. And yet, without this, how could one ac- 
count for her sneering at virtue ? 



 63 

"You talk as if you had sounded the depths of 
vice ! " he said, laughing. " What do you know about 
other than virtuous charms ? " 

" I know, of course, nothing about vice ; but I have 
known virtue when it was very tiresome." 

" Ah, then it was a poor affair. It was poor virtua 
The best virtue is never tiresome." 

Miss Vivian looked at him a little, with her fine 
discriminating eye. 

*' What a dreadful thing to have to think any virtue 
poor ! " 

This was a touching reflection, and it might have 
gone further had not the conversation been inter- 
rupted by Mrs. Vivian's appealing to her daughter 
to aid a defective recollection of a story about a 
Spanish family they had met at Biarritz, with which 
she had undertaken to entertain Gordon Wright. 
After this, the little circle was joined by a party of 
American friends who were spending a week at 
Baden, and the conversation became general 



VII. 

But on the following evening, Bernard again found 
himself seated in friendly colloquy with this interest- 
ing girl, while Gordon Wright discoursed with her 
mother on one side, and little Blanche Evers chat- 
tered to the admiring eyes of Captain Lovelock on 
the other. 

" You and your mother are very kind to that little 
giri," our hero said ; " you must be a great advantage 
to her." 

Angela Vivian directed her eyes to her neighbors, 
and let them rest a while on the young giri's little 
fidgeting figure and her fresh, coquettish face. For 
some moments she said nothing, and to Longueville, 
turning over several things in his mind, and watch- 
ing her, it seemed that her glance was one of disfavor. 
He divined, he scarcely knew how, that her esteem 
for her pretty companion was smalL 

"I don't know that I am very kind," said Miss 
Vivian. " I have done nothing in particular for her." 

" Mr. Wright tells me you came to this place mainly 
on her account." 

"I came for myself," said Miss Vivian, "The 



 65 

consideration you speak of perhaps had weight with 
my mother." 

" You are not an easy person to say appreciative 
things to," Bernard rejoined. "One is tempted to 
say them ; but you don't take them." 

The young girl colored as she listened to this ob- 
servation. 

" I don't think you know," she murmured, looking 
away. Then, " Set it down to modesty," she added. 

" That, of course, is what I have done. To what 
else could one possibly attribute an indifference to 
compliments ? " 

" There is something else. One might be proud." 

" There you are again ! " Bernard exclaimed. " You 
won't even let me praise your modesty." 

" I would rather you should rebuke my pride." 

" That is so humble a speech that it leaves no room 
for rebuke." 

For a moment Miss Vivian said nothing. 

" Men are singularly base," she declared presently, 
with a little smile. " They don't care in the least to 
say things that might help a person. They only care 
to say things that may seem effective and agreeable." 

" I see : you think that to say agreeable things is a 
great misdemeanor." 

"It comes from their vanity," Miss Vivian went 
on, as if she had not heard hint " They wish to ap- 
pear agreeable and get credit for cleverness and ten- 

6 



66  

dresse, no matter how silly it would be for another 
person to believe them." 

Bema,]^ was a good deal amused, and a little 
nettled. 

" Women, then," he said, " have rather a fondness 
for producing a bad impression — they like to appear 
disagreeable ? " 

His companion bent her eyes upon her fan for a 
moment as she opened and closed it. 

" They are capable of resigning themselves to it — 
for a purpose." 

Bernard was moved to extreme merriment 

*' For what purpose ? " 

" I don't know that I mean for a purpose/' said 
Miss Vivian; "but for a* necessity." 

"Ah, what an odious necessity !" 

"Necessities usually are odious. But women meet 
them. Men evade them and shirk them." 

"I contest your proposition. Women are them- 
selves necessities; but they are not odious ones!" 
And Bernard added, in a moment, " One could n't 
evade them, if they were I" 

" I object to being called a necessity," said Angela 
Vivian. " It diminishes one's merit." 

" Ah, but it enhances the charm of life ! " 

" For men, doubtless ! " 

" The charm of life is very great," Bernard went 
on^ looking up at the dusky hills and the summer 



 67 

stars, seen through a sort of mist of music and talk, 
and of powdery light projected from the softly lurid 
windows of the gaming-rooms. " The charm of life 
is extreme. I am unacquainted with odious necessi- 
ties. I object to nothing ! " 

Angela Vivian looked about her as he had done — 
looked perhaps a moment longer at the summer stars ; 
and if she had not already proved herself a young 
lady of a contradictory turn, it might have been sup- 
posed she was just then tacitly admitting the charm 
of life to be considerable. 

" Do you suppose Miss Evers often resigns herself to 
being disagreeable — for a purpose ? " asked Longue- 
ville, who had glanced at Captain Lovelock's com- 
panion again. 

" She can't be disagreeable ; 6he is too gentle, too 
soft." 

" Do you mean too silly ? " 

"I don't know that I call her silly. She is not 
very wise; but she has no pretensions — absolutely 
none — so that one is not struck with anything in- 
congruous." 

" What a terrible description ! I suppose one ought 
to have a few pretensions." 

" You see one comes off more easily without them," 
qaid Miss Vivian. 

"Do you call that coming oflf easily ?" 

She looked at him a moment gravely. 



68  

» 

" I am very fond of Blanche," she saii 

" Captain Lovelock is rather fond of her," Bernard 
went on. 

The girl assented. 

"He is completely fascinated — he is very much 
in love with her." 

"And do they mean to make an international 
match ? " 

" I hope not ; my mother and I are greatly troubled." 

" Is n't he a good fellow ? " 

" He is a good fellow ; but he is a mere trifler. He 
has n't a penny, I believe, and he has very expensive 
habits. He gambles a great deal We don't know 
what to do." 

" You should send for the young lady's mother." 

" We have written to her pressingly. She answers 
that Blanche can take care of herself, and that she 
must stay at Marienbad to finish her cure. She has 
just begun a new one." 

"Ah well," said Bernard, "doubtless Blanche can 
take care of herself." 

For a moment his companion said nothing ; then 
she exclaimed — 

" It 's what a girl ought to be able to do ! " 

" I am sure you are ! " said Bernard. 

She met his eyes, and she was going to make some 
rejoinder; but before she had time to speak, her 
mothers little, clear^ conciliatory voice interposed. 



 69 

Mrs. Vivian appealed to her daughter, as she had 
done the night before. 

" Dear Angela, what was the name of the gentle- 
man who delivered that delightful course of lectures 
that we heaixi in Geneva, on — what was the title ? — 
* The Eedeeming Features of the Pagan Morality/ " 

Angela flushed' a little. 

"I have quite forgotten his name, mamma," she 
said, without looking round. 

" Come and sit by me, my dear, and we will talk 
them over. I wish Mr. Wright to hear about them," 
Mrs. Vivian went on. 

" Do you wish to convert him to paganism ? " Ber- 
nard asked. 

" The lectures were very dull ; they had no redeem- 

« 

ing features," said Angela, getting up, but turning 
away from her mother. She stood looking at Ber- 
nard Longueville ; he saw she was annoyed at her 
mother's interference. " Every now and then," she 
said, " I take a turn through the gaming-rooms. The 
last time, Captain Lovelock went with me. Will you 
come to-night ? " 

Bernard assented with expressive alacrity ; he was 
charmed with her not wishing to break off her con- 
versation with him. 

" Ah, we '11 all go ! " said Mrs. Vivian, who had 
been listening, and she invited the others to accom- 
pany her to the EursaaL 



70  

They left their places, but Angela went first, with 
Bernard Longueville by her side ; and the idea of her 
having publicly braved her mother, as it were, for 
the sake of his society, lent for the moment an almost 
ecstatic energy to his tread. If he had been tempted 
to presume upon his triumph, however, he would 
have found a check in the fact that the young girl 
herself tasted very soberly of the sweets of defiance. 
She was silent and grave ; she had a manner which 
took the edge from the wantonness of filial indepen- 
dence. Yet, for all this, Bernard was pleased with 
his position ; and, as he walked with her through the 
lighted and crowded rooms, where they soon detached 
themselves from their companions, he felt that pe- 
culiar satisfaction which best expresses itself in silence. 
Angela looked a while at the rows of still, attentive 
faces, fixed upon the luminous green circle, across 
which little heaps of louis d'or were being pushed 
to and fro, and she continued to say nothing. Then 
at last she exclaimed simply, " Come away 1 " They 
turned away and passed into another chamber, in 
which there was no gambling. It was an immense 
apartment, apparently a ball-room ; but at present it 
was quite unoccupied. There were green velvet 
benches all around it, and a great polished floor 
stretched away, shining in the light of chandeliers 
adorned with innumerable glass drops. Miss Vivian 
stood a moment on the threshold; then she passed 



 71 

in, and they stopped in the middle of the place, fac- 
ing each other, and with their figures reflected as if 
they had been standing on a sheet of ice. There 
was no one in the room ; they were entirely alone. 

" Why don't you recognize me ? " Bernard mur- 
mured quickly. 

" Recognize you ? " 

"Why do you seem to forget our meeting at 
Siena ? " 

She might have answered if she had answered im- 
mediately ; but she hesitated, and while she did so 
something happened at the other end of the room 
which caused her to shift her glance. A green velvet 
portikre suspended in one of the door- ways — not 
that tlirough which our friends had passed — was 
lifted, and Gordon Wright stood there, holding it up, 
and looking at them. His companions were behind 
him. 

" Ah, here they are ! " cried Gordon, in his loud, 
clear voice. 

This appeared to strike Angela Vivian as an inter- 
ruption, and Bernard saw it very much in the same 
light 



vin. 

He forbore to ask her his question again — she 
might tell him at her convenience. But the days 
passed by, and she never told him — she had her 
own reasons. Bernard talked with her very often; 
conversation formed indeed the chief entertainment of 
the quiet little circle of which he was a member. 
They sat on the ten^ace and talked in the mingled 
starlight and lamplight, and they strolled in the deep 
green forests and wound along the side of the gentle 
Baden hills, under the influence of colloquial ten- 
dencies. The Black Forest is a country of almost 
unbroken shade, and in the still days of midsummer 
the whole place was covered with a motionless canopy 
of verdure. Our friends were not extravagant or 
audacious people, and they looked at Baden life 
very much from the outside — they sat aloof from 
the brightly lighted drama of professional revelry. 
Among themselves as well, however, a little drama 
went forward in which each member of the company 
had a part to play. Bernard Longueville had been 
surprised at first at what he would have called Miss 
Vivian's approachableness — at the frequency with 



 73 

which he encountered opportunities for sitting near 
her and entering into conversation. He had expected 
that Gordon Wright would deem himself to have 
established an anticipatory claim upon the young 
lady's attention, and that, in pursuance of this claim, 
he would occupy a recognized place at her side. Gor- 
don was, after all, wooing her; it was very natural 
he should seek her society. In fact, he was never 
very far off; but Bernard, for three or four days, had 
the anomalous consciousness of being still nearer. 
Presently, however, he perceived that he owed this 
privilege simply to his friend's desire that he should 
become acquainted with Miss Vivian — should receive 
a vivid impression of a person in whom Gordon was 
so deeply interested. After this result might have 
been supposed to be attained, Gordon Wright stepped 
back into his usual place and showed her those small 
civilities which were the only homage that the quiet 
conditions of their life rendered possible — walked 
with her, talked with her, brought her a book to read, 
a chair to sit upon, a couple of flowers to place in the 
bosom of her gown, treated her, in a word, with a 
sober but by no means inexpressive gallantry. He 
had not been making violent love, as he told Longue- 
ville, and these demonstrations were certainly not 
violent Bernard said to himself that if he were 
not in the secret, a spectator would scarcely make the 
discovery that Gordon cherished an even very safely 



74  

tended flame. Angela Vivian, on her side, was not 
strikingly responsive. There was nothing in her de- 
portment to indicate that she was in love with her 
systematic suitor. She was perfectly gracious and 
civil. She smiled in his face when he shook hands 
with her ; she looked at him and listened when he 
talked ; she let him stroll beside her in the Lichten- 
thai Alley ; she read, or appeared to read, the books 
he lent her, and she decorated herself with the flowers 
he offered. She seemed neither bored nor embar- 
rassed, neither irritated nor oppressed. But it was 
Bernard's belief that she took no more pleasure in 
his attentions than a pretty girl must always take in 
any recognition of her charms. " If she *s not indiffer- 
ent," he said to himself, " she is, at any rate, impar- 
tial — profoundly impartial" 

It was not till the end of a week that Gordon 
Wright told him exactly how his business stood with 
Miss Vivian and what he had reason to expect and 
hope — a week during which their relations had been 
of the happiest and most comfortable cast, and dur- 
ing which Bernard, rejoicing in their long walks and 
talks, in the charming weather, in the beauty and 
entertainment of the place, and in other things 
besides, had not ceased to congratulate himself on 
coming to Baden. Bernard, after the first day, had 
asked his friend no questions. He had a great respect 
for opportunity, coming either to others or to himself, 



 75 

and he left Gordon to turn his lantern as fitfully as 
might be upon the subject which was tacitly open 
between them, but of which as yet only the mere 
edges had emerged into light. Gordon, on his side, 
seemed content for the moment with having his 
clever friend under his hand; he reserved him for 
final appeal or for some other mysterious use. 

"You can't tell me you don't know her now,** he 
said, one evening as the two young men strolled along 
the lichtenthal Alley — " now that you have had a 
whole week's observation of her.'* 

"What is a week's observation of a singularly 
clever and complicated woman T* Bernard asked. 

" Ah, your week has been of some use. You have 
found out she is complicated ! " Gordon rejoined. 

"My dear Gordon," Longueville exclaimed, **I 
don't see what it signifies to you that I should find 
Miss Vivian out ! When a man 's in love, what need 
he care what other people think of the loved ob- 
ject ? " 

" It would certainly be a pity to care too much. 
But there is some excuse for him in the loved object 
being, as you say, complicated." 

" Nonsense ! That 's no excuse. The loved object 
is always complicated." 

Gordon walked on in silencJe a moment. 

"Well, then, I don't care a button what you 
think ! " 



76  

" Bravo . That 's the way a man should talk," cried 
Longueville. 

Gordon indulged in another fit of meditation, and 
then he said — 

" Now that leaves you at liberty to say what you 
please." 

"Ah, my dear fellow, you are ridiculous!" said 
Bernard. 

" That 's precisely what I want you to say. Tou 
always think me too reasonable." 

'* Well, I go back to my first assertion. I don't know 
Miss Vivian — I mean I don't know her to have 
opinions about her. I don't suppose you wish me to 
string you o£F a dozen mere hanalitSs — ' She *s a 
charming girl — evidently a superior person — has a 
great deal of style.' " 

" Oh no," said Gordon j " I know aU that But, at 
any rate," he added, " you like her, eh ? " 

" I do more," said Longueville. " I admire her.'* 

" Is that doing more ? " asked Gordon, reflectively. 

"Well, the gi*eater, whichever it is, includes the 
less." 

" You won't commit yourself," said Gordon. " My 
dear Bernard," he added, " I thought you knew such 
an immense deal about women ! " 

Gordon Wright was of so kindly and candid a 
nature that it is hardly conceivable that this remark 
should have been framed to make Bernard commit 



 77 

himself by putting him on his mettle. Such a view 
would imply indeed on Gordon's part a greater famil- 
iarity with the uses of irony than he had ever pos- 
sessed, as well as a livelier conviction of the irritable 
nature of his friend's vanity. In fact, however, it 
may be confided to the reader that Bernard was 
pricked in a tender place, though the resentment of 
vanity was not visible in his answer. 

" You were quite wrong," he simply said. " I am as 
ignorant of women as a monk in his cloister." 

" You try to prove too much. You don't think her 
sympathetic ! " And as regards this last remark, 
Gordon Wright must be credited with a certain 
ironical impulse. 

Bernard stopped impatiently. 

f I ask you again, what does it matter to you what 
I think of her?" 

'' It matters in this* sense — that she has refused 



me. 



" Eefused you ? Then it is all over, and nothing 
matters." 

" No, it is n*t over," said Gordon, with a positive 
head-shake. " Don't you see it is n't over ? " 

Bernard smiled, laid his hand on his friend's 
shoulder and patted it a little. 

" Your attitude might almost pass for that of resig- 
nation." 

" I 'm not resigned ! " said Gordon Wright 



78  

" Of course not. But when were you refused ? " 

Gordon stood a minute with his eyes fixed on the 
ground. Then, at last looking up, 

" Three weeks ago — a fortnight before you came. 
But let us walk along," he said, " and I will tell you 
all about it." 

" I proposed to her three weeks ago," said Gordon, 
as they walked along. "My heart was very much 
set upon it. I was very hard hit — I was deeply 
smitten.. She had been very kind to me — she had 
been charming — I thought she liked me. Then I 
thought her mother was pleased, and would have 
liked it. Mrs. Vivian, in fact, told me as much ; 
for of course I spoke to her first. Well, Angela does 
like me — or at least she did — and I see no reason 
to suppose she has changed. Only she didn't like 
me enough. She said the friendliest and pleasantest 
things to me, but she thought Chat she knew me too 
little, and that I knew her even less. She made a 
great point of that — that I had no right, as yet, to 
trust her. I told her that if she would trust me, I 
was perfectly willing to trust her ; but she answered 
that this was poor reasoning. She said that I was 
trustworthy and that she was not, and — in short, all 
sorts of nonsense. She abused herself roundly —. 
accused herself of no end of defects." 

" What defects, for instance ? " 

" Oh, I have n't remembered them. She said she 



 ' 79 

had a "bad temper — that she led her mother a dreadful 
life. Now, poor Mrs. Vivian says she is an angel." 

" Ah yes/' Bernard observed ; " Mrs. Vivian says 
that, very freely." 

"Angela declared that she was jealous, ungener- 
ous, unforgiving^- all sorts of things. I remember 
she said * I am very false,' and I think she remarked 
that she was crueL" 

" But this did n't put you off," said Bernard. 

" Not at all. She was making up." 

"She^ makes up very well!" Bernard exclaimed, 
laughing. 

" Do you call that well ? " 

" I mean it was very clever." 

" It was not clever from the point of view of wish- 
ing to discourage me." 

"Possibly. But I am sure," said Bernard, "that 
if I had been present at your interview — excuse the 
impudence of the hypothesis — I should have been 
struck with the young lady's — " and he paused a 
moment. 

" With her what ? " 

"With her ability." 

"Well, her ability was not suflScient to induce me 
to give up my idea. She told me that after I had 
known her six months I should detest her." 

" I have no doubt she could make you do it if she 
should try. . That 's what I mean by her ability." 



80  

" She calls herself cruel," said Gordon, "but she has 
not had the cruelty to try. She has been very rea- 
sonable — she has been perfect. I agreed with her 
that I would drop the subject for a while, and that 
meanwhile we should be good friends. We should 
take time to know each other better and act in 
accordance with further knowledge. There was no 
hurry, since we trusted each other — wrong as my 
trust might be. She had no wish that I should go 
away. I was not in the least disagreeable to her; 
she liked me extremely, and I was perfectly free to 
try and please her. Only I should drop my proposal, 
and be free to take it up again or leave it alone, later, 
as I should choose. If she felt differently then, I 
should have the benefit of it, and if I myself felt 
differently, I should also have the benefit of it." 

"That's a very comfortable arrangement. And 
that's your present situation?" asked Bernard. 

Gordon hesitated a moment. 

" More or less, but not exactly." 

" Miss Vivian feels differently ? " said Bernard. 

" Not that I know of." 

Gordon's companion, with a laugh, clapped him on 
the shoulder again. 

" Admirable youth, you are a capital match ! " 

" Are you alluding to my money ? " 

*' To your money and to your modesty. There is 
as much of one as of the other — which is saying a 
great deal." 



 81 

"Well," said Gordon, "in spite of that enviable 
combination, I am not happy." 

"I thought you seemed pensive I" Bernard ex- 
claimed. " It 's you, then, who feel differently." 

Gordon gave a sigh. 

" To say that is to say too much." 

*' What shall we say, then ? " his companion asked, 
kindly. 

Gt)rdon stopped again ; he stood there looking up at 
a certain particularly lustrous star which twinkled — 
the night was cloudy — in an open patch of sky, and 
the vague brightness shone down on his honest and 
serious visage. 

" I don't understand her," he said. 

" Oh, I '11 say that with you any day ! " cried Ber- 
nard. " I can't help you there." 

" You must help me ; " and Gordon Wright deserted 
his star. *' You must keep me in good humor." 

"Please to walk on, then. I don't in the least 
pity you ; she is very charming with you." 

" True enough ; but insisting on that is not the way 
to keep me in good humor — when I feel as I do." 

" How is it you feel ? " 

** Puzzled to death — bewildered — depressed ! " 

This was but the beginning of Gordon Wright's 

list ; he went on to say that though he " thought as 

highly " of Miss Vivian as he had ever done, he felt 

less at his ease with her than in the first weeks of 

6 



82  

their acquaintance, and this condition made him un- 
' comfortable and unhappy. 

" I don't know what 's the matter," said poor Gordon. 
" I don't know what has come between us. It is n't 
her fault — I don't make her responsible for it. I 
began to notice it about a fortnight ago — before you 
came ; shortly after that talk I had with her that I 
have just described to you. Her manner has n't 
changed and I have no reason to suppose that she 
likes me any the less; but she makes a strange 
impression on me — she makes me uneasy. It 's 
only her nature coming out, I suppose — what you 
might call her originality. She 's thoroughly original 
— she's a kind of mysterious creature. I suppose 
that what I feel is a sort of fascination ; but that is 
just what I don't like. Hang it, I don't want to be 
fascinated — I object to being fascinated ! " 

This little story had taken some time in the tell- 
ing, so that the two young men had now reached 
their hotel 

" Ah, my dear Gordon," said Bernard, "we speak a 
different language. If you don't want to be fasci- 
nated, what is one to say to you ? *Object to being 
fescinated ! ' There 's a man easy to satisfy ! Baffin^, 

" Well, see here now," said Gordon, stopping in the 
door- way of the inn ; " when it comes to the point, 
do you like it yourself ? " 



 83 

J 

"When it comes to the point ? " Bernard exclaimed 
"I assure you I don't wait till then. I like the 
beginning — I delight in the approach of it — I revel 
in the prospect." 

" That *s just what I did. But now that the thing 
has come — I don't reveL To be fascinated is to be 
mystified. Damn it, I like my liberty — I like my 
judgment ! " 

*' So do I — like yours," said Bernard, laughing, as 
they took their bedroom candles. 



IX. 

Bernard talked of this matter rather theoretically, 
inasmuch as to his own sense^ he was in a state 
neither of incipient nor of absorbed fascination. He 
got on very easily, however, with Angela Vivian, and 
felt none of the mysterious discoQifort alluded to by 
his friend. The element of mystery attached itself 
rather to the young lady's mother, who gave him the 
impression that for undiscoverable reasons she avoided 
his society. He regretted her evasive deportment, for 
he found something agreeable in this shy and scrupu- 
lous little woman, who struck him as a curious speci- 
men of a society of which he had once been very fond. 
He learned that she was of old New England stock, 
but he had not needed this information to perceive 
that Mrs. Vivian was animated by the genius of 
Boston. "She has the Boston temperament," he 
said, using a phrase with which he had become fa- 
miliar and which evoked a train of associations. But 
then he immediately added that if Mrs. Vivian was a 
daughter of the Puritans, the Puritan strain in her 
disposition had been mingled with another element. 
"It is the Boston temperament sophisticated," he 



 85 

said; "perverted a little — perhaps even corrapteA 
It is the local east-wind with an infusion from 
climates less tonic." It seemed to him that Mrs. 
Vivian was a Puritan grown worldly — a Bostonian 
relaxed; and this impression, oddly enough, con- 
tributed to his wish to know more of her. He felt 
like going up to her very politely and saying, " Dear 
lady and most honored compatriot^ what in the world 
have I done to displease you ? You don't approve of 
me, and I am dying to know the reason why. I 
should be so happy to exert myself to be agreeable to 
you. It 's no use ; you give me the cold shoulder. 
When I speak to you, you look the other way ; it is 
only when I speak to your daughter that you look at 
me. It is true that at those times you look at me 
very hard, and if I am not greatly mistaken, you are 
not gratified by what you see. You count the words 
I address to your beautiful Angela — you time our 
harmless little interviews. You interrupt them in- 
deed whenever you can; you call her away — you 
appeal to her ; you cut across the conversation. Y'ou 
are always laying plots to keep us apart.- Why can't 
you leave me alone ? I assure you I am the most 
innocent of men. Your beautiful Angela can't possi- 
bly be injured by my conversation, and I have no 
designs whatever upon her peace of mind. What on 
earth have I done to offend you ? " 
These observations Bernard Longueville was dis- 



86  

posed to make, and one afternoon, the opportunity 
offering, they rose to his lips and came very near 
passing them. In fact, however, at the last moment, 
his eloquence took another turn. It was the custom 
of the orchestra at the Kursaal to play in the after- 
noon, and as the music was often good, a great many 
people assembled under the trees, at three o'clock, to 
listen to it. This was not, as a regular thing, an hour 
of re-imion for the little group in which we are 
especially interested ; Miss Vivian, in particular, un- 
less an excursion of some sort had been agreed upon 
the day before, was usually not to be seen in the 
precincts of the Conversation-house until the evening. 
Bernard, one afternoon, at three o'clock, directed his 
steps to this small world-centre of Baden, and, passing 
along the terrace, soon encountered little Blanche 
Evers strolling there under a pink parasol and accom- 
panied by Captain Lovelock. This young Ijtdy was 
always extremely sociable; it was quite in accordance 
with her habitual geniality that she should stop and 
say how d' ye do to our hero. 

" Mr. Longueville is growing very frivolous," she 
said, " coming to the Kursaal at all sorts of hours." 

"There is nothing frivolous in coming here with 
the hope of finding you," the young man answered. 
" That is very serious." 

" It would be more serious to lose Miss Evers than 
to find her," remarked Captain Lovelock, with gallant 
jocosity. 



1 



\ 



 87 

" I wish you would lose me ! " cried the young girL 
" I think I should like to be lost I might have all 
kinds of adventures." 

"I 'guess* so!" said Captain Lovelock, hilariously. 

" Oh, I should find my way. I can take care of 
myself ! " Blanche went on. 

" Mrs. Vivian does n't think so," said Bernard, who 
had just perceived this lady, seated under a tree with 
a book, over the top of which she- was observing her 
pretty prot^gie, Blanche looked toward her and gave 
her.a little nod and a smile. Then chattering on to 
the young men — 

" She 's awfully careful. I never saw any one so 
carefoL But I suppose she is right. She promised 
my mother she would be tremendously particular; 
but I don't know what she thinks I would do." 

" That is n't flattering to me," said Captain Lovelock. 
" Mrs. Vivian does n't approve of me — she wishes me 
in Jamaica. What does she think me capable of ? " 

" And me, now ? " Bernard asked. " She likes me 
least of all, and I, on my side, think she 's so nice." 

" Can't say I 'm very sweet on her," said the Cap- 
tain. " She strikes me as feline." 

Blanche Evers gave a little cry of horror. 

"Stop, sir, this instant! I won't have you talk 
that way about a lady who has been so kind to me." 

" She is n't so kind to you. She would like to lock 
you up where I can never see you." 



88  

"I 'm sure I shouldn't mind that!" cried the young 
*girl, with a little laugh and a toss of her bead. 
"Mrs. Vivian has the most perfect character — that's 
why my mother wanted me to come with her. And 
if she promised my mother she would be careful, 
is n*t she right to keep her promise ? She 's a great 
deal more careful than mamma ever was, and that 's 
just what mamma wanted. She would never take 
the trouble herself And then she was always scold- 
ing me. Mrs. Vivian never scolds me. She only 
watches me, but I don't mind that." 

"I wish she would watch you a little less and 
scold you a little more," said Captain Lovelock. 

" I have no doubt you wish a great many horrid 
things," his companion rejoined, with delightful 
asperity. 

"Ah, unfortunately I never have anything I wish!" 
sighed Lovelock. 

"Your wishes must be comprehensive," said Ber- 
nard. " It seems to me you have a good deal" 

The Englishman gave a shrug. 

" It 'a less than you might think. She is watching 
us more furiously than ever," he added, in a moment, 
looking at Mrs. Vivian. " Mr. Gordon Wright is the 
only man she likea She is awfully fond of Mr. Gor- 
don Wright." 

" Ah, Mrs. Vivian shows her wisdom ! " said Ber- 
nard. 



-I 



 89 

"He is certainly very handsome," munnnred 
Blanche Evers, glancing several times, with a very 
pretty aggressiveness, at Captain Lovelock. " I must 
say I like Mr. Gordon Wright. Why in the world 
did you come here without him ? " she went on, ad- 
dressing herself to Bernard. "You two are so awfully 
inseparable. I don't think I ever saw you alone 
before." 

" Oh, I have often seen Mr. Gordon Wright alone," 
said Captain Lovelock — "that is, alone with Miss 
Vivian. That's what the old lady likes; she can't 
have too much of that." 

The young girl, poised for an instant in one of her 
pretty attitudes, looked at him from head to foot. 

" Well, I call that scandalous ! Do you mean that 
she wants to make a match ? " 

" I mean that the young man has six thousand a 
year." 

"It 's no matter what he has — six thousand a year 
is n't much ! And we don't do things in that way in 
our country. We have n't those horrid match-making 
arrangements that you have in your dreadful country. 
American mothers are not like English mothers." 

"Oh, any one can see, of course," said Captain 
Lovelock, " that Mr. Gordon Wright is dying of love 
for Miss Vivian." 

" I can't see it ! " cried Blanche. 

" He dies easier than I, eh ? " 



90  

** I wish you would die ! '* said Blancha " At any 
rate, Angela is not dying of love for Mr. Wright.'* 

" Well, she will marry him all the same," Lovelock 
declared. 

Blanche Evers glanced at Bernard. 

"Why don't you contradict that?" she asked. 
" Why don*t you speak up for your friend ? " 

" I am quite ready to speak for my friend," said 
Bernard, "but I am not ready to speak for Miss 
Vivian/' 

"Well, I am," Blanche declared. " She won't marry 
him." 

" If she does n't, I '11 eat my hat ! " said Captain 
Lovelock. "What do you mean," he went on, "by 
saying that in America a pretty girl's mother does n't 
care for a young fellow's property ? " 

"Well, they don't — we consider that dreadful. 
Why don't you say so, Mr. Longueville ? " Blanche 
demanded. "I never saw any one take things so 
quietly. Have n't you got any patriotism ? " 

" My patriotism is modified by an indisposition to 
generalize," said Bernard, laughing. " On this point 
permit me not to generalize. I am interested in the 
particular case — in ascertaining whether Mra. Vivian 
thinks very often of Gordon Wright's income." 

Miss Evers gave a little toss of disgust. 

" If you are so awfully impartial, you had better 
go and ask her." 



 91 

" That 's a good idea — I think I will go and ask 
her/' said Bernard. 

Captain Lovelock returned to his argument. 

" Do you mean to say that your mother would be 
indifferent to the fact that I have n't a shilling in the 
world ? " 

" Indifferent ? " Blanche demanded. " Oh no, she 
would be sorry for you. She is very charitable— she 
would give you a shilling ! " 

" She would n't let you marry me," said Lovelock. 

" She would n't have much trouble to prevent it ! '* 
cried the young girl. 

Bernard had had enough of this intellectual fenc- 
ing. 

" Yes, I will go and ask Mrs. Vivian," he repeated 
And he left his companions to resume their walk. 



X. 

It had seemed to him a good idea to interrogate 
Mrs. Vivian ; but there are a great many good ideas 
that are never put into execution. As he approached 
her with a smUe and a salutation, and, with the air 
of asking leave to take a liberty, seated himself in the 
empty chair beside her, he felt a humorous relish of 
her own probable dismay which relaxed the investi- 
gating impulse. His impulse was now simply to 
prove to her that he was the most unobjectionable 
fellow in the world — a proposition which resolved 
itself into several ingenious observations upon the 
weather, the music, the charms and the drawbacks of 
Baden, the merits of the volume that she held in her 
lap. If Mrs. Vivian should be annoyed, should be 
fluttered, Bernard would feel very sorry for her; 
there was nothing in the world that he respected 
more than the moral consciousness of a little Boston 
woman whose view of life was serious and whose 
imagination was subject to alarms. He held it to be 
a temple of delicacy, where one should walk on tip- 
toe, and he wished to exhibit to Mrs. Vivian the 
possible lightness of his own step. She herself was 
incapable of being rude or ungracious, and now that 



 93 

she was fairly confronted with the plausible object of 
her miatrust, she composed herself to her usual atti- 
tude of refined liberality. Her book was a volume of 
Victor Cousin. 

"You must have an extraordinary power of ab- 
stracting your mind," Bernard said to her, observ- 
ing it. " Studying philosophy at the Baden Kursaal 
strikes me as a real intellectual feat." 

"Don't you think we need a little philosophy 
here ? " 

" By all means — what we bring with us. But I 
should n't attempt the use of the text-book on the 
spot." 

" You should n't speak of yourself as if you were 
not clever," said Mrs. Viviaa " Every one says you 
are so very clever." 

Longueville stared; there was an unexpectedness 
in the speech and an incongruity in Mrs. Vivian's 
beginning to flatter him. He needed to remind him- 
self that if she was a Bostonian, she was a Bostonian 
perverted. 

" Ah, my dear madam, every one is no one," he said, 
laughing. 

" It was Mr. Wright, in particular," she rejoined. 
" He has always told us that." 

" He is blinded by friendship." 

"Ah yes, we know about your friendship," said 
Mrs. Vivian. " He has told us about that" 



94  

" You are making him out a terrible talker ! '* 

"We think he talks so well — we are so very 
fond of his conversation." 

" It 's usually excellent," said Bernard. " But it 
depends a good deal on the subject." 

"Oh," rejoined Mrs. Vivian, "we always let him 
choose his subjects." And dropping her eyes as if 
in sudden reflection, she began to smooth down the 
crumpled corner of her volume. 

It occurred to Bernard that — by some mysterious 
impulse — she was suddenly presenting him with a 
chance to ask her the question that Blanche Evers 
had just suggested. Two or three other things as 
well occun'ed to him. Captain Lovelock had been 
struck with the fact that she favored Gordon Wright's 
addresses to her daughter, and Captain Lovelock had 
a grotesque theory that she had set her heart upon 
seeing this young lady come into six thousand a year. 
Miss Evers's devoted swain had never struck Bernard 
'as a brilliant reasoner, but our friend suddenly found 
himself regarding him as one of the inspired. The 
form of depravity into which the New England con- 
science had lapsed on Mrs. Vivian's part was an undue 
appreciation of a possible son-in-law's income! In 
this illuminating discovery everything else became 
clear. Mrs. Vivian disliked her humble servant be- 
cause he had not thirty thousand dollars a year, and 
because at a moment when it was Angela's prime 



 95 

duty to concentrate her thoughts upon Gordon 
Wright's great advantages, a clever young man of 
paltry fortune was a superfluous diversion. 

" When you say clever, everything is relative," he 
presently observed. "Now, there is Captain Love- 
lock ; he has a certain kind of cleverness ; he is very 
observant." 

Mrs. Vivian glanced up with a preoccupied air. 

" We don't like Captain Lovelock,*' she said. 

" I have heard him say capital things," Bernard 
answered. 

" We think him brutal," said Mrs. Vivian. " Please 
don't praise Captain Lovelock." 

" Oh, I only want to be just." 

Mrs. Vivian for a moment said nothing. 

" Do you want very much to be just ? " she pres- 
ently asked. 

" It 's my most ardent desire." 

" I 'm glad to hear that — • and I can easily believe 
it," said Mrs. Vivian, 

Bernard gave her a grateful smile, but while he 
smiled, he asked himself a serious question. " Why 
the deuce does she go on flatt(3ring me ? — You have 
always been very kind to me," he said aloud. 

" It 's on Mr. Wright's account," she answered de- 
murely. 

In speaking the words I have just quoted, Bernard 
Longueville had felt himself, with a certain compunc- 



96  

tion, to be skirting the edge of clever impudence; 
but Mrs. Vivian's quiet little reply suggested to him 
that her cleverness, if not her impudence, was almost 
equal to his own. He remarked to himself that he 
had not yet done her justice. 

"You bring everything back to Gordon Wright," 
he said, continuing to smile. 

Mrs. Vivian blushed a little. 

" It is because he is really at the foundation of 
everything that is pleasant for us here. When we 
first came we had some very disagreeable rooms, and 
as soon as he amved he found us some excellent 
ones — that were less expensive. And then, Mr. 
Longueville," she added, with a soft, sweet emphasis 
which should properly have contradicted the idea of 
audacity, but which, to Bernard's awakened sense, 
seemed really to impart a vivid color to it, " he was 
also the cause of your joining our little party." 

"Oh, among his services that should never be for- 
gotten. You should set up a tablet to commemorate 
it, in the wall of the Kursaal ! — The wicked little 
woman ! " Bernard mentally subjoined. 

Mrs. Vivian appeared quite unruffled by his sportive 
sarcasm, and she continued to enumerate her obliga- 
tions to Gordon Wright. 

" There are so many ways in which a gentleman 
can be of assistance to three poor lonely women, 
especially when he is at the same time so friendly 



 97 

and so delicate as Mr. Wright I don't know what 
we should have done without him, and I feel as 
if every one ought to know it. He seems like 
a very old friend. My daughter and I quite wor- 
ship him. I will not conceal from you that when 
I saw you coming through the grounds a short time 
ago without him I was very much disappointed. I 
hope he is not ilL" 

Bernard sat listening, with his eyes on the ground. 

" Oh no, he is simply at home writing letters." 

Mrs. Vivian was silent a moment 

" I suppose he has a very large correspondence." 

" I really don't know. Just now that I am with 
him he has a smaller one than usual" 

" Ah yes. When you are separated I suppose you 
write volumes to each other. But he must have a 
great many business letters." 

" It is very likely," said Bernard. " And if he has, 
you may be sure he writes them." 

"Order and method!" Mrs. Vivian exclaimed. 
" With his immense property those virtues are neces- 
sary." 

Bernard glanced at her a moment 

"My dear Lovelock," he said to himself, "you are 
not such a fool as you seem. — Gordon's virtues are 
always necessary, doubtless," he went on. "But 
should you say his property was immense ? " 

Mrs. Vivian made a delicate little movement of 

7 



98  

deprecation. "Oh, don't ask me to say! I know 
nothing about it ; I only supposed he was rich." 

" He is rich ; but he is not a Crcesus." 

" Oh, you fashionable young men have a standard 
of luxuiy ! " said Mrs. Vivian, with a little laugh. 
" To a poverty-stricken widow such a fortune as Mr. 
Wright's seems magnificent." 

" Don't call me such horrible names ! " exclaimed 
Bernard. " Our friend has certainly money enough 
and to spare." 

" That was all I meant. He once had occasion to 
allude to his property, but he was so modest, so 
reserved in the tone lie took about it, that one hardly 
knew what to think." 

" He is ashamed of being rich," said Bernard. "He 
would be sure to represent everything unfavorably." 

"That's just what I thought!" This ejaculation 
was more eager than Mrs. Vivian might have intended, 
but even had it been less so, Bernard was in a mood 
to appreciate it. " I felt that we should make allow- 
ances for his modesty. But it was in very good 
taste," Mrs. Vivian added. 

" He 's a fortunate man,"' said Bernard. " He gets 
credit for his good taste — and he gets credit for the 
full figure of his income as well ! " 

"Ah," munnured Mrs. Vivian, rising lightly, as if 
to make her words appear more casual, "I don't 
know the full figure of his income." 



 99 

She was turning away, and Bernard, as he raised 
his hat and separated from her, felt that it was rather 
cruel that he should let her go without enlightening 
her ignorance. But he said to himself that she knew 
quite enough. Indeed, he took a walk along the Lich- 
tenthal Alley arid carried out this line of reflection. 
Whether or no Miss Vivian were in love with Gordon 
Wright, her mother was enamored of Gordon's fortune, 
and it had suddenly occurred to her that instead of 
treating the friend of her daughter's suitor with civil 
mistrust, she would help her case better by giving him 
a hint of her state of mind and appealing to his sense 
of propriety. Nothing could be more natural than 
that Mrs. Vivian should suppose that Bernard desired ^ 
his friend's success ; for, as our thoughtful hero said to 
himself, what she had hitherto taken it into her head 
to fear was not that Bernard should fall in love with 
her daughter, but that her daughter should fall in love 
with him. Watering-pilace life is notoriously con- 
ducive to idleness of mind, and Bernard strolled for 
half an hour along the overarched avenue, glancing 
alternately at these two insupposable cases. 

A few days afterward, late in the evening, Gordon 
Wright came to his room at the hotel 

" I have just received a letter from my sister," he 
said. " I am afraid I shall have to go away." 

"Ah, I'm sorry for that," said Bernard, who was so 
well pleased with the actual that he desired no muta- 
tioa 



100  

" I mean only for a short time/' Gordon explained 
*'My poor sister writes from England, telling me that 
my brother-in-law is suddenly obliged to go home. 
She has decided not to remain behind, and they are 
to sail a fortnight hence. She wants very mucli to 
see me before she goes, 8(^d as I don't know when I 
shall see her again, I feel as if I ought to join her 
immediately and spend the interval with her. That 
will take about a fortnight." 

"I appreciate the sanctity of family ties and' I pro- 
ject myself into your situation," said Bernard. " On 
the other hand, I don't envy you a breathless journey 
from Baden to Folkestone." 

It 's the coming back that will be breathless," 
exclaimed Gordon, smiling. 

" You will certainly come back, then ? " 

" Most certainly. Mrs. Vivian is to be here another 
month." 

"I understand. Well, ^e shall miss you very 
much." 

Gordon Wright looked for a moment at his com- 
panion. 

" You will stay here, then ? I am so glad of that." 

"I was taking it for granted; but on reflection — 
what do you recommend ? " 

" I recommend you to stay." 

" My dear fellow, your word is law," said Bernard. 

" I want you to take care of those ladies," his friend 
went on. " I don't like to leave them alone." 



 101 

" You are joking I " cried Bernard. " When did you 
ever hear of my 'taking care' of any one? It's as 
much as I can do to take care of myself." 

" This is very easy," said Gordon. " I simply want 
to feel that they have a man about them." 

" They will have a man. at any rate — they have 
the devoted Lovelock." 

*' That 's just why I want them to have another. 
He has only an eye to Miss Evers, who, by the way, 
is extremely bored with him. You look after the 
others.^ You have made yourself very agreeable to 
them, and they like you extremely." 

" Ah," said Bernard, laughing, " if you are going to 
be coarse and flattering, I collapse. If you are going 
to titillate my vanity, I succumb." 

"It won*t be so disagreeable," Gordon observed, 
with an intention vaguely humorous. 

" Oh no, it won't be disagreeable. I will go to Mrs. 
Vivian every morning, hat in hand, for my orders." 

Gordon Wright, with his hands in his pockets and 
a meditative expression, took several turns about the 
room. 

" It will be a capital chance," he said, at last, stop- 
ping in front of his companion. 

" A chance for what ? " 

"A chance to arrive at a conclusion about my 
young friend." 

Bernard gave a gentle groan. 



102  

^ Are you coining back to that ? Did n't I arrive 
at a conclusion long ago ? Did n't I tell you she was 
a delightful girl?" 

" Do you call that a conclusion ? The first comer 
could tell me that at the end of an hour." 

" Do you want me to invent something different ? " 
Bernard asked. " I can't invent anything better." 

"I don't want you to invent anytliing. I only 
want you to observe her — to study her in complete 
independence. You will have her to yourself — my 
absence will leave you at liberty. Hang it, sir," 
Gordon declared, " I should think you would like it ! " 

" Damn it, sir, you 're delicious ! " Bernard answered; 
and he broke into an irrepressible laugh. "I don't 
suppose it 's for my pleasure that you suggest the 
arrangement." 

Grordon took a turn about the room again. 

" No, it 's for mine. At least, it 's for my benefit" 

« For your benefit ? " 

" I have got all sorts of ideas — I told you the other 
day. They are all mixed up together and I want a 
fresh impression." 

" My impressions are never fresh," Bernard replied. 

" They would be if you had a little good- will — if 
you entered a little into my dilemma." The note of 
reproach was so distinct in these words that Bernard 
stood staring. " You never take anything seriously," 
his companion went on. 



 103 

Bernard tried to answer as seriously as possible. 

" Your dilemma seems to me of all dilemmas the 
strangest." 

"That may be; but different people take things 
differently. Don't you see," Gordon went on with a 
sudden outbreak of passion — " don't you see that I 
am horribly divided in mind ? I care immensely for 
Angela Vivian — and yet — and yet — I am afraid of 
her." 

"Afraid of her?" 

" I am afraid she *s cleverer than I — that she would 
be a difficult wife ; that she might do strange things." 

*' What sort of things ? " • 

" Well, that she might flirt, for instance." 

" That 's not a thing for a man to fear." 

** Not when he supposes his wife to be fond of him 
— no. But I don't suppose that — I have given that 
up. If I should induce Angela Vivian to accept me 
she would do it on grounds purely reasonable. She 
would think it best, simply. That would give her a 
chance to repent." 

Bernard sat for some time looking at his friend. 

" You say she is cleverer than you. It 's impossible 
to be cleverer than you." 

" Oh, come, Longueville I" said Gordon, angrily. 

" I am speaking very seriously. You have done a 
remarkably clever thing. You have impressed me 
with the reality, and with — what shall I term it ? — 



104  

the estimable character of what you call your dilemma 
Now this fresh impression of mine — what do you pro- 
pose to do with it when you get it ? " 

" Such things are always useful It will be a good 
thing to have." 

"I am much obliged to you ; but do you propose to 
let anything depend upon it ? Do you propose to take 
or to leave Miss Vivian — that is, to return to the 
charge or to give up trying — in consequence of my 
fresh impression ? " 

Gordon seemed perfectly unembarrassed by this 
question, in spite of the ironical light which it pro- 
jected upon his sentimental perplexity. 

" I propose to do what I choose ! " he said. 

"That's a relief to me," Bernard rejoined. "This 
idea of yours is, after all, only the play of the scien- 
tific mind." ' 

" I shall contradict you flat if I choose," Gordon 
went on. 

" Ah, it *s well to warn me of that," said Bernard, 
laughing. " Even the most sincere judgment in the 
world likes to be notified a little of the danger of 
being contradicted." 

" Is yours the most sincere judgment in the world ? " 
Gordon demanded. 

" That 's a very pertinent question. Does n't it occur 
to you that you may have reason to be jealous — leav- 
ing me alone, with an open field, with the woman of 
your choice ? " 



 105 

^I wish to heaven I could be jealous T' Gordon 
exclaimed. "That would simplify the thing — that 
would give me a lift" 

And the next day, after some more talk, it seemed 
really with a hope of this contingency — though, 
indeed^ he laughed about it — that he started for 
England. 



XL 

For the three or four days that followed Gordon 
Wright's departure, Bernard saw nothing of the 
ladies who had been committed to his charge. They 
chose to remain in seclusion, and he was at liberty to 
interpret this fact as an expression of regret at the 
loss of Gordon's good offices. He knew other people 
at Baden, and he went to see thenv and endeavored, 
by cultivating their society, to await in patience the 
re-appearance of Mi-s. Vivian and her companions. 
But on the fourth day he became conscious that other 
people were much less interesting than the trio of 
American ladies who had lodgings above the confec- 
tioner's, and he made bold to go and knock at their 
door. He had been asked to take care of them, and 
this function presupposed contact. He had met Cap- 
tain Lovelock the day before, wandering about with 
a rather crest-fallen aspect, and the young English- 
man had questioned him eagerly as to the where- 
abouts of Mrs. Vivian. 

" Gad, I believe they 've left the place — left the 
place without giving, a fellow warning ! " cried Love- 
lock. 



 107 

" Oh no, I think they are here still," said Bernard. 
"My friend Wright has gone away for a week or 
two, but I suspect the ladies are simply staying at 
home." 

" Gad, I was afraid your friend Wright had taken 
them away with him ; he seems to keep them all in 
his pocket. I was afraid he had given them marching 
orders ; they 'd have been sure to go — they 're so 
awfully fond of his pocket 1 I went to look them up 
yesterday — upon my word I did. They live at a 
baker's in a little back-street ; people do live in rum 
places when they come abroad ! But I assure you, 
when I got ther^ I 'm damned if I could make out 
whether they were there or not. I don't speak a 
word of German, and there was no one there but the 
baker's wife. She was a low brute of a woman — 
she could n't understand a word I said, though she 
gave me plenty of her own tongue. I had to give it 
up. They were not at home, but whether they had 
left Baden or not — that was beyond my finding out. 
If they are here, why the deuce don't they show ? 
Fancy coming to Baden-Baden to sit moping at a 
pastry-cook's ! " 

Captain Lovelock was evidently irritated, and it 
was Bernard's impression that the turn of luck over 
yonder where the gold-pieces were chinking had some- 
thing to do with the state of his temper. But more 
fortunate himself^ he ascertained from the baker's 



108  

wife that though Mrs. Vivian and her daughter had 
gone out, their companion, " the youngest lady — the 
little young lady " — was above in the sitting-room. 

Blanche Evers was sitting at the window with a 
book, but she relinquished the volume with an alacrity 
that showed it had not been absorbing, and began to 
chatter with her customary frankness. 

" Well, I must say I am glad to see some one ! *' 
cried the young girl, passing before the mirror and 
giving a touch to her charming tresses. 

" Even if it 's only me," Bernard exclaimed, laugh- 
ing. 

" I did n't mean that I am sure I am very glad to 
see you-— I should think you would have found out 
that by this time. I mean I 'm glad to see any one 
— especially a man. I suppose it 's improper for me 
to say that — especially to you ! There ^you see I 
do think more of you than of some gentlemen. Why 
especially to you? Well, because 'you always seem 
to me to want to take advantage. I did n't say a base 
advantage ; I did n't accuse you of anything dreadful 
I *m sure I want to take advantage, too — I take it 
whenever I can. You see I take advantage of your 
being here — I 've got so many things to say. I 
have n't spoken a word in three days, and I 'm sure it 
is a pleasant change — a gentleman's visit All of a 
sudden we have gone into mourning ; I 'm sure I 
don't know who 's dead. Is it Mr. Gordon Wright f 



 109 

It's some idea of Mrs. Vivian's — I'm sure it isn't 
mine. She thinks we have been often enough to the 
KursaaL I don't know whether she thinks it 's 
wicked, or what. If it 's wicked the harm 's already 
done ; I can't be any worse than I am now. I have 
seen all the improper people and I have learnt all 
their names: Captain Lovelock has told me their 
names, plenty of times. I don't see what good it 
• does me to be shur up here with all those names 
running in my ears. I must say I do prefer society. 
We haven't been to the Kursaal for four days — we 
have only gone out for a drive. We have taken the 
most interminable drives. I do believe we have seen 
every old ruin in the whole country. Mrs. Vivian and 
Angela are so awfully fond of scenery — they talk 
about it by the half-hour. They talk about the moun- 
tains and trees as if they were people they knew — as 
if they were gentlemen ! I mean as if the mountains 
and trees were gentlemen. Of course scenery 's lovely, 
but you can't walk about with a tree. At any rate, 
that has been all our society — foliage ! Foliage and 
women ; but I suppose women are a sort of foliage. 
They are always rustling about and dropping ofif. 
That 's why I could n't make up my mind to go out 
with them this afternoon. They 've gone to see the 
Waterworths — the Waterworths arrived yesterday 
and are staying at some hotel Five daughters — aU 
unmarried ! I don't know what kind of foliage they 



110  

are ; some peculiar kind — they don't drop off. I 
thought I had had about enough ladies* society — 
three women all sticking together ! I don't think it 's 
good for a young girl to have nothing but ladies' so- 
ciety — it 's so awfully limited. I suppose I ought to 
stand up for my own sex and tell you that when we 
are alone together we want for nothing. But we 
want for everything, as it happens ! Women's talk 
is limited — every one knows that. That 's just what 
mamma did n't want when she asked Mrs. Vivian to 
take charge of me. Now, Mr. Longueville, what are 
you laughing at ? — you are always laughing at me; 
She wanted me to be unlimited — is that what you 
say ? Well, she did n't want me to be narrowed down ; 
she wanted me to have plenty of conversation. She 
wanted me to be fitted for society — that's what 
mamma wanted. She wanted me to have ease of 
manner ; she thinks that if you don't acquire it when 
you are young you never have it at alL She was so 
happy to think I should come to Baden ; but she 
would n't approve of the life I *ve been leading the 
last four days. That's no way to acquire ease of 
manner — sitting all day in a small parlor with two 
persons of one's own sex ! Of course Mrs. Vivian's 
influence — that's the great thing. Mamma said it 
was like the odor of a flower. But you don't want to 
keep smelling a flower all day, even the sweetest; 
that 's the shortest way to get a headache. Apropos 



 Ill 

of flowers, do you happen to have heard whether Cap- 
tain Lovelock is alive or dead ? Do I call him a 
flower ? No ; I call him a flower-pot. He always 
has some fine young plant in his button-hole. He 
has n't been near me these ten years — I never heard 
of anything so rude ! " 

Captain Lovelock came on the morrow, Bernard 
finding him in Mrs. Vivian's little sitting-room on 
paying a second visit. On this occasion the two 
other ladies were at home and Bernard was not ex- 
clusively indebted to Miss Evers for entertainment 
It was to this source of hospitality, however, that 
Lovelock mainly appealed, following the young girl 
out upon the little balcony that was suspended above 
the confectioner's window. Mrs. Vivian sat writing 
at one of the windows of the sitting-room, and Bernard 
addressed his conversation to Angela. 

" Wright requested me to keep an eye on you," he 
said; "but you seem very much inclined to keep out 
of my jurisdiction." 

*' I supposed you had gone away," she answered — 
** now that your friend is gone." 

" By no means. Gordon is a charming fellow, but 
he is by no means the only attraction of Baden. 
Besides, I have promised him to look after you — to 
take care of you." 

The girl looked at him a moment in silence — a 
little askance.' 



112  

" I thought you had probably undertaken something 
of that sort," she presently said. 

" It was of course a very natural request for Gordon 
to make." 

Angela got up and turned away ; she wandered 
about the room and went and stood at one of the 
windows. Bernard found the movement abrupt and 
not particularly gracious ; but the young man was not 
easy to snub. He followed her, and they stood at the 
second window — the long window that opened upon 
the balcony. Miss Evers and Captain Lovelock were 
leaning on the railing, looking into the street and 
apparently amusing themselves highly with what they 
saw. 

" I am not sure it was a natural request for him to 
make," said Angela. 

" What could have been more so — devoted as he 
is to you ? " 

She hesitated a moment ; then with a little laugh — 

" He ought to have locked us up and said nothing 
about it" 

" It 's not so easy to lock you up," said Bernard. *' I 
know Wright has great influence with you, but you 
are after all independent beings." 

" I am not an independent being. If my mother 
and Mr. Wright were to agree together to put me out 
of harm's way they could easily manage it" 

" You seem to have been trying something of that 



 113 

sort," said Bernard "You have been so terribly 
invisible." 

" It was because I thought you had designs upon 
us;- that you were watching for us — to take care 
of us." 

" You contradict yourself! You said just now that ^ 
you believed I had left Baden." 

"That was an artificial — a conventional speech. 
Is n't a lady always supposed to say something of that 
sort to a visitor by way of pretending to have noticed 
that she has not seen him ? " 

" You know I would never have left Baden without 
coming to bid you good-bye," said Bernard. 

The girl made no rejoinder ; she stood looking out 
at the little sunny, slanting, rough-paved German 
street 

" Are you taking care of us now ? " she asked in a 
moment. "Has the operation begun? Have you 
heard the news, mamma ? " she went on. " Do you 
know that Mr. Wright has made us over to Mr. 
Longueville, to be kept till called for ? Suppose Mr. 
Wright. should never call for us ! " 

Mi's. Vivian left her writing-table and came toward 
Bernard, smiling at him and pressing her hands to- 
gether. 

" There is no fear of that, I think," she said. " I 

am sure I am very glad we have a gentleman near 

us. I think you wiU be a very good care-taker, Mr. 

8 



114  

Longueville, and I recommend my daughter to put 
great faith in your judgment." And Mrs. Vivian 
gave him an intense — a pleading, almost affecting 
— little smile. 

" I am greatly touched by your confidence and I 
shall do everything I can think of to merit it," said 
the young man. 

" Ah, mamma's confidence is wonderful ! " Angela 
exclaimed. " There was never anything like mamma's 
confidence. I am very diflferent ; I have no confidence. 
And then I don't like being deposited, like a parcel, 
or being watched, like a curious animal. I am too 
fond of my liberty." 

"That is the second time you have contradicted 
yourself," said Bernard. "You said just now that 
you "were not an independent being." 

Angela turned toward him quickly, smiling and 
frowning at once. 

" You do watch one, certainly ! I see it has already 
begun." Mrs. Vivian laid her hand upon her daugh- 
ter's with a little murmur of tender deprecation, and 
the girl bent over and kissed her. " Mamma will tell 
you it 's the effect of agitation," she said — " that I am 
nervous, and don't know what I say. I am supposed 
to be agitated by Mr. Wright's departure ; is n't that 
it, mamma ? " 

Mrs. Vivian turned away, with a certain soft 
severity. 



 115 

" I don't know, my daughter. I don't understand 
you." 

A charming pink flush had come into Angela's 
cheek and a noticeable light into her eye. She 
looked admirably handsome, and Bernard frankly 
gazed at her. She met his gaze an instant, and 
then she went on. 

"Mr. Longueville doesn't understand me either. 
You must know that I am agitated," she continued. 
"Every now and then I have moments of talking 
nonsensjB. It 's the air of Baden, I think ; it 's too 
exciting. It 's only lately I have been so. When 
you go away I shall be horribly ashamed." 

" If the air of Baden has such an effect upon you," 
said Bernard, " it is only a proof the more that you 
need the solicitous attention of your friends." 

*' That may be ; but, as I told you just now, I have 
no confidence — none whatever, in any one or any- 
thing. Therefore, for the present, I shall withdraw 
from the world — I shall seclude myself. Let us go 
on being quiet, mamma. Three or four days of it 
have been so charming. Let the parcel lie till it 's 
called for. It is much safer it should n't be touched 
at all. I shall assume that, metaphorically speaking, 
Mr. Wright, who, as you have intimated, is our earthly 
providence, has turned the key upon us. I am locked 
up. I shall not go out, except upon the balcony 1 " 
And with this, Angela stepped out of the long win- 
dow and went and stood beside Miss Evers. 



116  

Bernard was extremely amused, but lie was also a 
good deal puzzled, and it came over him that it was 
not a wonder that poor Wright should not have found 
this young lady's disposition a perfectly decipherable 
page. He remained in the room with Mrs. Vivian 

— he stood there looking at her with his agreeably 
mystified smile. She had turned away, but on per- 
ceiving that her daughter had gone outside she came 
toward Bernard again, with her habitual little air of 
eagerness mitigated by discretion. There instantly 
rose before his mind the vision of that moment when 
he had stood face to face with this same apologetic 
mamma, after Angela had turned her back, on the 
grass-grown termce at Siena. To make the vision 
complete, Mrs. Vivian took it into her head to utter 
the same words. 

" I am sure you think she is a strange girl" 
Bernard recognized them, and he gave a light laugh. 
" You told me that the first time you ever saw me 

— in that quiet little corner of an Italian town." 
Mrs. Vivian gave a little faded, elderly blush. 

" Don't speak of that," she murmured, glancing at 
the open window. " It was a little accident of travel." 

"I am dying to speak of it," said Bernard. "It 
was such a charming accident for me ! Tell me this, 
at least — have you kept my sketch ? " 

Mrs. Vivian colored more deeply and glanced at 
the window again. 



 117 

" No," she just whispered. 

Bernard looked out of the window too. Angela 
was leaning against the failing of the balcony, in 
profile, just as she had stood while he painted her, 
against the polished parapet at Siena. The young 
man's eyes rested on her a moment, then, as he 
glanced back at her mother: 

" Has she kept it ? " he asked. 

" I don't know," said Mrs. Vivian, with decision. 

The decision was excessive — it expressed the poor 
lady's distress at having her veracity tested. " Dear 
little daughter of the Puritans — she can't tell a fib ! " 
Bernard exclaimed to himself. And with this flatter- 
ing conclusion he took leave of her. 



XII 

It was affirmed at an early stage of this narra- 
tive that he was a young man of a contemplative 
and speculative turn, and he had perhaps never 
been more true to his character than during an 
hour or two that evening as he sat by himself on 
the terrace of the Conversation-house, surrounded by 
the crowd of its frequenters, but lost in his medita- 
tions. The place was full of movement and sound, 
but he had tilted back his chair against the great 
green box of an orange-tree, and in this easy atti- 
tude, vaguely and agreeably conscious of the music, 
he directed his gaze to the star-sprinkled vault of the 
night. There were people coming and going whom 
he knew, but he said nothing to any one — he pre- 
ferred to be alone ; he found his own company quite 
absorbing. He felt very happy, very much amused, 
very curiously preoccupied. The feeling was a singular 
one. It partook of the nature of intellectual excite- 
ment. He had a sense of having received carte blanche 
for the expenditure of his wits. Bernard liked to feel 
his intelligence at play ; this is, perhaps, the highest 
luxury of a clever man. It played at present over 



 119 

the whole field of Angela Vivian's oddities of conduct 
— for, since his visit in the afternoon, J^emard had 
felt that the spectacle was considerably enlarged. He 
had come to feel, also, that poor Gordon's predica- 
ment was by no means an unnatural one. Longue- 
ville had begun to take his friend's dilemma very 
seriously indeed. The girl was certainly a curious 
study. 

The evening drew to a close and the crowd of 
Bernard's fellow-loungers dispersed. The lighted 
windows of the Kursaal still glittered in the bosky 
darkness, and' the lamps along the terrace had not 
been extinguished; but the great promenade was 
almost deserted; here and there only a lingering 
couple — the red tip of a cigar and the vague radi- 
ance of a light dress — gave animation to the place. 
But Bernard sat there still in his tilted chair, beneath 
his orange-tree ; his imagination had wandered very 
far and he was awaiting its return to the fold. He 
was on the point of rising, however, when he saw 
three figures come down the empty vista of the 
terrace — figures which even at a distance had a 
familiar air. He immediately left his seat and, 
taking a dozen steps, recognized Angela Vivian, 
Blanche Evers and Captain Lovelock. In a moment 
he met them in the middle of the terrace. 

Blanche immediately announced that they had 
come for a midnight walk. 



120  

"And if you think it's improper," she exclaimed, 
"it 's not my invention — it 's Miss Vivian's." 

" I beg pardon — it 's mine," said Captain Lovelock. 
"I desire the credit of it. I started the idea; you 
never would have come without me." 

" I think it would have been more proper to come 
without you than with you," Blanche declared. " You 
know you 're a dreadful character." 

"I 'm much worse when I 'm away from you than 
when I 'm with you," said Lovelock. "You keep me 
in order.^' 

The young girl gave a little cry. 

" I don't know .what you call order ! You can't be 
worse than you have been to-night." 

Angela was not listening to this ; she turned away 
a little, looking about at the empty garden. 

" This is the third time to-day that you have con- 
tradicted yourself," he said. Though he spoke softly 
he went nearer to her ; but she appeared not to hear 
him — she looked away. 

" You ought to have been there, Mr. LongueviUe," 
Blanche went on. " We have had a most lovely night ; 
we sat all the evening on Mrs. Vivian's balcony, eat- 
ing ices. To sit on a balcony, eating ices — that's 
my idea of heaven." 

" With an angel by your side," said Captain Love- 
lock. 

"You are not my idea of an angel," retorted Blanche. 



 121 

" I !m afraid you '11 never learn what the angels are 
really like," said the Captain. "That's why Miss 
Evers got Mrs. Vivian to take rooms over the baker's 
— so that she could have ices sent up several times 
a day. Well, I *m bound to say the baker's ices are 
not bad." 

"Considering that they have been baked! But 
they affect the mind," Blanche went on. "They 
would have affected Captain Lovelock's — only he 
has n't any. They certainly affected Angela's — put- 
ting it into her head, at eleven o'clock, to come out 
to walk." 

Angela did nothing whatever to defend herself 
against this ingenious sally ; she simply stood there 
in graceful abstraction. Bernard was vaguely vexed 
at her neither looking at him nor speaking to him ; 
her indifference seemed a contravention of that right 
of criticism which Gordon had bequeathed to him. 

" I supposed people went to bed at eleven o'clock," 
he said. 

Angela glanced about her, without meeting his eye. 

" They seem to have gone." 

Miss Evers strolled on, and her Captain of course 
kept pace with her ; so that Bernard and Miss Vivian 
were left standing together. He looked at her a 
moment in silence, but her eye still avoided his 
own. 

" You are remarkably inconsistent," Bernard pres- 



122 CONFIDENCE 

ently said "You take a solemn vow of seclusion 
this afternoon, and no sooner have you taken it 
than you proceed to break it in this outrageous 
manner/* 

She looked at him now — a long time — longer 
than she had ever done before. 

''This is part of the examination^ I suppose/' she 
said. 

Bernard hesitated an instant 

*' What examination ? " 

" The one you have undertaken — on Mr. Wright's 
behalf." 

" What do you know about that ? *' 

" Ah, you admit it then ? " the girl exclaimed, with 
an eager laugh. 

" I don't in the least admit it," said Bernard, con- 
scious only for the moment of the duty of loyalty to 
his friend and feeling that negation here was simply 
a point of honor. 

" " I trust more to my own conviction than to your 
denial You have engaged to bring your superior 
wisdom and your immense experience to bear upon 
me ! That 's the understanding/' 

"You must think us a pretty pair of wiseacres," 
said Bernard. 

"There it is — you already begin to answer for 
what I think. When Mr. Wright comes back you 
will be able to tell him that I am 'outrageous'!" 



 123 

And she turned away and walked on^ slowly follow* 
ing her companiona 

"What do you care what I tell him?" Bernard 
asked. " You don't care a straw." 

She said nothing for a moment, then, suddenly, she 
stopped again, dropping her eyes. 

"I beg your pardon," she said, very gently; "I 
care a great deal It 's as well that you should know 
that." 

Bernard stood looking at her ; her eyes were still 
lowered. 

" Do you know what I shall tell him ? I shall tell 
him that about eleven o'clock at night you become 
peculiarly attractive." 

She went on again a few steps ; Miss Evers and 
Captain Lovelock had turned round and were coming 
toward her. 

" It is very true that I am outrageous," she said ; 
" it was extremely silly and in very bad taste to come 
out at this hour. Mamma was not at all pleased, 
and I was very unkind to her. I only wanted to 
take a turn, and now we will go back." On the oth- 
ers coming up she announced this resolution, and 
though Captain Lovelock and his companion made a 
great outcry, she carried her point Bernard offered 
no opposition. He contented himself with walking 
back to her mother's lodging with her almost in 
silence. The little winding streets were stiU and 



124  

empty; there was no sound but the chatter and 
laughter of Blanche and her attendant swain. An- 
gela said nothing. 

This incident presented itself at first to Bernard's 
mind as a sort of declaration of war. The girl had 
guessed that she was to be made a subject of specu- 
lative scrutiny. The idea was not agreeable to her 
independent spirit, and she placed herself boldly on 
the defensive. She took her stand upon her right 
to defeat his purpose by every possible means — to 
perplex, elude, deceive him — in plain English, to 
make a fool of him. This was the construction 
which for several days Bernaid put upon her deport- 
ment, at the same time that he thought it immensely 
clever of her to have guessed what had been going 
on in his mind. She made him feel very much 
ashamed of his critical attitude, and he did every- 
thing he could think of to put her off her guard and 
persuade her that for the moment he had ceased to 
be an observer. His position at moments seemed 
to him an odious one, for he was firmly resolved that 
between him and the woman to whom his friend had 
proposed there should be nothing in the way of a 
vulgar flirtation. Under the circumstances, it sa- 
voured both of flirtation and of vulgarity that they 
should even fall out with each other — a consum- 
mation which appeared to be more or less definitely 
impending. Bernard remarked to himself that his 



 125 

own only reasonable line of conduct would be in- 
stantly to leave Baden, but I am almost ashamed to 
mention the fact which led him to modify this de- 
cision. It was simply that he was induced to make 
the reflection that he had really succeeded in putting 
Miss Vivian off her guard. How he had done so he 
would have found it difficult to explain, inasmuch as 
in one way or another, for a week, he had spent sev- 
eral hours in talk with her. The most effective way 
of putting her off her guard would have been to leave 
her alone, to forswear the privilege of conversation 
with her, to pass the days in other society. This 
course would have had the drawback of not enabling 
him to measure the operation of so ingenious a policy, 
and Bernard liked, of all the things in the world, to 
know when he was successful. He believed, at all 
events, that he was successful now, and that the 
virtue of his conversation itself had persuaded this 
keen and brilliant girl that he was thinking of any- 
thing in the world but herself. He flattered himself 
that the civil indifference of his manner, the abstract 
character of the topics he selected, the irrelevancy of 
his allusions and the laxity of his attention, all con- 
tributed to this result. 

Such a result was certainly a remarkable one, for 
it is almost superfluous to intimate that Miss Vivian 
was, in fact, perpetually in his thoughts. He made 
it a point of conscience not to think of her, but he 



126  

was thinking of her most when his conscience was 
most lively. Bernard had a conscience — a con- 
science which, though a little irregular in its mo- 
tions, gave itseK in the long run a great deal of 
exercise ; but nothing could have been more natural 
than that, curious, imaginative, audacious as he was, 
and delighting, as I have said, in the play of his sin- 
gularly nimble intelligence, he should have given 
himseK up to a sort of unconscious experimentation. 
" I will leave her alone — I will be hanged if I at- 
tempt to draw her out!" he said to himself; and 
meanwhile he was roaming afield and plucking per- 
sonal impressions in great fragrant handfuls. All 
this, as I say, was natural, given the man and the 
situation; the only oddity is that he should have 
fancied himself able to persuade the person most 
interested that he had renounced his advantage. 

He remembered her telling him that she cared 
very much what he should say of her on Gordon 
Wright's return, and he felt that this declaration 
had a particular significance. After this, of her own 
movement, she never spoke of Gordon, and Bernard 
made up his mind that she had promised her mother 
to accept him if he should repeat his proposal, and 
that as her heart was not in the matter she preferred 
to drop a veil over the prospect. ** She is going to 
marry him for his money," he said, "because her 
mother has brought out the advantages of the thing. 



 127 

Mrs. Vivian's persuasive powers have carried the 
day, and the girl has made herself beUeve that it 
does n*t matter that she does n't love him. Perhaps 
it does n't — to her; it's hard, in such a case, to 
put one's self in the woman's point of view. But I 
should think it would matter, soma day or other, to 
poor Gordon. She herself can't help suspecting it 
may make a difference iu his happiness, and she 
therefore does n't wish to seem any worse to him 
than is necessary. She wants me to speak well of 
her; if she intends to deceive him she expects me 
to back her up. The wish is doubtless natural, but 
for a proud girl it is rather an odd favor to ask. 
Oh yes, she 's a proud girl, even though she has 
been able to arrange it with her conscience to make 
a mercenary marriage. To expect me to help her 
is perhaps to treat me as a friend ; but she ought to 
remember — or at least I ought to remember — that 
Gordon is an older friend than she. Inviting me to 
help her as against my oldest friend — is n't there a 
grain of impudence in that ? " 

It will be gathered that Bernard's meditations were 
not on the whole favorable to this young lady, and it 
must be affirmed that he was forcibly struck with an 
element of cynicism in her conduct. On the evening 
of her so-called midnight visit to the Kursaal she 
had suddenly soimded a note of sweet submissiveness 
which re-appeared again at frequent intervals. She 



128  

was gentle, accessible, tenderly gracious, expressive, 
demonstrative, almost flattering. From his own per- 
sonal point of view Bernard had no complaint to 
make of this maidenly urbanity, but he kept remind- 
ing himself that he was not in question and that 
everything must be looked at in the light of Gordon's 
requirements. There was all this time an absurd 
logical twist in his view of things. In the first place 
he was not to judge at all ; and in the second he was 
to judge strictly on Gordon's behalf. This latter 
clause always served as a justification when 'the 
former had failed to serve as a deterrent. When 
Bernard reproached himself for thinking too much of 
the girl, he drew comfort from the reflection that he 
was not thinking well. To let it gradually filter into 
one's mind, through a superficial complexity of more 
reverent preconceptions, that she was an extremely 
clever coquette — this, surely, was not to think well ! 
Bernard had luminous glimpses of another situation, 
in which Angela Vivian's coquetry should meet with 
a different appreciation ; but just now it was not an 
item to be entered on the credit side of Wright's 
account. Bernard wiped his pen, mentally speaking, 
as he made this reflection, and felt like a grizzled old 
book-keeper, of incorruptible probity. He saw her, 
as I have said, very often ; she continued to break 
her vow of shutting herself up, and at the end of a 
fortnight she had reduced it to imperceptible par- 



 129 

tides. On four diflferent occasions, presenting him- 
self at Mrs. Vivian's lodgings, Bernard found Angela 
there alone. She made him welcome, receiving him 
as an American girl, in such circumstances, is free to 
receive the most gallant of visitors. She smiled and 
talked and gave herself up to charming gayety, so 
that there was nothing for Bernard to say but that 
now at least she was off her guard with a vengeance. 
Happily he was on his own ! He flattered himself 
that he remained so on occasions that were even 
more insidiously relaxing — when, in the evening, 
she strolled away with him to parts of the grounds 
of the Conversation-house, where the music sank to 
sweeter softness and the murmur of the tree-tops of 
the Black Forest, stirred by the warm night-air, be- 
came almost audible; or when, in the long afternoons, 
they wandered in the woods apart from the others — 
from Mrs. Vivian and the amiable object of her more 
avowed solicitude, the object of the sportive adora- 
tion of the irrepressible, the ever-present Ijovelock. 
They were constantly having parties in the woods at 
this time — driving over the hills to points of interest 
which Bernard had looked out in the guide-book. 
Bernard, in such matters, was extremely alert and 
considerate; he developed an unexpected talent for 
arranging excursions, and he had taken regularly into 
his service the red-waistcoated proprietor of a big 
Teutonic landau, which had a courier's seat behind 

9 



130  

and was always at the service of- the ladies. The 
functionaiy in the red waistcoat was a capital chari- 
^■. ht^ coMt^tly proposing new «ve. .ad 
he introduced our little party to treasures of romantic 
scenery. 



XIII. 

More than a fortiiight had elapsed, but Gordon 
Wright had not re-appeared, and Bernard suddenly 
decided that he would leave Baden. He found Mrs. 
Vivian and her daughter, very opportunely, in the 
garden of the pleasant, homely Schloss which forms 
the residence of the Grand Dukes of Baden during 
their visits to the scene of our narrative, and which, 
perched upon the hill-side directly above the little 
town, is surrounded with charming old shrubberies' 
and terraces. To this garden a portion of the public 
is admitted, and Bernard, who liked the place, had 
been there more than once. One of the terraces had 
a high parapet, against which Angela was leaning, 
looking across the valley. Mrs. Vivian was not at 
first in sight, but Bernard presently perceived her 
seated under a tree with Victor Cousin in her hand. 
As Bernard approached the young girl, Angela, who 
had not seen him, turned round. 

"Don't move," he said. "You were just in the 
position in which I painted your portrait at Siena.'* 

" Don't speak of that," she answered. 

"I have never understood," said Bernard, "why 
you insist upon ignoring that charming incident." 



132  

She resumed for a moment her former position, 
and stood looking at the opposite hills. 

"That's just how you were — in profile — with 
your head a little thrown back." 

"It was an odious incident!" Angela exclaimed, 
rapidly changing her attitude. 

Bernard was on the point of making a rejoinder, 
but he thought of Gordon Wright and held his 
tongue. He presently told her that he intended to 
leave Baden on the morrow. 

They were walking toward her mother. She looked 
round at him quickly. . 

" Where are you going ? " 

"To Paris," he said, quite at hazard; for he bad 
not in the least determined where to go. 

" To Paris — in the month of August ? " And she 
gave a little laugh. " What a happy inspiration ! " 

She gave a little laugh, but she said nothing more, 
and Bernard gave no further account of his plan. 
They went and sat down near Mrs. Vivian for ten 
minutes, and then they got up again and strolled to 
another part of the garden. They had it all to them- 
selves, and it was filled with things that Bernard 
liked — inequalities of level, with mossy steps con- 
necting them, rose-trees trained upon old brick walls, 
horizontal trellises arranged like Italian pergolas, and 
here and there a towering poplar, looking as if it 
had survived from some more primitive stage of cul- 



 133 

ture, with its stiff boughs motionless and its leaves 
forever trembling. They made almost the whole 
circuit of the garden, and then Angela mentioned 
very quietly that she had heard that morning from 
Mr. Wright, and that he would not return for another 
week. 

" You had better stay," she presently added, as if 
Gordon's continued absence were an added reason. 

" I don't know," said Bernard. " It is sometimes 
difficult to say what one had better do." 

I hesitate to bring against him that most inglorious 
of all charges, an accusation of sentimental fatuity, 
of the disposition to invent obstacles to enjoyment 
so that he might have the pleasure of seeing a pretty 
girl attempt to remove them. But it must be ad- 
mitted that if Bernard really thought at present that 
he had better leave Baden, the observation I have 
just quoted was not so much a sign of this conviction 
as of the hope that his companion would proceed to 
gainsay it. The hope was not disappointed, though 
I must add that no sooner had it been gratified than 
Bernard began to feel ashamed of it. 

"This certainly is not one of those cases," said 
Angela. " The thing is surely very simple now." 

"What makes it so simple ?" 

She hesitated a moment 

" The fact that I ask you to stay." 

"You ask me ?" he repeated, softly. 



134  

"Ah," she exclaimed, "one does n't say those things 
twice ! " 

She turned away, and they went back to her 
mother, who gave Beruard a wonderful little look of 
half urgent, half remonstrant inquiry. As they left 
the garden he walked beside Mrs. Vivian, Angela 
going in front of them at a distance. The elder lady 
began immediately to talk to him of Gordon Wright. 

"He's not coming back for another week, you 
know," she said. " I am sorry he stays away so long." 

" Ah yes," Bernard answered, " it seems very long 
indeed." 

And it had, in fact, seemed to him very long. 

" I suppose he is always likely to have business," 
said Mrs. Vivian. 

" You may be very sure it is not for his pleasure 
that he Stays away." 

" I know he is faithful to old friends," said Mrs. 
Vivian. " I am sure he has not forgotten us." 

" I certainly count upon that," Bernard exclaimed 
— " remembering him as we do ! " 

Mrs. Vivian glanced at him gratefully. 

" Oh yes, we remember him — we remember him 
daily, hourly. At least, I can speak for my daughter 
and myself. He has been so very kind to us." Ber- 
nard said nothing, and she went on. " And you have 
been so very kind to us, too, Mr. Longueville. I 
want so much to thank you." 



 135 



"Oh no, don't!" said Bernard, frowning. "I 
would rather you should n't." 

" Of course," Mrs. Vivian added, " I know it 's all 
on his account ; but that makes me wish to thank 
you aU the more. Let me express my gratitude, in 
advance, for the rest of the time, till he comes back. 
That 's more responsibility than you bargained for," 
she said, with a little nervous laugh. 

" Yes, it 's more than I bargained for. I am think- 
ing of going away." 

Mrs. Vivian almost gave a little jump, and then 
she paused on the Baden cobble-stones, looking up at 
him. 

" If you must go, Mr. Longueville — don't sacrifice 
yourself!" 

The exclamation fell upon Bernard's ear with a 
certain softly mocking cadence which was sufficient, 
however, to make this organ tingle. 

" Oh, after all, you know," he said, as they walked 
on — "after all, you know, I am not like Wright — 
I have no business." 

He walked with the ladies to the door of their 
lodging. Angela kept always in front. She stood 
there, however, at the little confectioner's window 
until the others came up. She let her mother pass 
in, and then she said to Bernard, looking at him — 

" Shall I see you again ? " 

" Some time, I hope." 



136  

" I mean — are you going away ? " 

Bernard looked for a moment at a little pink sugar 
cherub — a species of Cupid, with a gilded bow — 
which figured among the pastry-cook's enticements. 
Then he said — 

" I will come and tell you this evening." 

And in the evening he went to tell her ; she had 
mentioned during the walk in the garden of the 
Schloss that they should not go out. As he ap- 
proached Mrs. Vivian's door he saw a figure in a 
light dress standing in the little balcony. He stopped 
and looked up, and then the person in the light dress, 
leaning her hands on the railing, with her shoulders 
a little raised, bent over and looked down at him. It 
was very dark, but even through the thick dusk he 
thought he perceived the finest biilliancy of Angela 
Vivian's smile. 

" I shall not go away," he said, lifting his voice a 

Httle. 

She made no answer ; she only stood looking down 
at him through the warm dusk and smiling. He 
went into the house, and he remained at Baden-Baden 
till Gordon came back. 



XIV. 

Gordon asked him no questions for twenty-four 
hours after his return, then suddenly he began : 

" Well, have n't you something to say to me ? " 

It was at the hotel, in Gordon's apartment, late in 
the afternoon. A heavy thunder-storm had broken 
over the place an hour before, and Bernard had been 
standing at one of his friend's windows, rather idly, 
with his hands in his pockets, watching the rain- 
torrents dance upon the empty pavements. At last 
the deluge abated, the clouds began to break — there 
was a promise of a fine evening. Gordon Wright, 
while the storm was at its climax, sat down to write 
letters, and wrote half a dozen. It was after he had 
sealed, directed and aflBxed a postage-stamp to the 
last of the series that he addressed to his companion 
the question I have just quoted. 

"Do you mean about Miss Vivian?" Bernard 
asked, without turning round from the window. 

"About Miss Vivian, of course." Bernard said 
nothing and his companion went on. "Have you 
nothing to tell me about Miss Vivian ? " 

Bernard presently turned round looking at Gordon 
and smiling a little. 



138  

ft 

" She 's a delightful creature ! " 

"That won't do — you have tried that before," said 
Gordon. " No," he added in a moment, " that won't 
do." Bernard turned back to the window, and Gor- 
don continued, as he remained silent. " I shall have 
a right to consider your saying nothing a proof of an 
unfavorable judgment. You don't like her ! " 

Bernard faced quickly about again, and for an 
instant the two men looked at each other. 

" Ah, my dear Gordon^'* Longueville murmured. 

" j9o you like her then?" asked Wright, getting up. 

" No ! " said Longueville. 

" That 's just what I wanted to know, and I am 
much obliged to you for telling me." 

" I am not obliged to you for asking me. I was in 
hopes you would n't." 

" You dislike her very much then ? " Gordon ex- 
claimed, gravely. 

" Won't disliking her, simply, do ? " said Bernard. 

"It will do very well. But it will do a little 
better if you will tell me why. Give me a reason or 
two." 

" Well," said Bernard, " I tried to make love to her 
and she boxed my ears." 

" The devil ! " cried Gordoa 

" I mean morally, you know." 

Goi*don stared ; he seemed a little puzzled. 

*' You tried to make love to her morally ? " 



 139 

" She boxed my ears morallf ," said Bernard, laugh- 
ing out. 

" Why did you try to make love to her ? " 

This inquiry was made in a tone so expressive of 
an unbiassed truth-seeking habit that Bernard's mirth 
was not immediately quenched. Nevertheless, he re- 
plied with sufficient gravity — 

"To test her fidelity to you. Could you have 
expected anything else? You told me you were 
afraid she was a latent coquette. You gave me a 
chance, and I tried to ascertain." 

" And you found she was not. Is that what you 
mean ? " 

" She 's as firm as a rock. My dear Gordon, Miss 
Vivian is as firm as the firmest of your geological 
formations." 

Gordon shook his head with a strange positive 
persistence. 

*' You are talking nonsense. You are not serious. 
You are not telling me the truth. I don't believe 
that you attempted to make love to her. You 
wouldn't have played such a game as that. It 
wouldn't have been honorable." 

Bernard flushed a little ; he was irritated. 

"Oh come, don't make too much of a point of 
that ! Did n't you tell me before that it was a great 
opportunity ? " 

" An opportunity to be wise — not to be foolish ! " 



140  

" Ah, there is only One sort of opportunity," cried 
Bernard. "You exaggerate the reach of human 
wisdom." 

" Suppose she had let you make love to her," said 
Gordon. " That would have been a beautiful result 
of your experiment." 

" I should have seemed to you a rascal, perhaps, 
but I should have saved you from a latent coquette. 
You would owe some thanks for that." 

"And now you haven't saved me," said Gordon, 
with a simple air of noting a fact. 

" You assume — in spite of what I say — that she 
is a coquette ! " 

" I assume something because you evidently con- 
ceal something. I want the whole truth." 

Bernard turned back to the window with increasing 
irritation, 

" If he wants the whole truth he shall have it," he 
said to himself. 

He stood a moment in thought and then he looked 
at his companion again. 

" I think she would marry you — but I don't think 
she cares for you." 

Gordon turned a little pale, but he clapped his 
hands together. 

" Very good," he exclaimed. " That 's exactly how 
I want you to speak." 

" Her mother has taken a great fancy to your for- 



 141 

tune and it has rubbed off on the girl, who has made 
up her mind that it would be a pleasant thing to 
have thirty thousand a year, and that her not caring 
for you is an unimportant detail." 

" I see — I see," said Gordon, looking at his friend 
with an air of admiration for his frank and lucid way 
of putting things. 

Now that he had begun to be frank and lucid, 
Bernard found a charm in it, and the impulse under 
which he had spoken urged him almost violently 
forward. 

"The mother and daughter have agreed together 
to bag you, and Angela, I am sure, has made a vow 
to be as nice to you after marriage as possible. Mrs. 
Vivian has insisted upon the importance of that; 
Mrs. Vivian is a great moralist." 

Gordon kept gazing at his friend ; he seemed posi- 
tively fascinated. 

"Yes, I have noticed that in Mrs. Vivian," he 
said. 

" Ah, she 's a very nice woman ! " 

" It 's not true, then," said Gordon, " that you tried 
to make love to Angela ? " 

Bernard hesitated a single instant. 

*' No, it is n*t true. I calumniated myself, to save 
her reputation. You insisted on my giving you a 
reason for my not liking her — I gave you that one.** 

" And your real reason — " 



142  

" My real reason is that I believe she would do 
you what I can*t help regarding as an injury/' . 

" Of course ! " and Gordon, dropping his interested 
eyes, stared for some moments at the carpet " But 
it is n't true, then, that you discovered her to be a 
coquette?" 

" Ah, that *s another matter." 
" You did discover it all the same ? ** 
" Since you want the whole truth — I did ! " 
" How did you discover it ? " Gordon asked, cling- 
ing to his right of interrogation. 
Bernard hesitated. 

"You must remember that I saw a great deal of her." 
" You mean that she encouraged you ? " 
" If I had not been a very faithful friend I might 
have thought so." 

Gordon laid his hand appreciatively, gratefully, on 
Bernard's shoulder. 

" And even that did n't make you like her ? " 
"Confound it, you make me blush!" cried Ber- 
nard, blushing a little in fact. " 1 have said quite 
enough ; excuse me from drawing the portrait of too 
insensible a man. It was my point of view ; I kept 
thinking of you." 

Gordon, with his hand still on his friend's arm, 
patted it an instant in response to this declaration ; 
then he turned away. 

" I am much obliged to you. That 's my notion of 
friendship. You have spoken out like a man." 



 143 

''like a man, yes. Eemember thatw Not in the 
least like an oracle/* 

" I prefer an honest man to all the oracles," said 
Grordon. 

" An honest man has his impressions ! I have 
given you mine — they pretend to be nothing more. 
I hope they have n't offended you." 

« Not in the least" 

*'Nor distressed, nor depressed, nor in any way 
discomposed you ? " 

" For what do you take me ? I asked you a favor 
— a service ; I imposed it on you. You have done 
the thing, and my part is simple gratitude." 

"Thank you for nothing," said Bernard, smiling. 
" You have asked me a great many questions ; there 
is one that in turn I have a right to ask you. What 
do you propose to do in consequence of what I have 
told you ? " 

" I propose to do nothing." 

This declaration closed the colloquy, and the young 
men separated. Bernard saw Gordon no more that 
evening; he took for granted he had gone to Mrs. 
Vivian's. The burden of Longueville's confidences 
was a heavy load to carry there, but Bernard ven- 
tured to hope that he would deposit it at the door. 
He had given Gordon his impressions, and the latter 
might do with them what he chose — toss them out 
of the window, or let them grow stale with heedless 






144  

keeping. So Bernard meditated, as he wandered 
about alone for the rest of the evening. It was use- 
less to look for Mrs. Vivian's little circle, on the 
terrace of the Conversation-house, for the storm in the 
afternoon had made the place so damp that it was 
almost forsaken of its frequenters. Bernard spent 
the evening in the gaming-rooms, in the thick of the 
crowd that pressed about the tables, and by way of a 
change — ■ he had hitherto been almost nothing of a 
gambler — he laid down a couple of pieces at roulette. 
He had played but two or three times, without win- 
ning a penny ; but now he had the agreeable sensa- 
tion of drawing in a small handful of gold. He 
continued to play, and he continued to win. His 
luck surprised and excited him — so much so that 
after it had repeated itself half a dozen times he left 
the place and walked about for half an hour in the 
outer darkness. He felt amused and exhilarated, but 
the feeling amounted almost to agitation. He, never- 
theless, returned to the tables, where he again found 
success awaiting him. Again and again he put his 
money on a happy number, and so steady a run of 
luck began at last to attract attention. The rumor 
of it spread through the rooms, and the crowd about 
the roulette received a large contingent of spectators. 
Bernard felt that they were looking more or less 
eagerly for a turn of the tide; but he was in the 
humor for disappointing them, and he left the place. 



 145 

while his luck was still running high, with ten 
thousand francs in his pocket It was very late 
when he returned to the inn — so late that he for- 
bore to knock at Gordon's door. But though he 
betook himself to his own quarters, he was far from 
finding, or even seeking, immediate rest. He knocked 
about, as he would have said, for half the night — 
not because he was delighted at having won ten 
thousand francs, but rather because all of a sudden 
he found himself disgusted at the manner in which 
he had spent the evening. It was extremely char- 
acteristic of Bernard Longueville that his pleasure 
should suddenly transform itself into flatness. What 
he felt was not regret or repentance. He had it not 
in the least on his conscience that he had given 
countenance to the reprehensible practice of gaming. 
It was annoyance that he had passed out of his own 
control — that he had obeyed a force which he was 
unable to measure at the time. He had been drunk 
and he was turning sober. In spite of a great mo- 
mentary appearance of frankness and a lively relish 
of any conjunction of agreeable circumstances exert- 
ing a pressure to which one could respond, Bernard 
had really little taste for giving himself up, and he 
never did so without very soon wishing to take him- 
self back. He had now given himself to something 
that was not himself, and the fact that he had gained 
ten thousand francs by it was an insufficient salve to 

10 



146  

an aching sense of having ceased to be his own 
master. He had not been playing — he had been 
played with. He had been the sport of a blind, 
brutal chance, and he felt humiliated by having been 
favored by so rudely-operating a divinity. Good 
luck and bad luck ? Bernard felt very scornful of 
the distinction, save that good luck seemed to him* 
rather the more vidgar. As the night went on his 
disgust deepened, and at last the weariness it brought 
with it sent him to sleep. He slept very late, and 
woke up to a disagreeable consciousness. At first, 
before collecting his thoughts, he could not imagine 
what he had on his mind — was it that he had spoken 
ill of Angela Vivian ? It brought him extraordinary 
relief to remember that he had gone to bed in extreme 
ill-humor with his exploits at roulette. After he had 
dressed himself and just as he was leaving his room, 
a servant brought him a note superscribed in Gror- 
don's hand — a note of which the following proved to 
be the contents. 

" Seven o'clock, A. M. 
'' Mt dear Bernard : Circumstances have determined me 
to leave Baden immediately, and I shall take the train that 
starts an hour hence. I am told that you came in very late 
last night, so I won't disturb you for a painful parting at this 
unnatural hour. I came to this decision last evening, and I 
put up my things ; so I have nothing to do but to take my- 
self off. I shall go to Basel, but after that I don't know where, 
and in so comfortless an uncertainty I don't ask you to follow 



 147 

me. Perhaps I shall go to America ; but in any case I shall 
see you sooner or later. Meanwhile, my dear Bernard, be as 
happy as your brilliant talents should properly make you, and 
believe me yours ever, G. W. 

** P. S. It is perhaps as well that I should say that I am 
leaving in consequence of something that happened last even- 
ing, but not — by any traceable process — in consequence of 
the talk we had together. I may also add that I am in very 
good health and spirits." 

Bernard lost no time in learning that his friend 
had in fact departed by the eight o'clock train — the 
morning was now well advanced ; and then, over his 
breakfast, he gave himself up to meditative surprise. 
What had happened during the evening — what had 
happened after their conversation in Gordon's room ? 
He had gone to Mrs. Vivian's — what had happened 
there ? Bernard found it difficult to believe that he 
had gone there simply to notify her that, having 
talked it over with an intimate friend, he gave up her 
daughter, or to mention to the young lady herself 
that he had ceased to desire the honor of her hand. 
Gordon alluded to some definite occurrence, yet it 
was inconceivable that he should have allowed him- 
self to be determined by Bernard's words — his diffi- 
dent and irresponsible impression. Bernard resented 
this idea as an injury to himself, yet it was difficult 
to imagine what else could have happened. There 
was Gordon's word for it, however, that there was no 
" traceable " connection between the circumstances 



148  

which led to his sudden departure and the informa- 
tion he had succeeded in extracting from his friend. 
What did he mean by a " traceable " connection ? 
Gordon never used words idly, and he meant to make 
of this point an intelligible distinction. It was this 
sense of his usual accuracy of expression that assisted 
Bernard in fitting a meaning to his late companion's 
letter. He intended to intimate that he had come 
back to Baden with his mind made up to relinquish 
his suit, and that he had questioned Bernard simply 
from moral curiosity — for the sake of intellectual 
satisfaction. Nothing was altered by the fact that 
Bernard had told him a sorry tale ; it had not modi- 
fied his behavior — that effect would have been trace- 
able. It had simply affected his imagination, which 
was a consequence of the imponderable sort. This 
view pf the case was supported by Gordon's mention 
of his good spirits. A man always had good spirits 
when he had acted in harmony with a conviction. 
Of. course, after renouncing the attempt to make 
himself acceptable to Miss Vivian, the only possible 
thing for Gordon had been to leave Baden. Bernard, 
continuing to meditate, at last convinced himself 
that there had been no explicit rupture, that Gordon's 
last visit had simply been a visit of farewell, that its 
character had sufficiently signified his withdrawal, 
and that he had now gone away because, after giving 
the girl up, he wished very naturally not to meet her 



 149 

again. This was, on Bernard's part, a sufficiently 
coherent view of the case ; but nevertheless, an hour 
afterward, as he strolled along the Lichtenthal 
Alley, he found himself stopping suddenly and 
exclaiming under his breath — "Have I done her 
an injury ? Have I afifected her prospects ? " Later 
in the day he said to himself half a dozen times 
that he had simply warned Gordon against an incon- 
gruous union. 



XV. 

Now that Gordon was gone, at any rate, gone for 
good, and not to return, he felt a sudden and singular 
sense of freedom. It was a feeling of unbounded 
expansion, quite out of proportion, as he said to him- 
self, to any assignable cause. Everything suddenly 
appeared to have become very optional ; but he was 
quite at a loss what to do with his liberty. It 
seemed a harmless use to make of it, in the afternoon, 
to go and pay another visit to the ladies who lived 
at the confectioner's. Here, however, he met a 
reception which introduced a fresh element of per- 
plexity into the situation that Gordon had left behind 
him. The door was opened to him by Mrs. Vivian's 
maid-servant, a sturdy daughter of the Schwartzwald, 
who informed him that the ladies — with much regret 
— were unable to receive any one. 

" They are. very busy — and they are ill," said the 
young woman, by way of explanation. 

Bernard was disappointed, and he felt like arguing 
the case. 

"Surely," he said, "they are not both ill and 
busy! When you make excuses, you should make 
them agree with each other." 



 151 

The Teutonic soubrette fixed her round blue eyes 
a minute upon the patch of blue sky revealed to 
her by her open door. 

** I say what I can, lieber Herr. It 's not my fault 
if I 'm not so clever as a French mamselL One of 
the ladies is busy, the other is ilL There you have 
it." 

" Not quite," said Bernard. " You must remember 
that there are three of them." 

" Oh, the little one -r— the little one wpeps." 

" Miss Evers weeps ! " exclaimed Bernard, to whom 
the vision of this young lady in tears had never pre- 
sented itself. 

** That happens to young ladies when they are un- 
happy," said the girl ; and with an artless yet signifi- 
cant smile she carried a big red hand to the left side 
of a broad bosom. 

"I am sorry she is unhappy; but which of the 
other ladies is ill ? " 

" The mother is very busy." 

" And the daughter is ill ? " 

The young woman looked at him an instant, smil- 
ing again, and the light in her little blue eyes indi- 
cated confusion, but not perversity. 

" No, the mamma is ill," she exclaimed, ** and the 
daughter is very busy. They ar§ preparing to leave 
Baden." 

" To leave Baden ? When do they go ? " 



152  

"I don't quite know, lieber Herr ; but very soon." 

With this information Bernard turned away. He 
was rather surprised, but he reflected that Mrs. 
Vivian had not proposed to spend her life on the 
banks of the Oos, and that people were leaving 
Baden every day in the year. In the evening, at the 
Kursaal, he met Captain Lovelock, who was wander- 
ing about with an air of explosive sadness. 

"Damn it, they're going — yes, they're going," 
said the Captain, after the two young men had ex- 
changed a few allusions to current events. " Fancy 
their leaving us in that heartless manner ! It 's not 
the time to run away — it's the time to keep your 
rooms, if you 're so lucky as to have any. The races 
begin next week and there '11 be a tremendous crowd. 
All the grand-ducal people are coming. Miss Evers 
wanted awfully to see the Grand Duke, and I prom- 
ised her an introduction. I can't make out what 
Mrs. Vivian is up to. I bet you a ten-pound note 
she 's giving chase. Our friend Wright has come 
back and gone off again, and Mrs. Vivian means to 
strike camp and follow. She '11 pot him yet ; you see 
if she does n't ! " 

" She is running away from you, dangerous man ! " 
said Bernard. 

" Do you mean on account of Miss Evers ? Well, 
I admire Miss Evers — I don't mind admitting that; 
but I ain't dangerous," said Captain Lovelock, with 



 153 

a lustreless eye. "How can a fellow be danger- 
ous when he has n't ten shillings in his pocket ? 
Desperation, do you caU it ? But Miss Evers has n't 
money, so far as I have heard. I don't ask you," 
Lovelock continued — "I don't care a damn whether 
she has or not. She 's a devilish charming girl, and 
I don't mind telling you I 'm hit. I stand no chance 

— I know I stand no chance. Mrs. Vivian 's down 

• 

on me, and, by Jove, Mrs. Vivian 's right. I 'm not 
the husband to pick out for a young woman of ex- 
pensive habits and no expectations. Gordon Wright 's 
the sort of young man that 's wanted, and, hang me, 
if Mrs. Vivian did n't want him so much for her own 
daughter, I believe she'd try and bag him for the 
little one. Gad, I believe that to keep me off she 
would like to cut him in two and give half to each 
of them ! I 'm afraid of that little woman. She has 
got a little voice like a screw-driver. But for all 
that, if I could get away from this cursed place, 
I would keep the girl in sight — hang me if I 
would n't ! I 'd cut the races — dash me if I would n't ! 
But I 'm in pawn, if you know what that means. I owe 
a beastly lot of money at the inn, and that impudent 
little beggar of a landlord won't let me out of his 
sight. The luck's dead against me at those filthy 
tables ; I have n't won a farthing in three weeks. I 
wrote to my brother the other day, and this morning 
I got an answer from him — a cursed, canting letter of 



154  

good advice, remarking that he had already paid my 
debts seven times. It does n't happen to be seven ; 
it 's only six, or six and a half! Does he expect me 
to spend the rest of my life at the H6tel de Hol- 
lande ? Perhaps he would like me to engage as 
a waiter there and pay it off by serving at the table 
d*h6te. It would be convenient for him the next 
time he comes abroad with his seven daughters and 
two governesses. I hate the smeU of their beastly 
table d'hfite ! You 're sorry I 'm hard up ? I 'm 
sure I 'm much obliged to you. Can you be of any 
service ? My dear fellow, if you are bent on throw- 
ing your money about the place I 'm not the man 
to stop you." Bernard's winnings of the previous 
night were burning a hole, as the phrase is, in his 
pocket. Ten thousand francs had never before 
seemed to him so heavy a load to carry, and to lighten 
the weight of his good luck by lending fifty pounds 
to a less fortunate fellow-player was an operation that 
not only gratified his good-nature but strongly com- 
mended itself to his conscience. His conscience, 
however, made its conditions. "My dear Longue- 
ville," Lovelock went on, "I have always gone in 
for family feeling, early cussociations, and all that 
sort of thing. That's what made me confide my 
difficulties to Dovedale. But, upon my honor, you 
remind me of the good Samaritan, or that sort of 
person ; you are fonder of me than my own brother ! 



 155 

• 

I *11 take fifty pounds with pleasure, thank you, and 
you shall have them again — at the earliest oppor- 
tunity. My earliest convenience — will that do? 
Damn it, it is a convenience, is n't it ? You make 
your conditions. My dear fellow, I accept them in 
advance. That I*m not to follow up Miss Evers — 
is that what you mean ? Have you been commis- 
sioned by the family to buy me ofif ? It 's devilish 
cruel to take advantage of my poverty ! Though 
I *m poor, I 'm honest. But I am honest, my dear 
Longueville; that's the point. I'll give you my 
word, and I'll keep it. I won't go near that girl 
again — I won't think of her till I 've got rid of your 
fifty pounds. It 's a dreadful encouragement to ex- 
travagance, but that 's your lookout. I *11 stop for 
their beastly races and the young lady shall be 
sacred." 

LongueviUe called the next morning at Mrs. 
Vivian's, and learned that the three ladies had left 
Baden by the early train, a couple of hours before. 
This fact produced in his mind a variety of emotions 
— surprise, annoyance, embarrassment. In spite of 
his effort to think it natural they should go, he found 
something precipitate and inexplicable in the manner 
of their going, and he declared to himself that one 
of the party, at least, had been unkind and ungracious 
in not giving him a chance to say good-bya He took 
refuge by anticipation, as it were, in this reflection. 



156  

• 

whenever, for the next three or four days, .he foresaw 
himself stopping short, as he had done before, and ask- 
ing himself whether he had done an injury to Angela 
Vivian. This was an idle and unpractical question, 
inasmuch as the answer was not forthcoming ; where- 
as it was quite simple and conclusive to say, without 
the note of interrogation, that she was, in spite of 
many attractive points, an abrupt and capricious 
young woman. During the three or four days in 
question, Bernard lingered on at Baden, uncertain 
what to do or where to go, feeling as if he had re- 
ceived a sudden check — a sort of spiritual snub — 
which arrested the accumulation of motive. Love- 
lock, also, whom Bernard saw every day, appeared to 
think that destiny had given him a slap in the face, 
for he had not enjoyed the satisfaction of a last inter- 
view with Miss Evers. 

" I thought she might have written me a note," said 
the Captain ; " but it appears she does n't write. Some 
girls don't write, you know." 

Bernard remarked that it was possible Lovelock 
would still have news of Miss Blanche ; and before 
he left Baden he learned that she had addressed her 
forsaken swain a charming little note from Lausanne, 
where the three ladies had paused in their flight from 
Baden, and where Mrs. Vivian had decreed that for 
the present they should remain. 

*' I 'm devilish glad she writes," said Captain Love- 
lock ; " some girls do write, you know " 



 157 

Blanche found Lausanne most horrid after Baden, 
for whose delights she languished. The delights of 
Baden, however, were not obvious just now to her 
correspondent, who had taken Bernard's fifty pounds 
into the Kursaal and left them there. Bernard, on 
learning his misfortune, lent him another fifty, with 
which he performed a second series of unsuccessful 
experiments ; and our hero was not at his ease until 
he had passed over to his luckless friend the whole 
amount of his own winnings, every penny of which 
found its way through Captain Lovelock's fingers back 
into the bank. When this operation was completed, 
Bernard left Baden, the Captain gloomily accompany- 
ing him to the station. 

I have said that there had come over Bernard a 
singular sense of freedom. One of the uses he made 
of his freedom was to undertake a long journey. He 
went to the East and remained absent from Europe 
for upward of two jrears — a period of his life of 
which it is not proposed to offer a complete history. 
The East is a wonderful region, and Bernard, investi- 
gating the mysteries of Asia, saw a great many curious 
and beautiful things. He had moments of keen en- 
joyment ; he laid up a great store of impressions and 
even a considerable sum of knowledge. But, never- 
theless, he was not destined to look l)ack upon this 
episode with any particular coi^placency. It was 
less delightful than it was supposed to be ; it F&sless 



158  

successful than it might have been. By what unnat- 
ural element the cup of pleasure was adulterated, he 
would have been very much at a loss to say ; but it 
was an incontestable fact that at times he sipped it as 
a medicine, rather than quaffed it as a nectar. When 
people congratulated him on his opportunity of seeing 
the world, and said they envied him the privilege of 
seeing it so well, he felt even more than the usual 
degree of irritation produced by an insinuation that 
fortune thinks so poorly of us as to give us easy 
terms. Misplaced sympathy is the least available 
of superfluities, and Bernard at this time found him- 
self thinking that there was a good deal of imperti- 
nence in the world. He would, however, readily have 
confessed that, in so far as he failed to enjoy his 
Oriental wanderings, the fault was his own ; though 
he would have made mentally the gratifying reflec- 
tion that never was a fault less deliberate. If, during 
the period of which I speak, his natural gayety had 
sunk to a minor key, a partial explanation may be 
found in the fact that he was deprived of the society 
of his late companion. It was an odd circum- 
stance that the two young men had not met since 
Gordon's abrupt departure from Baden. Gordon 
went to Berlin, and shortly afterward to America, 
80 that they were on opposite sides of the globe. 
Before he returned to his own country, Bernard made 
by letter two or three oflfers to join him Jn Europe, 



 159 

anywhere that was agreeable to him. Gordon an- 
swered that his movements were very uncertain, 
and that he should be sorry to trouble Bernard to 
follow him about. He had put him to this incon- 
venience in making him travel from Venice to Baden, 
and one such favor at a time was enough to ask, even 
of the most obliging of men. Bernard was, of course, 
afraid that what he had told Grordon about Angela 
Vivian was really the cause of a state of things which, 
as between two such good friends, wore a perceptible 
resemblance to alienation. Gordon had given her up ; 
but he bore Bernard a grudge for speaking ill of her, 
and so long as this disagreeable impression should 
last, he preferred not to see him. Bernard was frank 
enough to chaige the poor fellow with a lingering 
rancor, of which he made, indeed, no great crime. 
But Gordon denied the allegation, and assured him 
that, to his own perception, there was no decline in 
their intimacy. He only requested, as a favor and as 
a tribute to "just susceptibilities," that Bernard would 
allude no more either to Miss Vivian or to what had 
happened at Baden. This request was easy to comply 
with, and Bernard, in writing, strictly conformed to it ; 
but it seenred to him that the act of doing so was in 
itself a cooling-ofiF. What would be a better proof of 
what is called a "tension" than an agreement to 
avoid a natural topic ? Bernard moralized a little 
over Gordon's "just susceptibilities," and felt that 



160  

the existence of a perverse resentment in so honest a 
nature was a fact gained to his acquaintance with 
psychological scienca It cannot be said, however, 
that he suffered this fact to occupy at all times the 
foreground of his consciousness. Bernard was like 
some great painters ; his foregrounds were very hap- 
pily arranged. He heard nothing of Mrs. Vivian 
and her daughted', beyond a rumor that they had 
gone to Italy; and he learned, on apparently good 
authority, that Blanche Evers had returned, to New 
York with her mother. He wondered whether Cap- 
tain Lovelock was still in pawn at the Hotel de 
HoUande. If he did not allow himself to wonder 
too curiously whether he had done a harm to Gordon, 
it may be affirmed that he was haunted by the recur- 
rence of that other question, of which mention has 
already been made. Had he done a harm to Angela 
Vivian, and did she know that he had done it ? This 
inquiry by no means made him miserable, and it was 
far from awaiting him regularly on his pillow. But 
it visited him at intervals, and sometimes in the 
strangest places — suddenly, abruptly, in the stillness 
of an Indian temple, or amid the shrillness of an 
Oriental crowd. He became familiar with it at last ; 
he called it his Jack-in-the-box. Some invisible 
touch of circumstance would press the spring, and 
the Uttle image would pop up, staring him in the 
face and grinning an interrogation. Bernard always 



 161 

clapped down the lid, for he regarded this phenomenon 
as strikingly inane. But if it was more frequent than 
any pang of conscience connected with the remem- 
brance of Gordon himself, this last sentiment was 
certainly lively enough to make it a great relief to 
hear at last a rumor that the excellent fellow was 
about to be married. The rumor reached him at 
Athens; it was vague and indirect, and it omitted 
the name of his betrothed. But Bernard made the 
most of it, and took comfort in the thought that his 
friend had recovered his spirits and his appetite for 
matrimony. 



11 



XVL 

It was not till our hero reached Paris, on his re- 
turn from the distant East, that the rumor I have just 
mentioned acquired an appreciable consistency. Here, 
indeed, it took the shape of authentic information. 
Among a number of delayed letters which had -been 
awaiting him at his banker's he found a communica- 
tion from Gordon Wright. During the previous year 
or two his correspondence with this trusted — and 
trusting — friend had not been frequent, and Bernard 
had received little direct news of him. Three or four 
short letters had overtaken him in his wanderings — 
letters as cordial, to all appearance, if not as volumi- 
nous, as the punctual missives of an earlier time, 
bernard made a point of satisfying himself that they 
were as cordial ; he weighed them in the scales of im- 
partial suspicion. It seemed to him on the whole 
that there was no relaxation of Gordon's epistolary 
tone. If he wrote less often than he used to do, that 
was a thing that very commonly happened as men 
grew older. The closest intimacies, moreover, had 
phases and seasons, intermissions and revivals, and 
even if his friend had, in fact, averted his countenance 



 163 

from him, this was simply the accomplishment of a 
periodical revolution which would bring them in due 
order face to face again. Bernard made a point, him- 
self, of writing tolerably often and writing always in 
the friendliest tone. He made it a matter of con- 
science — he liked to feel that he was treating Grordon 
generously, and not demanding an eye for an eye. 
The letter he found in Paris was so short that I may 
give it entire. 

" My dear Bernard (it ran), I must write to you 
before I write to any one else, though unfortunately 
you are so far away that you can't be the first to con- 
gratulate me. Try and not be the last, however. I 
am going to be married — as soon as possible. You 
know the young lady, so you can appreciate the situ- 
ation. Do you remember little Blanche Evers, whom 
we used to see three years ago at Baden-Baden ? Of 
course you remember her, for I know you used often 
to talk with her. You will be rather surprised, per- 
haps, at my having selected her as the partner of a 
life-time ; but we manage these matters according to 

* 

our lights. I am very much in love with her, and I 
hold that an excellent reason. I have been ready 
any time this year or two to fall in love with some 
simple, trusting, child-like nature. I find this in per- 
fection in this charming young girl. I find her so 
natural and fresh. I remember telling you once that 
I didn't wish to be fascinated — that I wanted to 



164  

estimate scientifically the woman I should marry. I 
have altogether got over that, and I don't know how 
I ever came to talk such nonsense. I am fascinated 
now, and I assure you I like it ! The best of it is 
that I find it does n't in the least prevent my estimat- 
ing Blanche. I judge her very fairly — I see just 
what she is. She's simple — that's what I want; 
she 's tender — that 's what I long for. You will 
remember how pretty she is ; I need n't remind you 
of that. She was much younger then, and she has 
greatly developed and improved in these two or three 
years. But she will always be young and innocent — 
I don't want her to improve too much. She came 
back to America with her mother the winter after we 
met her at Baden, but I never saw her again till three 
months ago. Then I saw her with new eyes, and I 
wondered I could have been so blind. But I was n't 
ready for her till then, and what makes me so happy 
now is to know that I have come to my present way 
of feeling by experience. That gives me confidence 
— you see I am a reasoner still. But I am under the 
charm, for aU my reason. We are to be married in a 
month — try and come back to the wedding. Blanche 
sends you a message, which I will give you verbatim. 
' Tell him I am not such a silly little chatterbox as I 
used to be at Baden. I am a great deal wiser ; I am 
almost as clever as Angela Vivian.' She has an idea 
you thought Miss Vivian very clever — but it is not 



 165 

true that she is equally so. I am very happy ; come 
home and see." 

Bernard went home, but he was not able to reach 
the United States in time for Gordon's wedding, 
which took place at midsummer. Bernard, arriving 
late in the autumn, found his friend a married man 
of some months* standing, and was able to judge, 
according to his invitation, whether he appeared 
happy. The first effect of the letter I have just 
quoted had been an immense surprise; the second 
had been a series of reflections which were quite the 
negative of surprise ; and these operations of Bernard's 
mind had finally merged themselves in a simple sen- 
timent of jollity. He was delighted that Gordon 
should be married ; he felt jovial about it ; he was 
almost indifferent to the question of whom he had 
chosen. Certainly, at first, the choice of Blanche 
Evers seemed highly incongruous ; it was difl&cult to 
imagine a young woman less shaped to minister to 
Gordon's strenuous needs than the light-hearted and 
empty-headed little flirt whose inconsequent prattle 
had remained for Bernard^ one of the least importu- 
nate memories of a charming time. Blanche Evers 
was a pretty little goose — the prettiest of little 
geese, perhaps, and doubtless the most amiable ; but 
she was not a companion foj a peculiarly serious 
man, who would like his wife to share his view of 
human responsibilities. What a singular selection — 



166  

what a queer infatuation ! Bernard had no sooner 
committed himself to this line of criticism than he 
stopped short, with the sudden consciousness of error 
carried almost to the point of nawet^. He exclaimed 
that Blanche Evers was exactly the sort of girl that 
men of Gordon Wright^s stamp always ended by 
falling in love with, and that poor Gordon knew very 
much better what he was about in this case than he 
had done in trying to solve the deep problem of a 
comfortable life with Angela Vivian. This was what 
your strong, solid, sensible fellows always came to ; 
they paid, in this particular, a larger tribute to pure 
fancy than the people who were supposed habitually 
to cultivate that muse. Blanche Evers was what the 
French call an article of fantasy, and Gordon had 
taken a pleasure in finding her deliciously useless. 
He cultivated utility in other ways, and it pleased 
and flattered him to feel that he could afford, morally 
speaking, to have a kittenish wife. He had within 
himself a fund of common sense to draw upon, so 
that to espouse a paragon of wisdom would be but to 
carry water to the fountain. He could easily make 
up for the deficiencies of a wife who was a little silly, 
and if she charmed and amused him, he could treat 
himself to the luxury of these -sensations for them- 
selves. He was not in the least afraid of being 
ruined by it, and if Blanche's birdlike chatter and 
turns of the head had made a fool of him, he knew it 



 167 

perfectly well, and simply took his stand upon .his 
rights. Every man has a right to a little flower-bed, 
and life is not all mere kitchen-gardening. Bernard 
rapidly extemporized this rough explanation of the 
surprise his friend had offered him, and he found it 
all-sufl&cient for his immediate needs. He wrote 
Blanche a charming note, to which she replied with 
a great deal of spirit and grace. Her little letter was 
very prettily turned, and Bernard, reading it over 
two or three times, said to himseK that, to do her 
justice, she might very well have polished her intel- 
lect a trifle during these two or three years. As she 
was older, she could hardly help being wiser. It 
even occurred to Bernard that she might have profited 
by the sort of experience that is known as the disci- 
pline of suffering. What had become of Captain 
Lovelock and that tender passion which was appar- 
ently none ih^ less genuine for having been expressed 
in the slang of a humorous period ? Had they been 
permanently separated by judicious guardians, and 
had she been obliged to obliterate his image from her 
lightly-beating little heart ? Bernard had felt sure at 
Baden that, beneath her contemptuous airs and that 
impertinent consciousness of the difficulties of con- 
quest by which a pretty American girl attests her 
allegiance to a civilization in which young women 
occupy the highest place — he had felt sure that 
Blanche had a high appreciation of her handsome 



168  

Englishman, and that if Lovelock should continue to 
relish her charms, he might count upon the advan- 
tages of reciprocity. But it occurred to Bernard that 
Captain Lovelock had perhaps been faithless; that, 
at least, the discourtesy of chance and the inhumanity 
of an elder brother might have kept him an eternal 
prisoner at the Hotel de HoUande (where, for all Ber- 
nard knew to the contrary, he had been obliged to 
work out his destiny in tlie arduous character of a 
polyglot waiter) ; so that the poor young girl, casting 
backward glances along the path of Mrs. Vivian's 
retreat, and failing to detect the onward rush of a 
rescuing cavalier, had perforce believed herself for- 
saken, and had been obliged to sunmion philosophy 
to her aid. It was very possible that her philo- 
sophic studies had taught her the art of reflection; 
and that, as she would have said herself, she was tre- 
mendously toned down. Once, at Baden, when Gor- 
don Wright happened to take upon himself to remark 
that little Miss Evers was bored by her English gal- 
lant, Bernard had ventured to observe, in petto, that 
Gordon knew nothing about it. But all this was of 
no consequence now, and Bernard steered further and 
further away from the liability to detect fallacies in 
his friend. Gordon had engaged himself to marry, 
and our critical hero had not a grain of fault to find 
with this resolution. It was a capital thing ; it was 
just what he wanted; it would do him a world of 



 169 

good Bernard rejoiced with him sincerely, and re- 
gretted extremely that a series of solemn engagements 
to pay visits in England should prevent his being 
present at the nuptials. 

They were well over, as I have said, when he 
reached New York. The honeymoon had waned, and 
the business of married life had begun. Bernard, at 
the end, had sailed from England rather abruptly. A 
friend who had a remarkably good cabin on one of 
the steamers was obliged by a sudden detention to 
give it up, and on his offering it to Longueville, the 
latter availed himself gratefully of this opportunity 
of being a little less discomposed than usual by the 
Atlantic billows. He therefore embarked at two 
days' notice, a fortnight earlier than he had intended 
and than he had written to Gordon to expect him. 
Gordon, of course, had written that he was to seek 
no hospitality but that which Blanche was now pre- 
pared — they had a charming house — so graciously 
to dispense; but Bernard, nevertheless, leaving the 
ship early in the morning, had betaken liimself to an 
hotel. He wished not to anticipate his welcome, and 
he determined to report himself to Gordon first and 
to come back with his luggage later in the day. 
After purifying himself of his sea-stains, he left his 
hotel and walked up the Fifth Avenue with all a 
newly -landed voyager's enjoyment of terrestrial loco- 
motion. It was a charming autumn day ; there was 



170  

a golden haze in the air; he supposed it was the 
Indian summer. The broad ^sidewalk of the Fifth 
Avenue was scattered over with dry leaves — crimson 
and orange and amber. He tossed them with his 
stick as he passed ; they rustled and murmured with 
the motion, and it reminded him of the way he used 
to kick them in front of him over these same pave- 
ments in his riotous infancy. It was a pleasure, after 
many wanderings, to find himself in his native land 
again, and Bernard Longueville, as he went, paid his 
compliments to his mother-city. The brightness and 
gayety of the place seemed a greeting to a returning 
son, and he felt a throb of affection for the freshest, 
the youngest, the easiest and most good-natured of 
great capitals. On presenting himself at Gordon's 
door, Bernard was told that the master of the house 
was not at home ; he went in, however, to see the 
mistress. She was in her drawing-room, alone ; she 
had on her bonnet, as if she had been going out. 
She gave him a joyous, demonstrative little welcome ; 
she was evidently very glad to see him. Bernard 
had thought it possible she had " improved," and she 
was certainly prettier than ever. He instantly per- 
ceived that she was still a chatterbox ; it remained 
to be seen whether the quality of her discourse were 
finer. 

"Well, Mr. Longueville," she exclaimed, "where 
in the world did you drop from, and how long did it 



 171 

take you to cross the Atlantic ? Three days, eh ? It 
couldn't have taken you many more, for it was only 
the other day that Gordon told me you were not to 
sail till the 20tL You changed your mind, eh ? I 
did n't know you ever changed your mind. Gordon 
never changes his. That 's not a reason, eh, because 
you are not a bit like Gordon. Well, I never thought 
you were, except that you are a man. Now what 
are you laughing at ? What should you like me call 
you ? You are a man, I suppose ; you are not a god. 
That 's what you would like me to call you, I have 
no doubt I must keep that for Gordon ? I shall 
certainly keep it a good while. I know a good deal 
more about gentlemen than I did when I last saw 
you, and I assure you I don't think they are a bit 
god-like. I suppose that's why you always drop 
down from the sky — you think it 's more divine. I 
remember that 's the way you anived at Baden when 
we were there together ; the first thing we knew, you 
were standing in the midst of us. Do you remember 
that evening when you presented yourself? You 
came up and touched Gordon on the shoulder, and he 
gave a little jump. He will give another little 
jump when he sees you to-day. He give^ a great 
many little jumps ; I keep him skipping about ! I 
remember perfectly the way we were sitting that even- 
ing at Baden, and the way you looked at me when 
you came up. I saw you before Gordon — I see a 



172  

good many things before Gordon. What did you 
look at me that way for ? I always meant to ask 
you. I was dying to know." 

" For the simplest reason in the world," said Ber- 
nai'd. " Because you were so pretty." 

" Ah no, it was n*t that ! I know all about that 
look. It was something else — as if you knew some- 
thing about me. I don't know what you can have 
known. There was very little to know about me, 
except that I was intensely silly. Eeally, I was 
awfully silly that summer at Baden — you wouldn't 
believe how silly I was. But I don't see how you 
could have known that — before you had spoken to 
me. It came out in my conversation — it came out 
awfully. My mother was a good deal disappointed 
in Mrs. Vivian's influence ; she had expected so much 
from it. But it was not poor Mrs. Vivian's fault, it 
was some one's else. Have you ever seen the Vivi- 
ans again ? They are always in Europe ; they have 
•gone to live in Paris. That evening when you came 
up and spoke" to Gordon, I never thought that three 
years afterward I should be married to him, and I 
don't suppose you did either. Is that what you 
meant by looking at me ? Perhaps you can tell the 
future. I wish you would tell my future!" 

" Oh, I can tell that easily," said Bernard. 

*' What will happen to me ? *' 

" Nothing particular ; it will be a little dull — the 



 173 

perfect happiness of a charming woman married to 
the best fellow in the world." 

" Ah, what a horrid future ! " cried Blanche, with 
a little petulant cry. " I want to be happy, but I 
certainly don*t want to be dull. If you say that 
again you will make me repent of having married the 
best fellow in the world. I mean to be happy, but I 
certainly shall not be dull if I can help it." 

" I was wrong to say that," said Bernard, " because, 
after all, my dear young lady, there must be an ex- 
citement in having so kind a husband as you have 
got. Gordon's devotion is quite capable of taking a 
new form — of inventing a new kindness — every 
day in the year." 

Blanche looked at him an instant, with less than 
her usual consciousness of her momentary pose. 

" My husband is very kind," she said gently. 

She had hardly spoken the words when Gordon 
came in. He stopped a moment on seeing Bernard, 
glanced at his wife, blushed, flushed, and with a loud, 
frank exclamation of pleasure, grasped his friend by 
both hands. It was so long since he had seen Ber- 
nai-d that he seemed a good deal moved; he stood 
there smiling, clasping his hands, looking him in the 
eyes, unable for some moments to speak. Bernard, 
on his side, was greatly pleased ; it was delightful to 
him to look into Gordon's honest face again and to 
return his manly gi*asp. And he looked well — he 



174  

looked happy ; to see that was more delightful yet 
During these few instants, while they exchanged a 
silent pledge of renewed friendship, Bernard's elastic 
perception embraced several things besides the con- 
sciousness of his own pleasure. He saw that Gordon 
looked well and happy, but that he looked older, too, 
and more serious, more marked by life. He looked 
as if something had happened to him — as, in fact, 
something had. Bernard saw a latent spark in his 
friend's eye that seemed to question his own for an 
impression of Blanche — to question it eagerly, and 
yet to deprecate judgment. He saw, too — with the 
fact made more vivid by Gordon's standing there 
beside her in his manly sincerity and throwing it 
into contrast — that Blanche was the same little pos- 
turing coquette of a Blanche whom, at Baden, he 
would have treated it as a broad joke that Gordon 
Wright should dream of marrying. He saw, in a 
word, that it was what it had first struck him as 
being — an incongruous union. All this was a good 
deal for Bernard to see in the course of half a min- 
ute, especially through the rather opaque medium of 
a feeling of irreflective joy; and his impressions at 
this moment have a value only in so far as they were 
destined to be confirmed by larger opportunity. 

" You have come a little sooner than we expected," 
said Gordon ; " but you are all the more welcome." 

" It was rather a risk," Blanche observed. " One 



CONFIDENCES. 175 

should be notified, when one wishes to make a good 
impression." 

"Ah, my dear lady," said Bernard, "you made 
your impression — as far as I am concerned — a long 
time ago, and I doubt whether it would have gained 
anything to-day by your having prepared an effect" 

They were standing before the fire-place, on the 
great hearth-rug, and Blanche, while she listened to 
this speech, was feeling, with uplifted arm, for a curl 
that had strayed from her chignon. 

" She prepares her effects very quickly," said Gor- 
don, laughing gently. " They follow each other very 
fast ! " 

Blanche kept her hand behind her head, which 
was bent slightly forward ; her bare arm emerged 
from her hangiug sleeve, and, with her eyes glancing 
upward from under her lowered brows, €he smiled at 
her two spectators. Her husband laid his hand on 
Bernard's arm. 

" Is n't she pretty ? " he cried ; and he spoke with 
a sort of tender delight in being sure at least of this 
point. 

"Tremendously pretty!" said Bernard. "I told 
her so half an hour before you cafbe in." 

" Ah, it was time I should arrive ! " Gordon ex- 
claimed. 

Blanche was manifestly not in the least discom- 
posed by this frank discussion of her charms, for the 



176  

air of distinguished esteem adopted by both of her 
companions diminished the crudity of their remarks. 
But she gave a little pout of irritated modesty — it 
was more becoming than anything she had done yet 
— and declared that if they wished to talk her over, 
they were very welcome ; but she should prefer their 
waiting till she got out of the room. So she left them, 
reminding Bernard that he was to send for his luggage 
and remain, and promising to give immediate orders 
for the preparation of his apartment. Bernard opened 
the door for her to pass out ; she gave him a charming 
nod as he stood there, and he turned back to Gordon 
with the reflection of her smile in his face. Gordon 
was watching him ; Gordon was dying to know what 
he thought of her. It was a curious mania of Gor- 
don's, this wanting to know what one thought of the 
women he loved; but Bernard just now felt abun- 
dantly able to humor it. He was so pleased at seeing 
him tightly married. 

" She 's a delightful creature," Bernard said, with 
cordial vagueness, shaking hands with his friend again. 

Gordon glanced at him a moment, and then, color- 
ing a little, looked straight out of the window; 
whereupon BernsM remembered that these were just 
the terms in which, at Baden, after his companion's 
absence, hie had attempted to qualify Angela Vivian. 
Grordon was conscious — he was conscious of the 
oddity of his situation. 



 177 

*' Of course it surprised you," he said, in a moment, 
still looking out of the window. 

" What, my dear fellow ? " 

" My marriage." 

" Well, you know," said Bernard, " everything sur- 
prises me. I am of a very conjectural habit of mind. 
All sorts of ideas come into my head, and yet when 
the simplest things happen I am always rather startled. 
I live in a reverie, and I am perpetually waked up by 
people doing things." 

Gordon transferred his eyes from the window to 
Bernard's face — to his whole person. 

" You are waked up ? But you fall asleep again ! " 

" I fall asleep very easily," said Bernard. 

Gordon looked at him from head to foot, smiling 
and shaking his head. 

"You are not changed," he said. "You have 
travelled in unknown lands; you have had, I sup- 
pose, all sorts of adventures ; but you are the same 
man I used to know." 

•' I am sorry for that ! " 

" You have the same way of representing — of mis- 
representing, yourself." 

" Well, if I am not changed," said Bernard, " I can 
ill afford to lose so valuable an art." 

"Taking you altogether, I am glad you are the 
same," Gordon answered, simply; "but you must 
come into my part of the house." 

^ 12 



XVII. 

Yes, he was conscious — he was very conscious; 
so Bernard reflected during the two or three first days 
of his visit to his friend. Gordon knew it must seem 
strange to so irreverent a critic that a man who had 
once aspired to the hand of so intelligent a girl — 
putting other things aside — as Angela Vivian should, 
as the Ghost in " Hamlet " says, have "declined upon" 
a young lady who, in force of understanding, was so 
very much Miss Vivian's inferior ; and this knowledge 
kept him ill at his ease and gave him a certain piti- 
able awkwardness. Bernard's sense of the anomaly 
grew rapidly less acute; he made various observa- 
tions which helped it to seem natural. Blanche was 
wonderfully pretty ; she was very graceful, innocent, 
amusing. Since Gordon had determined to many a 
little goose, he had chosen the animal with extreme 
discernment. It had quite the plumage of a swan, 
and it sailed along the stream of life with an ex- 
traordinary lightness of motion. He asked himself 
indeed at times whether Blanche were really so silly 
as she seemed ; he doubted whether any woman could 
be so silly as Blanche seemed. He had a suspicion 



 179 

at times that, for ends of her own, she was playing a 
part — the suspicion arising from the fact that, as 
usually happens in such cases, she over-played it. 
Her empty chatter, her futility, her childish coquetry 
and frivolity — such light wares could hardly be the 
whole substance of any woman's being; there was 
something beneath them which Blanche was keeping 
out of sight. She had a scrap of a mind somewhere, 
and even a little particle of a heart. If one looked 
long enough one might catch a glimpse of these pos- 
sessions. But why should she keep them out of 
sight, and what were the ends that she proposed to 
serve by this uncomfortable perversity? Bernard 
wondered whether she were fond of her husband, 
and he heard it intimated by several good people in 
New York who had had some observation of the 
courtship, that she had married him for his money. 
He was vety sorry to find that this was taken for 
granted, and he determined, on the whole, not to be- 
lieve it. He was disgusted with the idea of such a 
want of gratitude ; for, if Gordon Wright had loved 
Miss Evers for herself, the young lady might certainly 
have discovered the intrinsic value of so disinterested 
a suitor. Her mother had the credit of having made 
the match. Gordon was known to be looking for a 
wife ; Mrs. Evers had put her little feather-head of 
a daughter very much forward, and Gordon was as 
easily captivated as a child by tjie sound of a rattle. 



180  ' 

Blanche had an aflPection for him now, however ; Ber- 
nard saw no reason to doubt that, and certainly she 
would have been a very flimsy creature indeed if she 
had not been touched by his inexhaustible kindness. 
She had every conceivable indulgence, and if she 
married him for his money, at least she had got what 
she wanted. She led the most agreeable life conceiv- 
able, and she ought to be in high good-humor. It 
was impossible to have a prettier house, a prettier 
carriage, more jewels and laces for the adornment of 
a plump little person. It was impossible to go to 
more parties, to give better dinners, to have fewer 
privations or annoyances. Bernard was so much 
struck with all this that, advancing rapidly in the 
intimacy of his gracious hostess, he ventured to call 
her attention to her blessings. She answered that 
she was perfectly aware of them, and there was no 
pretty speech she was not prepared to make about 
Grordon. 

"I know what you want to say," she went on; 
" you want to say that he spoils me, and I don't see 
why you should hesitate. You generally say every- 
thing you want, and you need n't be afraid of m& 
He does n't spoil me, simply because I am so bad 
I can't be spoiled ; but that 's of no consequence. I 
was spoiled ages ago ; every one iSpoiled me — every 
one except Mrs. Vivian. I was always fond of having 
everything I want, and I generally managed to get it 



 181 

I always had lovely clothes; mamma thought that 
was a kind of a duty. If it was a duty, I don't sup- 
pose it counts as a part of the spoiling. But I was 
very much indulged, and I know I have everything 
now. Gordon is a perfect husband; I believe if I 
were to ask him for a present of his nose, he would 
cut it off and give it to ma I think I will ask him 
for a small piece of it some day ; it will rather im- 
prove him to have an inch or two less. I don^t say 
he 's handsome ; but he 's just as good as he can be. 
Some people say that if you are very fond of a person 
you always think them handsome ; but I don't agree 
with that at all. I am very fond of Gordon, and yet 
I am not blinded by aflection, as regards his personal 
appearance. He 's too light for my taste, and too red. 
And because you think people handsome, it does n't 
follow that you are fond of them. I used to have a 
friend who was awfully handsome — the handsomest 
man I ever saw — and I was perfectly conscious of 
his defects. But I 'm not conscious of Gordon's, and 
I don't believe he has got any. He's so intensely 
kind ; it 's quite pathetic. One would think he had 
done me an injury in marrying me, and that he 
wanted to make up for it. If he has done me an 
injury I have n't discovered it yet, and I don't believe 
I ever shalL I certainly shall not as long as he lets 
me order all the clothes I want. I have ordered five 
dresses this week, and I mean to order two ipore. 



182  

When I told Gordon, what do you think he did ? He 
simply kissed me. Well, if that 's not expressive, I 
don't know what he could have done. He kisses me 
about seventeen times a day. I suppose it's very 
improper for a woman to tell any one how often her 
husband kisses her ; but, as you happen to have seen 
him do it, I don't suppose you will be scandalized. 
I know you are not easily scandalized; I am not 
afraid of you. You are scandalized at my getting so 
many dresses ? Well, I told you I was spoiled — I 
freely acknowledge it. That 's why I was afraid to 
tell Gordon — because when I was married I had such 
a lot of things ; I was supposed to have dresses enough 
to last for a year. But Gordon had n't to pay for them, 
so there was no harm in my letting him feel that he 
has a wife. If he thinks I am extravagant, he can 
easily stop kissing me. You don't think it would be 
easy to stop ? It 's very well, then, for those that have 
never begun ! " 

Bernard had a good deal of conversation with 
Blanche, of which, so far as she was concerned, the 
foregoing remarks may serve as a specimqp. Gordon, 
was away from home during much of the day ; he had 
a chemical laboratory in which he was greatly inter- 
ested, and which he took Bernard to see ; it was fitted 
up with the latest contrivances for the pursuit of 
experimental science, and was the resort of needy 
young students, who enjoyed, at Grotdon's expense, the 



 183 

opportunity for pushing their researches. The place 
did great honor to Gordon's liberality and to his in- 
genuity ; but Blanche, who had also paid it a visit, 
could never speak of it without a pretty little shudder. 
" Nothing would induce me to go there again," she 
declare^, " and I consider myself very fortunate to 
have escaped from it with my life. It ^s filled with 
aU sorts of horrible things, that fizzle up and go off, 
or that make you turn some dreadful color if you 
look at them. , I expect to hear a great clap some 
day, and half an hour afterward to see Gordon brought 
home in several hundred small pieces, put up in a 
dozen little bottles. I got a horrid little stain in the 
middle of my dress that one of the young men — 
the young savants — was so good as to drop there. 
Did you see the young savarits who work under Gor- 
don's orders? I thought they were too forlorn; 
there isn't one of them you would look at. If you 
can believe it, there was n't one of them that looked 
at me ; they took no more notice of me than if I had 
been the charwoman. They might have shown me 
some attention, at least, as the wife of the proprietor. 
What is it that Gordon's called — is n't there some 
other name ? If you say ' proprietor,' it sounds as if 
he kept an hoteL I certainly don't want to pass for 
the wife of an hotel-keeper. What does he call him- 
self? He must have some name. I hate telling 
people he 's a chemist ; it sounds just as if he kept a 



184  

shop. That *s what they call the druggists in Eng- 
land, and I formed the habit while I was there. It 
makes me feel as if he were some dreadful little 
man, with big green bottles in the window and 
*night-beir painted outside. He doesn't call himself 
anything ? Well, that 's exactly like Gordon ! I 
wonder he consents to have a name at all. When I 
was telling some one about the young men who work 
under his orders — the young savants — he said I 
must not say that — I must not speak of their work- 
ing ' under his orders.' I don't know what he would 
like me to say ! Under his inspiration !" 

During the hours of Gordon's absence, Bernard 
had frequent colloquies with his friend's wife, whose 
irresponsible prattle amused him, and in whom he 
tried to discover some faculty, some quality, which 
might be a positive guarantee of Gordon's future 
felicity. But often, of course, Gordon was an auditor 
as well ; I say an auditor, because it seemed to Ber- 
nard that he had grown to be less of a talker than of 
yore. Doubtless, when a man finds himself united 
to a garrulous wife, he naturally learns to hold his 
tongue; but sometimes, at the close of one of 
Blanche's discursive monologues, on glancing at her 
husband just to see how he took it, and seeing him 
sit perfectly silent, with a fixed, inexpressive smile, 
Bernard said to himself that Gordon found the les- 
son of listening attended with some embarrassments. 



 185 

Gordon, as the years went by, was growing a little 
inscrutable; but this, too, in certain circumstances, 
was a usual tendency. The operations of the mind, 
with deepening experience, became more complex, 
and people were less apt to emit immature reflections 
at forty than they had been in their earlier days. 
Bemaixi felt a gi*eat kindness in these days for his old 
friend ; he never yet had seemed to him such a good 
fellow, nor appealed so strongly to the benevolence 
of his disposition. Sometimes, of old, Gordon used 
to irritate him ; but this danger appeared completely 
to have passed away. Bernard prolonged his visit ; 
it gave him pleasure to be able to testify in this 
manner to his good will. Gordon was the kindest of 
hosts, and if in conversation, when his wife was 
present, he gave precedence to her superior powers, 
he had at other times a good deal of pleasant bachelor- 
talk with his guest. He seemed very happy ; he had 
plenty of occupation and plenty of practical inten- 
tions. The season went on, and Bernard enjoyed his 
life. He enjoyed the keen and brilliant American 
winter, and he found it very pleasant to be treated as 
a distinguished stranger in his own land — a situation 
to which his long and repeated absences had relegated 
hiuL The hospitality of New York was profuse; 
the charm of its daughters extreme ; the radiance of 
its skies superb. Bernard was the restless and pro- 
fessionless mortal that we know, wandering in life 



186  

from one vague experiment to another, constantly 
gratified and never satisfied, to whom no imperious 
finality had as yet presented itself; and, nevertheless, 
for a time he contrived to limit his horizon to the 
passing hour, and to make a good many hours pass 
in the drawing-room of a demonstrative flirt. 

For Mrs. Gordon was a flirt ; that had hecome tol- 
erably obvious. Bernard had known of old that 
Blanche Evers was one, and two or three months' 
observation of his friend's wife assured him that she 
did not judge a certain ethereal coquetry to be incon- 
sistent with the conjugal character. Blanche flirted, 
in fact, more or less with all men, but her opportunity 
for playing her harmless batteries upon Bernard were 
of course exceptionally large. The poor fellow was 
perpetually under fire, and it was inevitable that he 
should reply with some precision of aim. It seemed 
to him all child's play, and it is certain that when his 
back was turned to his pretty hostess he never found 
himself thinking of her. He had not the least reason 
to suppose that she thought of him — excessive con- 
centration of mind was the last vice of which he 
accused her. But before the winter was over, he dis- 
covered that Mrs. Gordon Wright was being talked 
about, and that his own name was, as the newspapers 
say, mentioned in connection with that of his friend's 
wife. The discovery greatly disgusted him ; Bernard 
Longueville's chronicler must do him the justice to 



 187 

say that it failed to yield him an even transient thrill 
of pleasure. He thought it very improbable that 
this vulgar rumor had reached Gordon's ears ; but he 
nevertheless — very naturally — instantly made up 
his mind to leave the house. He lost no time in 
saying to Gordon that he had suddenly determined 
to go to California, and that he was sure he must be 
glad to get rid of him. Gordon expressed no surprise 
and no regret. He simply laid his hand on his 
shoulder and said, very quietly, looking at him in the 
eyes — 

" Very well ; the pleasantest things must come to 
an end." 

It was not till an hour afterwards that Bernard 
said to himself that his friend's manner of receiving 
the announcement of his departure had been rather 
odd. He had neither said a word about his staying 
longer nor urged him to come back again, and there 
had been (it now seemed to Bernard) an audible 
undertone of relief in the single sentence with which 
he assented to his visitor's withdrawal Could it be 
possible that poor Gordon was jealous of him, that 
he had heard this loathsome gossip, or that his own 
observation had given him an alarm ? He had cer- 
tainly never betrayed the smallest sense of injury ; 
but it was to be remembered that even if he were 
uneasy, Gordon was quite capable, with his charac- 
teristic habit of weighing everything, his own honor 



188  

included, in scrupulously adjusted scales, of denying 
himself the luxury of active suspicion. He would 
never have let a half suspicion make a difiference in 
his conduct, and he would not have dissimulated ; he 
would simply have resisted belief. His hospitality 
had been without a flaw, and if he had really been 
wishing Bernard out of his house, he had behaved 
with admirable self-controL Bernard, however, fol- 
lowed this train of thought a very short distance. It 
was odious to him to believe that he could have 
appeared to Gordon, however guiltlessly, to have in- 
vaded even in imagination the mystic line of the 
marital monopoly ; not to say that, moreover, if one 
came to that, he really cared about as much for poor 
little Blanche as for the weather-cock on the nearest 
steeple. He simply hurried his preparations for de- 
parture, and he told Blanche that he should have to 
bid her farewell on the following day. He had found 
her in the drawing-room, waiting for dinner. She 
was expecting company to dine, and Gordon had not 
yet come down. 

She was sitting in the vague glow of the fire-light, 
in a wonderful blue dress, with two little blue feet 
crossed on the rug and pointed at the hearth. She 
received Bemard*s announcement with small satisfac- 
tion, and expended a great deal of familiar ridicule 
on his project of a journey to California. Tlien, sud- 
denly getting up and looking at him a moment — 



 189 

*' I know why you are going," she said. 

'' I am glad to hear my explanations have not been 
lost." 

"Your explanations are all nonsense. You are 
going for another reason." 

"Well," said Bernard, "if you insist upon it, it's 
because you are too sharp with me." 

" It 's because of me. So much as that is true." 
Bernard wondered what she was going to say — if 
she were going to be silly enough to allude to the 
most impudent of fictions ; then, as she stood open- 
ing and closing her blue fan and smiling at him in 
the fire-light, he felt that she was silly enough for 
anything. "It's because of all the talk — it's be- 
cause of Gordon. You need n't be afraid of Gordon." 

" Afraid of him ? I don't know what you mean," 
said Bernard, gravely. 

Blanche gave a little laugh. 

"You have discovered that people are talking 
about us — about you and me. I must say I wonder 
you care. I don't care, and if it 's because of Gordon, 
you might as well know that he does n't care. If he 
doesn't care, I don't see why I should; and if I 
don't, I don't see why you should ! " 

"You pay too much attention to such insipid drivel 
in even mentioning it." 

"Well, if I have the credit of saying what I 
should n't — to you or to any one else — I don't see 



190  

why I shouldn't have the advantage too. Gordon 
doesn't care — he doesn't care what I do or say. 
He doesn't care a pin for me I" 

She spoke in her usual rattling, rambling voice, 
and brought out this declaration with a curious 
absence of resentment. 

"You talk about advantage," said Bernard. "I 
don't see what advantage it is to you to say that." 

"I want to — I must — I will ! That 's the advan- 
tage!" This came out with a sudden sharpness 
of tone; she spoke more excitedly. "He doesn't 
care a button for me, and he never did! I don't 
know what he married me for. He cares for some- 
thing else — he thinks of something else. I don't 
know what it is — I suppose it's chemistry!" 

These words gave Bernard a certain shock, but he 
had his intelligence suflSciently in hand to contradict 
them with energy. 

"You labor under a monstrous delusion," he ex- 
claimed. " Your husband thinks you fascinating." 

This epithet, pronounced with a fine distinctness, 
was ringing in the air when the door opened and 
Gordon came in. He looked for a moment from Ber- 
nard to his wife, and then, approaching the latter, he 
said, softly — 

"Do you know that he leaves us to-morrow ? " 



XVIII. 

Bebnard left then and went to California; but 
when he arrived there he asked himself why he had 
come, and was unable to mention any other reason 
than that he had announced it He began to feel 
restless again, and to drift back to that chronic 
chagrin which had accompanied him through his 
long journey in the East. He succeeded, however, 
in keeping these unreasonable feelings at bay for 
some time, and he strove to occupy himself, to take 
an interest in Californian problems. Bernard, how- 
ever, was neither an economist nor a cattle-fancier, 
and he found that, as the phrase is, there was not a 
great deal to take hold of He wandered about, ad- 
mired the climate and the big peaches, thought a 
while of going to Japan, and ended by going to 
Mexico. In this way he passed several months, and 
justified, in the eyes of other people at least, his long 
journey across the Continent. At last he made it 
again, in the opposite sense. He went back to New 
York, where the summer had already begun, and 
here he invented a solution for the difficulty pre- 
sented by life to a culpably unoccupied and ill-i-egu- 



192  

lated maa The solution was not in the least original, 
and I am almost ashamed to mention so stale and 
conventional a device. Bernard simply hit upon the 
plan of returning to Europe. Such as it was, how- 
ever, he carried it out with an audacity worthy of a 
better cause, and was sensibly happier since he had 
made up his mind to it. Gordon Wright and his 
wife were out of town, but Bernard went into the 
country, as boldly as you please, to inform them of 
his little project and take a long leave of them. He 
had made his arrangements to sail immediately, and, 
as at such short notice it was impossible to find good 
quarters on one of the English vessels, he had en- 
gaged a berth on a French steamer, which would 
convey him to Havre. On going down to Gordon's 
house in the country, he was conscious of a good deal 
of eagerness to know what had become of that latent 
irritation of which Blanche had given him a speci- 
men. Apparently it had quite subsided; Blanche 
was wreathed in smiles ; she was living in a bower 
of roses. Bernard, indeed, had no opportunity for 
investigating her state of mind, for he found several 
people in the house, and Blanche, who had an exalted 
standard of the duties of a hostess, was occupied in 
making life agreeable to her guests, most of whom 
were gentlemea She had in this way that great 
remedy for dissatisfaction which Bernard lacked — 
something iutei*esting to do. Bernard felt a good 



 193 

deal of genuine sadness in taking leave of Gordon, 
to whom he contrived to feel even more kindly than 
in earlier days. He had quite forgotten that Gordon 
was jealous of him — which he was not, as Bernard 
said. Certainly, Gordon showed nothing of it now, 
and nothing could have been more friendly than their 
parting. Gordon, also, for a man who was never 
boisterous, seemed very contented. He was fond of 
exercising hospitality, and he confessed to Bernard 
that he was just now in the humor for having his 
house full of people. Fortune continued to gratify 
this generous taste ; for just as Bernai*d was coming 
away another guest made his appearance. The new- 
comer was none other than the Honourable Augustus 
Lovelock, who had just arrived in New York, and 
who, as he added, had long desired to visit the United 
States. Bernard merely witnessed his arrival, and 
was struck with the fact that as he presented himself 
— it seemed quite a surprise — Blanche really stopped 
chattering. 

18 



XIX. 

I HAVE called it a stale expedient on Bernard 
Longneville's part to "go to Europe" again, like the 
most commonplace American ; and it is certain that, 
as our young man stood and looked out of the win- 
dow of his inn at Havre, an hour after his arrival at 
that sea-port, his adventure did not strike him as 
having any great freshness. He had no plans nor 
intentions ; he had not even any very definite desires. 
He had felt the impulse to come back to Europe, and 
he had obeyed it; but now that he had arrived, his 
impulse seemed to have little more to say to him. 
He perceived it, indeed — mentally — in the attitude 
of a small street-boy playing upon his nose with that 
vulgar gesture which is supposed to represent the 
elation of successful fraud. There was a large blank 
wall before his window, painted a dirty yellow and 
much discolored by the weather; a broad patch of 
summer sunlight rested upon it and brought out the 
full vulgarity of its complexion. Bernard stared a 
while at this blank wall, which struck him in some 
degree as a symbol of his own present moral pros- 
pect Then suddenly he turned away, with the 



 195 

declaration that, whatever truth there might be in 
symbolism, he, at any rate, had not come to Europe 
to spend the precious remnant of his youth in a 
malodorous Norman sea-port The weather was very 
hot, and neither the hotel nor the town at large 
appeared to form an attractive s^our for persons of 
an imtable nostril. To go to Paris, however, was 
hardly more attractive than to remain at Havre, for 
Bernard had a lively vision of the heated bitumen 
and the glaring frontages of the French capital. But 
if a Norman town was close and dull, the Norman 
country was notoriously fresh and entertaining, and 
the next morning Bernard got into a calfeche, with 
his luggage, and bade its proprietor drive him along 
the coast. Once he had begun to rumble through 
this charming landscape, he was in much better 
humor with his situation ; the air was freshened by a 
breeze from the sea ; the blooming country, without 
walls or fences, lay open to the traveller's eye ; the 
grain-fields and copses were shimmering in the sum- 
mer wind; the pink-faced cottages peeped through 
the ripening orchard-boughs, and the gray towers of 
the old churches were silvered by the morning-light 
of France. 

At the end of some three hours, Bernard arrived at 
a little watering-place which lay close upon the 
shote, in the embrace of a pair of white-anned clifis. 
It had a quaint and primitive aspect and a natural 



196  

picturesqueness which commended it to Bernard's 
taste. There was evidently a great deal of nature 
about it, and at this moment, nature^ embodied in the 
clear, gay sunshine, in the blue and quiet sea, in the 
daisied grass of the high-shouldered downs, had an 
air of inviting the intelligent observer to postpone 
his difficulties. Blanquais-les-Galets, as Bernard 
learned the name of this unfashionable resort to be, 
was twenty miles from a railway, and the place wore 
an expression of unafiFected rusticity. Bernard 
stopped at an inn for his noonday breakfast, and 
then, with his appreciation quickened by the homely 
felicity of this repast, determined to go no further. 
He engaged a room at the inn-, dismissed his vehicle, 
and gave himself up to the contemplation of French 
sea-side manners. These were chiefly to be observed 
upon a pebbly strand which lay along the front of 
the village and served as the gathering-point of its 
idler inhabitants. Bathing in the sea was the chief 
occupation of these good people, including, as it did, 
prolonged, spectatorship of the process and infinite 
conversation upon its mysteries. The little world of 
Blanquais appeared to form a large family party, of 
highly developed amphibious habits, which sat gossip- 
ing all day upon the warm pebbles, occasionally 
dipping into the sea and drying itself in the sun, 
without any relaxation of personal intimacy. All 
this was very amusing to Bernard, who in the course 



 197 

of the day took a bath with the rest. The ocean 
was, after all, very large, and when one took one's 
plunge one seemed to have it quite to one's self 
When he had dressed himself again, Bernard stretched 
himself on the beach, feeling happier than he had 
done in a long time, and pulled hi3 hat over his eyes. 
The feeling of happiness was an odd one; it had 
come over him suddenly, without visible cause ; but, 
such as it was, our hero made the most of it. As he 
lay there it seemed to deepen; his immersion and 
his exercise in the salt water had given him an agree- 
able languor. This presently became a drowsiness 
which was not less agreeable, and Bernard felt him- 
self going to sleep. There were sounds in the air 
above his head — sounds of the crunching and rattling 
of the loose, smooth stones as his neighbors moved 
about on them; of high-pitched French voices ex- 
changing colloquial cries ; of the plash of the bathers 
in the distant water, and the short, soft breaking of 
the waves. But these things came to his ears more 
vaguely and remotely, and at last they faded away. 
Bernard enjoyed half an hour of that light and easy 
slumber which is apt to overtake idle people in re- 
cumbent attitudes in the open air on August after- 
noons. It brought with it an exquisite sense of 
rest, and the rest was not spoiled by the fact that it 
was animated by a charming dream. Dreamy are 
vague things, and this one had the defects of its 



198  

species; but it was somehow concerned with the 
image of a young lady whom Bernard had formerly 
known, and who had beautiful eyes, into which — 
in the dream — he found himself looking. He waked 
up to find himself looking into the crown of his hat, 
which had been resting on the bridge of his nose. 
He removed it, and half raised himself, resting on his 
elbow and preparing to taste, in another position, of 
a little more of that exquisite rest of which mention 
has just been made. The world about him was still 
amusing and charming; the chatter of his com- 
panions, losing itself in the lajge sea-presence, the 
plash of the divers and swimmers, the deep blue of 
the ocean and the silvery white of the cliff, had that 
striking air of indifference to the fact that his mind 
had been absent from them which we are apt to find 
in mundane things on emerging from a nap. The 
same people were sitting near him on the beach — 
the same, and yet not quite the same. He found 
himself noticing a person whom he had not noticed 
before — a young lady, who was seated in a low 
fportable chair, som e^ dozen yards off, with her eyes 
bent upon a book. Her head was in shade ; her large 
parasol made, indeed, an awning for her whole per- 
son, which in this way, in the quiet attitude of peru- 
sal, seemed to abstract itself from the glare and 
murmur of the beach. The clear shadow of her um- 
brella — it was lined with blue — was deep upon her 



 199 

face ; but it was not deep enough to prevent Bernard 
from recognizing a profile that he knew. He sud- 
denly sat upright, with an intensely quickened vis- 
ion. Was he dreaming still, or had he waked? 
In a moment he felt that he was acutely awake ; he 
heard her, across the interval, turn the page of her 
book. For a single instant, as she did so, she looked 
with level brows at the glittering ocean ; then, lower- 
ing her eyes, she went on with her reading. In this 
barely perceptiljle movement he saw Angela Vivian ; 
it was wonderful how well he remembered her. She 
was evidently reading very seriously 5 she was much 
interested in her book. She was alone ; Bernard 
looked about for her mother, but Mrs. Vivian was not 
in sight. By this time Bernard had become aware 
that he was agitated ; the exquisite rest of a few mo- 
ments before had passed away. His agitation struck 
him as unreasonable ; in a few minutes he made up his 
mind that it was absurd. He had done her an injury 
— yes ; but as she sat there losing herself in a French 
novel — Bernard could see it was a French novel — 
he could not make out that she was the worse for it. 
It had not afifected h6f* appearance ; Miss Vivian was 
still a handsome girl. Bernard hoped she would not 
look toward him or recognize him ; he wished to 
look at her at his ease ; to think it over ; to make up 
his mind. The idea of meeting Angela Vivian again 
had often come into his thoughts ; I may, indeed, say 



200  

that it was a tolerably familiar presence there ; but 
the fact, nevertheless, now presented itself with all 
the violence of an accident for which he was totally 
unprepared. He had often asked himself what he. 
should say to her, how he should carry himself, and 
how he should probably find the young lady; but, 
with whatever ingenuity he might at the moment 
have answered these questions, his intelligence at 
present felt decidedly overtaxed. She was a very 
pretty girl to whom he had done a wrong ; this was 
the final attitude into which, with a good deal of 
preliminary shifting and wavering, she had settled in 
his recollection. The wrong was a right, doubtless, 
from certain points of view ; but from the girFs own 
it could only seem an injury to which its having been 
inflicted by a clever young man with whom she had 
been on agreeable term^, necessarily added a touch 
of baseness. 

In every disadvantage that a woman sufiers at the 
hands of a man, there is inevitably, in what concerns 
the man, an element of cowardice. When I say 
"inevitably," I mean that this is what the woman 
sees in it. This is what Bernard believed that 
Angela Vivian saw in the fact that by giving his 
friend a bad account of her he had prevented her 
making an opulent marriage. At first he had said 
to himself that, whether he had held his tongue or 
spoken, she had ali'eady lost her chance ; but with 



 201 

time^ somehow, this reflection had lost its weight in the 
scale. It conveyed little re-assurance to his irritated 
conscience — it had become imponderable and imper- 
tinent. At the moment of which I speak it entirely 
failed to present itself, even for form's sake ; and as he 
sat looking at this superior creature who came back to 
him out of an episode of his past, he thought of her 
simply as an unprotected woman toward whom he 
had been indelicate. It is not an agreeable thing for 
a delicate man like Bernard Longueville to have to 
accommodate himself to such an accident, but this is 
nevertheless what it seemed needful that he should 
do. If she bore him a grudge he must think it 
natural; if she had vowed him a hatred he must 
allow her the comfort of it. He had done the only 
thing possible, but that made it no better for her. 
He had wronged her. The circumstances mattered 
nothing, and as he could not make it up to her, the 
only reasonable thing was to keep out of her way. 
He had stepped into her path now, and the proper 
thing was to step out of it. If it could give her no 
pleasure to see him again, it could certainly do him 
no good to see her. He had seen her by this time 
pretty well — as far as mere seeing went, and as yet, 
apparently, he was none the worse fgr that ; but his 
hope that he should himself escape unperceived had 
now become acuta It is singular that this hope 
should not have led him instantly to turn his back 



202  

and move away ; but the explanation of his impru- 
dent delay is simply that he wished to see a little 
more of Miss Vivian. He was unable to bring him- 
self to the point. Those clever things that he might 
have said to her quite faded away. The only good 
taste was to take himself off, and spare her the trouble 
of inventing civilities that she could not feeL And 
yet he continued to sit there from moment to moment, 
arrested, detained, fascinated, by the accident of her 
not looking round — of her having let him watch 
her so long. She turned another page, and another, 
.and her reading absorbed her still. He was so near 
[her that. he could have touched her dress with the 
.1 *^. '' Vpoint of his umbrella. At last she raised her eyes 
and rested them a while on the blue horizon, straight 
in front of her, but as yet without turning them aside. 
This, however, augmented the danger of her doing so, 
and Bernard, with a good deal of an effort, rose to his 
feet. The effort, doubtless, kept the movement from 
being either as light or as swift as it might have been, 
and it vaguely attracted his neighbor's attention. 
She turned her head and glanced at him, with a 
glance that evidently expected but to touch him and 
pass. It touched him, and it was on the point of 
passing; then it suddenly checked itself; she had 
recognized him. She looked at him, straight and 
open-eyed, out of the shadow of her parasol, and 
Bernard stood there — motionless now — receiving 



 203 

her gaze. How long it lasted need not be narrated. 
It was probably a macter of a few seconds, but to 
Bernard it seemed a little eternity. He met her eyes, 
he looked straight into her face ; now that she had 
seen him he could do nothing else. Bernard's little 
eternity, hojvever, came to an end; Miss Vivian 
dropped her eyes upon her book again. She let them 
rest upon it only a moment ; then she closed it and 
slowly rose from her chair, turning away from Ber- 
nard. He still stood looking at her — stupidly, fool- 
ishly, helplessly enough, as it seemed to him ; no 
sign of recognition had been exchanged. Angela 
Vivian hesitated a minute; she now had her back 
turned to him, and he fancied her light, flexible 
figure was agitated by her indecision. She looked 
along the sunny beach which stretched its shallow 
curve to where the little bay ended and the white 
wall of the cliffs began. She looked down toward 
the sea, and up toward the little Casino which was 
perched on a low embankment, communicating with 
the beach at two or three points by a short flight of 
steps, Bernard saw — or supposed he saw — that 
she was asking herself whither she had best turn to 
avoid him. He had not blushed when she looked at 
him — he had rather turned a little pale; but he 
blushed now, for it really seemed odious to have 
literally driven the poor girl to bay. Miss Vivian 
decided to take refuge in the Casino, and she passed 



204  

along one of the little pathways of planks that were 
laid here and there across the beach, and directed her* 
self to the nearest flight of steps. Before she had 
gone two paces a complete change came over Ber- 
nard's feeling ; his only wish now was to speak to 
her — to explain — to tell her he would go away. 
There was another row of steps at a short distance 
behind him ; he rapidly ascended them and reached 
the little terrace of the Casino. Miss Vivian stood 
there; she was apparently hesitating again which 
way to turn. Bernard came straight up to her, with 
a gallant smile and a greeting. The comparison is a 
coarse one, but he felt that he was taking the bull by 
the horns. Angela Vivian stood watching him arrive. 

"You didn't recognize me," he said, "and your 
not recognizing me made me — made me hesitate." 

For a moment she said nothing, and then — 

" You are more timid than you used to be ! " she 
answered. 

He could hardly have said what expression he had 
expected to find in her face ; his apprehension had^ 
perhaps, not painted her obtrusively pale and haughty^ 
aggressively cold and stem ; but it had figured some- 
thing different from the look he encountered. Miss 
Vivian was simply blushing — that was what Bernard 

M 

mainly perceived ; he saw that her surprise had been 
extreme — complete. Her blush was re-assuring ; it 
contradicted the idea of impatient resentment, and 



 205 

Bernard took some satisfaction in noting that it was 
prolonged. 

" Yes, I am more timid than I used to be," he said. 

In spite of her blush, she continued to look at him 
very directly; but she had always done that — she 
always met one's eye; and Bernard now instantly 
found all the beauty that he had ever found before 
in her pure, unevasive glance. 

"I don't know whether I am more brave," she 
said; "but I must tell the truth — I instantly rec- 
ognized you." 

" You gave no sign ! " 

** I supposed I gave a striking one — in getting up 
and going away." 

" Ah ! " said Bernard, " as I say, I am more timid 
than I was, and I did n't venture to interpret that as 
a sign of recognition." 

" It was a sign of surprise." 

*' Not of pleasure ! " said Bernard. He felt this to 
be a Venturesome, and from the point of view of taste 
perhaps a reprehensible, remark ; but he made it be- 
cause he was now feeUng his ground, and it seemed 
better to make it gravely than with assumed jocosity. 

" Great surprises are to me never pleasures," An- 
gela answered; "I am not fond of shocks of any 
kind. The pleasure is another matter. I have not 
yet got over my surprise" 

"If I had known you were here, I would have 
written to you beforehand," said Bernard, laughing. 



206  

Miss Vivian, beneath her expanded parasol, gave a 
little shrug of her shoulders. 

" Even that would have been a surprise." 

" You mean a shock, eh ? Did you suppose I was 
dead ? " 

Now, at last, she lowered her eyes, and her blush 
slowly died away. 

** I knew nothing about it." 

" Of course you could n't know, and we are all 
mortal. It was natural that you should n't expect — 
simply on turning your head — to find me lying on 
the pebbles at Blanquais-les-Galets. You were a 
great surprise to me, as well ; but I difiFer from you 
— I like surprises." 

" It is rather refreshing to hear that one is a sur- 
prise," said the girl. 

*' Especially when in that capacity one is liked!" 
Bernard exclaimed. 

" I don't say that — because such sensations pass 
away. I am now beginning to get over mine." * 

The light mockery of her tone struck him as the 
echo of an unforgotten air. He looked at her a mo- 
ment, and then he said — 

" You are not changed ; I find you quite the same." 

" I am sorry for that ! " And she turned away. 

" What are you doing ? " he asked. " Where are 
you going ? " 

She looked about her, without answering, up and 



4 



 207 

down the little terrace. The Casino at Blanquais 
was a much more modest place of reunion than the 
Conversation-house at Baden-Baden. It was a small, 
low structure of brightly painted wood, containing 
but three or four rooms, and furnished all along its 
front with a narrow covered gallery, which offered a 
delusive shelter from the rougher moods of the fine, 
fresh weather. It was somewhat rude and shabby 
— the subscription for the season was low — but it 
had a simple picturesqueness. Its little terrace was 
a very convenient place for a stroll, and the great 
view of the ocean and of the marble-white crags 
that formed the broad gate-way of the shallow bay, 
was a sufficient compensation for the absence of 
luxuries. There were a few people sitting in the 
gallery, and a few others scattered upon the terrace ; 
but the pleasure-seekers of Blanquais were, for the 
most part, immersed in the salt water or dissemi- 
nated on the grassy downs. 

" I am looking for my mother," said Angela Vivian. 

*' I hope your mother is welL" 

** Very well, thank you." 

** May I help you to look for her ? " Bernard asked. 

Her eyes paused in their quest, and rested a mo- 
ment upon her companion. 

" She is not here," she said presently. " She has 
gone home." 

** What do you call home ? " Bernard demanded. 



208  

'^The sort of place that we always call home; a 
bad little house that we have taken for a month." 

" Will you let me come and see it ? " 

" It 's nothing to see." 

Bernard hesitated a moment. 

** Is that a refusal ? " - 

^ I should never think of giving it so fine a name." 

"There would be nothing fine in forbidding me 
your door. Don't think that!" said Bernard^ with 
rather a forced laugh. 

It was difficult to know what the girl thought; 
but she said, in a moment — 

" We shall be very happy to see you. I am going 
home." 

" May I walk with you so far ? " asked Bernard. 

"It is not far; it's only thi'ee minutes." And 
Angela moved slowly to the gate of the Gasina 



XX. 

Behnard walked beside her, and for some moments 
nothing was said between them. As the silence con- 
tinued, he became aware of it, and it vexed him that 
she should leave certain things unsaid. She had asked 
him no question — neither whence he had come, nor 
how long he would stay, nor what had happened to 
him since they parted. He wished to see whether 
this was intention or accident. He was already com- 
plaining to himself tliat she expressed no interest in 
him, and he was perfectly aware that this was a ridic- 
ulous feeling. He had come to speak to her in order 
to tell her that he was going away, and yet, at the 
end of five minutes, he had asked leave* to come and 
see her. This sudden gyration of mind was grotesque, 
and Bernard knew it ; but, nevertheless, he had an 
immense expectation that, if he should give her time, 
she would manifest some curiosity as to. his own situ- 
ation. He tried to give her time ; he held his tongue ; 
but she continued to say nothing. They passed along 
a sort of winding lane, where two or three fishermen's 
cottages, with old brown nets suspended on the walls 
and drying in the sun, stood open to the road, on the 

14 



210  

other side of which was a patch of salt-looking grass, 
browsed by a donkey that was not fastidious. 

"It's so long since we parted, and we have so 
much to say to each other ! " Bernard exclaimed at 
last, and he accompanied this declaration with a 
laugh much more spontaneous than the one he had 
given a few moments before. 

It might have gratified him, however, to observe 
that his companion appeared to see no ground for 
joking in the idea that they should have a good deal 
to say to each other. 

** Yes, it 's a long time since we spent those pleas- 
ant weeks at Baden," she rejoined. *' Have you been 
there again ? " 

This was a question, and though it was a very sim* 
pie one, Bernard was charmed with it 

"I wouldn't go back for the world!" he said. 
" And you ? " 

"Would I go back? Oh yes; I thought it so 
agreeable." 

With this he was less pleased; he had expected 
the traces of resentment, and he was actually disap- 
pointed at not finding them. But here was the little 
house of which his companion had spoken, and it 
seemed, indeed, a rather bad one. That is, it was 
one of those diminutive structures which are known 
at French watering-places as " chalets," and, with an 
exiguity of furniture, are let for the season to families 



CONFIDENCB, 211 

that pride themselves upon their powers of contrac- 
tion. This one was a very humble specimen of its 
class^ though it was doubtless a not inadequate abode 
for two quiet and frugal women. It had a few inches 
of garden, and there were flowers in pots in the open 
windows, where some extremely fresh white curtains 
were gently fluttering in the breath of the neighbor- 
ing ocean. The little door stood wide open. 

"This is where we live," said Angela; and she 
stopped and laid her hand upon the little garden-gate. 

" It \s very fair," said Bernard. " I think it *s bet- 
ter than the pastry-cook's at Baden." 

They stood there, and she looked over the gate at 
the geraniums. She did not ask him to come in; 
but, on the other hand, keeping the gate closed, she 
made no movement to leave him. The Casino was 
now quite out of sight, and the whole place was per- 
fectly stilL Suddenly, turning her eyes upon Bernard 
with a certain strange inconsequence — 

'* I have not seen you here before," she observed. - 

He gave a little laugh. 

" I suppose it 's because I only amved this morn- 
ing. I think that if I had been here you would have 
noticed me." 

« You arrived this morning ? " 

" Three or four hours ago. So, if the remark were 
not in questionable taste, I should say we had not lost 
time." 



212 f^ONFIDENCE. 

"You may say what you please," said Angela, sim- 
ply. " Where did you come from ? " 

Interrogation, now it had come, was most satisfac* 
tory, and Bernard was glad to believe that there was 
an element of the unexpected in his answer. 

" From California." 

*^ You came straight from California to this place ? " 

" I arrived at Havre only yesterday." 

" And why did you come here ? " 

" It would be graceful of me to be able to answer 
^ — 'Because I knew you were here.' But unfor- 
tunately I did not know it It was a mere chance ; 
or rather, I feel like saying it was an inspiration." 

Angela looked at the geraniums again. 

"It was very singular," she said. "We might 
have been in so many places besides this ona And 
you might have come to so many places besides this 



one." 



" It is all the more singular, that one of the last 
persons I saw in America was your charming friend 
Blanche, who married Gordon Wright. She did n*t 
tell me you were here." 

"She had no reason to know it," said the girL 
" She is not my friend — as you are her husband's 
friend." 

"Ah no, I don't suppose that. But she might 
have heard from you." 

" She does n't hear from us. My mother used to 



CONFIDENCB. 213 

write to her for a while after she left Europe, but she 
has given it up." She paused a moment, and then 
she added — " Blanche is too silly ! *' 

Bernard noted tliis, wondering how it bore upon 
his theory of a spiteful element in his companion. 
Of course Blanche was silly ; but, equally of course, 
this young lady's perception of it was quickened by 
Blanche's having married a rich man whom she her- 
self might have married. 

" Gordon does n't think so," Bernard said. 

Angela looked at him a moment. 

" I am very glad to hear it," she rejoined, gently. 

" Yes, it is very fortunate." 

" Is he well ? " the girl asked. " Is he happy ? " 

" He has all the air of it." 

" I am very glad to hear it," she repeated. And 
then she moved the latch of the gate and passed in. 
At the same moment her mother appeared in the 
open door-way. Mrs. Vivian, had apparently been 
summoned by the sound of her daughter's colloquy 
with an unrecognized voice, and when she saw Ber- 
nard she gave a sharp little cry of surprise. Then 
she stood gazing at him. 

Since the dispersion of the little party at Baden- 
Baden he had not devoted much meditation to this 
conscientious gentlewoman who had been so ten- 
derly anxious to establish her daughter properly in 
life ; but there had been in his mind a tacit assump- 



214  

tion that if Angela deemed that he had played her a 
trick Mrs. Vivian's view of his conduct was not more 
charitabla He felt that he must have seemed to her 
veiy unkind, and that in so far as a well-regulated 
conscience permitted the exercise of unpractical 
passions, she honored him with a superior detestation. 
The instant he beheld her on her threshold this con- 
viction rose to the surface of his consciousness and 
made him feel that now, at least, his hour had come. 

" It is Mr. Longueville, whom we met at Baden," 
said Angela to her mother, gravely. 

Mrs. Vivian began to smile, and stepped down 
quickly toward the gate. 

"Ah, Mr. Longueville," she murmured, "it's so 
long — it 's so pleasant — it 's so strange — " 

And suddenly she stopped, stiU smiling. Her 
smile had an odd intensity ; she was trembling a 
little, and Bernard, who was prepared for hissing 
scorn, perceived with a deep, an almost violent, sur- 
prise, a touching agitation, an eager friendliness. 

" Yes, it 's very long," he said ; " it 's very pleasant. 
I have only just arrived ; I met Miss Vivian." 

" And you are not coming in ? " asked Angela's 
mother, very graciously. 

" Your daughter has not asked me ! " said Bernard. 

" Ah, my dearest," murmured Mrs. Vivian, looking 

at the girl 

Her daughter returned her glance, and then the 



CONhDENCE. 215 

elder lady paused again, and simply began to smile 
at Bernard, who recognized in her glance that queer 
little intimation — shy and cautious, yet perfectly 
discernible — of a desire to have a private under- 
standing with what he felt that she mentally termed 
his better nature, which he had more than once per- 
ceived at Baden-Baden. 

" Ah no, she has not asked me," Bernard repeated, 
laughing gently. 

Then Angela turned her eyes upon him, and the 
expression of those fine organs was strikingly agree- 
able. It had, moreover/the merit of being easily in- 
terpreted ; it said very plainly, " Please don't insist, 
but leave me alone." And it said it not at all sharply 
— very gently and pleadingly. Bernard found him- 
self understanding it so well that he literally blushed 
with intelligence. 

" Don't you come to the Casino in the evening, as 
you used to come to the Kursaal ? " he asked. 

Mrs. Vivian looked again at her daughter, who had 
passed into the door- way of the cottage ; then she 
said — 

" We will go this evening." 

" I shall look for you eagerly," Bernard rejoined, 
" Auf wiedersehen, as we used to say at Baden ! " 

Mrs. Vivian waved him a response over the gate, 
her daughter gave him a glance from the threshold, 
and he took his way back to his inn. 



X 



216  

He awaited the evening with great impatience; 
he fancied he had made a discovery, and he wished 
to confirm it. The discovery was that his idea that 
she bore him a grudge, that she was conscious of an 
injury, that he was associated in her mind with a 
wrong, had all been a morbid illusioa She had for- 
given, she had forgotten, she didn't care, she had 
possibly never cared I This, at least, was his theory 
now, and he longed for a little more light upon it. 
His old sense of her being a complex and intricate 
girl had, in that quarter of an hour of talk with her, 
again become lively, so that he was not absolutely 
sure his apprehensions had been vain. But, with his 
quick vision of things, he had got the impression, at 
any rate, that she had no vulgar resentment of any 
slight he might have put upon her, or any disadvan^ 
tage he might have caused her. Her feeling about 
such a matter would be large and original Bernard 
desired to see more of that, and in the evening, in 
fact, it seemed to him that he did so. 

The terrace of the Casino was far from offering 
the brilliant spectacle of the promenade in front of 
the gaming-rooms at Baden. It had neither the 
liberal illumination, the distinguished frequenters, 
nor the superior music which formed the attraction 
of that celebrated spot ; but it had a modest anima- 
tion of its own, in which the starlight on the 
open sea took the place of clustered lamps, and the 



 217 

mighty resonance of the waves performed the function 
of an orchestra. Mrs. Vivian made her appearance 
with her daughter, and Bernard, as he used to do at 
Baden, chose a corner to place some chairs for them. 
The crowd was small, for most of the visitors had 
compressed themselves into one of the rooms, where 
a shrill operetta was being performed by a strolling 
troupe. Mrs. Vivian's visit was a short one ; she 
remained at the Casino less than half an hour. But 
Bernard had some talk with Angela. He sat beside 
her — her mother was on the other side, talking with 
an old French lady whose acquaintance she had made 
on the beach. Between Bernard and Angela several 
things were said. When his friends went away Ber- 
nard walked home with them. He bade them good- 
night at the door of their chalet, and then slowly 
strolled back to the Casino. The terrace was nearly 
empty ; every one had gone to listen to the operetta, 
the sound of whose contemporary gayety came through 
the open, hot-looking windows in little thin quavera 
and catches. The ocean was rumbling just beneath ; 
it made a ruder but richer music. Bernard stood look- 
ing at it a-moment ; then he went down the steps to the 
beach. The tide was rather low ; he walked slowly 
down to the line of the breaking waves. The sea 
looked huge and black and simple ; eveiything was 
vague in the unassisted darkness. Bernard stood there 
some time ; there was nothing but the sound and the 



218  

sharp, fresh smelL Suddenly he put his hand to his 
heart ; it was beating very fast. An immense convic- 
tion had come over him — abruptly, then and there — 
and for a moment he held his breath. It was like a 
word spoken in the darkness — he held his breath to 
listen. He was in love with Angela Vivian, and his 
love was a throbbing passion ! He sat down on the 
stones where he stood — it filled hiYn with a kind of 
awe. 



XXL 

It filled him with a kind of awe, and the feeling 
was by no means agreeable. It was not a feeling to 
which even a man of Bernard Longueville's easy 
power of extracting the savour from a sensation could 
rapidly habituate Iiimself, and for the rest of that 
night it was far from making of our hero the happy 
man that a lover just coming to self-consciousness is 
supposed to be. It was wrong — it was dishonorable 
— it was impossible — and yet it toas; it was, as 
nothing in his own personal experience had ever 
been. He seemed hitherto to have been living by 
proxy, in a vision, in reflection — to have been an 
echo, a shadow, a futile attempt ; but this at last was 
life itself, this was a fact, this was reality. For these 
tilings one lived ; tliese were the things that people 
had died for. Love had been a fable before this — 
doubtless a very pretty one ; and passion had been a 
literary phrase — employed obviously with consider- 
able effect. But now he stood in a personal relation 
to these familiar ideas, which gave them a very much 
keener import ; they had laid the^ir hand upon him in 
the darkness, he felt it upon his shoulder, and he 



220  

knew by its pressure that it was the hand of destiny. 
What made this sensation a shock was the element 
that was mixed with it ; the fact that it came not 
simply and singly, but with an attendant shadow in 
which it immediately merged and lost itself. It was 
forbidden fruit — he knew it the instant he had 
touched it. He felt that he had pledged himself not 
to do just this thing which was gleaming before him 
so divinely — not to widen the crevice, not to open 
the door that would flood him with light. Friendship 
and honor were at stake ; they stood at his left hand, 
as his new-bom passion stood already at his right ; 
they claimed him as well, and their grasp had a 
pressure which might become acutely painful. The 
soul is a still more tender organism than the body, 
and it shrinks from the prospect of being subjected 
to violence. Violence — spiritual violence — was 
what our luxurious hero feared ; and it is not too 
much to say that as he lingered there by the sea, late 
into the night, while the gurgitation of the waves 
grew deeper to his ear, the prospect came to have an 
element of positive terror. The two faces of his sit- 
uation stood confronting each other ; it was a rigid, 
brutal opposition, and Bernard held his breath for a 
while with the wonder of what would come of it. 
He sat a long time upon the beach ; the night grew 
very cold, but he had no sense of it. Then he went 
away and passed before the Casino again, and wan- 



 221 

dered through the village. The Casino was shrouded 
in darkness and silence, and there was nothing in the 
streets of the little town but the salt smell of the 
sea, a vague aroma of fish and the distant sound of 
the breakers. Little by little, Bernard lost the feeling 
of having been startled, and began to perceive that 
he could reason about his trouble. Trouble it was, 
though this seems an odd name for the consciousness 
of a bright enchantment; and the first thing that 
reason, definitely consulted, told him about the mat- 
ter was that he had been in love with Angela Vivian 
any time these three years. This sapient faculty 
supplied him with further information ; only two or 
three of the items of which, however, it is necessary 
to reproduce. He had been a great fool — an incred- 
ible fool — not to have discovered before this what 
was the matter with him! Bernard's sense of hia 
own shrewdness — always tolerably acute — had never 
received such a bruise as this present perception that 
a great many things had been taking place in his 
clever mind without his clever mind suspecting theuL 
But it little mattered, his reason went on to declare, 
what he had suspected or what he might now feel 
about it ; his present business was to leave Blanquais- 
les-6alets at sunrise the next morning and never rest 
his' eyes upon Angela Vivian again. This was his 
duty; it had the merit of being perfectly plain and 
definite, easily apprehended, and unattended, as far 



222  

as he could discover, with the smallest material diffi- 
culties. Not only this, reason continued to remark ; 
but the moral difficulties were equally inconsiderable. 
He had never breathed a word of his passion to Miss 
Vivian — quite the contrary; he had never committed 
himself nor given her the smallest reason to suspect 
his hidden flame ; and he was therefore perfectly free 
to turn his back upon her — he could never incur the 
reproach of trifling with her affections. Bernard was 
in that state of mind when it is the greatest of bless- 
ings to be saved the distress of choice— ^ to see a 
straight path before you and to feel that you have 
only to follow it. Upon the straight path I have 
indicated, he fixed his eyes very hard ; of course he 
would take his departure at the earliest possible 
hour on the morrow. There was a streak of mom- 
ing in the eastern sky by the time he knocked for 
re-admittance at the door of the inn, which was 
opened to him by a mysterious old woman in a 
nightcap and meagre accessories, whose identity he 
failed to ascertain; and he laid himself down to 
rest — he was very tired — with his attention fast- 
ened, as I say, on the idea — on the very image — of 
departure. 

On waking up the next morning, rather late, he 
found, however, that it had attached itself to a very 
different object. His vision was filled with the 
brightness of the delightful fact itself, which seemed 



 223 

to impregnate the sweet morning air and to flutter in 
the light, fresh breeze that came through his open 
window from the sea. He saw a great patch of the 
sea between a couple of red-tiled roofs ; it was bluer 
than any sea had ever been before. He had not slept 
long — only three or four hours; but he had quite 
slept off his dread. The shadow had dropped away 
and nothing was left but the beauty of his love, 
which seemed to shine in the freshness of the early 
day. He felt absurdly happy — as if he had discov- 
ered El Dorado ; quite apart from consequences — he 
was not thinking of consequences, which of course 
were another affair — the feeling was intrinsically the 
finest one he hsA ever had, and — as a mere feeling — 
he had not done with it yet The consideration of 
consequences could easUy be deferred, and there 
would, meanwhile, be no injury to any one in his 
extracting, very quietly, a little subjective joy from 
the state of his heart. He would let the flower bloom 
for a day before plucking it up by the roots. Upon 
this latter course he was perfectly resolved, and in 
view of such an heroic resolution the subjective 
interlude appeared no more than his just privilege. 
The project of leaving Blanquais-les-Galets at nine 
o'clock in the morning dropped lightly from his 
mind, making no noise as it fell ; but another took its. 
place, which had an air of being still more excellent 
and which consisted of starting off on a long walk 



224  

and absenting himself for the day. Bernard grasped 
his stick and wandered away ; he climbed the great 
shoulder of the further cliff and found himself on the 
level downs. Here there was apparently no obstacle 
whatever to his walking as far as his fancy should 
carry him. The summer was still in a splendid 
mood, and the hot and quiet day — it was a Sunday 
— seemed to constitute a deep, silent smile on the 
face of nature. The sea glistened on one side, and 
the crops ripened on the other; the larks, losing 
themselves in the dense sunshine, made it ring here 
and there in undiscoverable spots ; this was the only 
sound save when Bernard, pausing now and then in 
his walk, found himself hearing far below him, at the 
base of the cliff, the drawling murmur of a wave. 
He walked a great many miles and passed through 
half a dozen of those rude fishing-hamlets, lodged in 
some sloping hollow of the cliffs, so many of which, 
of late years, all along the Norman coast, have 
adorned themselves with a couple of hotels and a 
row of bathing-machines. He walked so far that the 
shadows had begun to lengthen before he bethought 
himself of stopping ; the afternoon had come on and 
had already begun to wane. The grassy downs still 
stretched before him, shaded here and there with 
shallow but windless dells. He looked for the softest 
place and then flung himself down on the grass ; he 
lay there for a long time, thinking of many things. 



 225 

He had determined to give himself up to a day's 
happiness ; it was happiness of a very harmless kind 
— the satisfaction of thought, the bliss of mere con- 
sciousness ; but such as it was it did not elude him 
nor turn bitter in his heart, and the long summer day 
closed upon him before his spirit, hovering in per- 
petual circles round the idea of what might be, had 
begun to rest its wing. When he rose to his feet 
again it was too late to return to Blanquais in the 
same way that he had come; the evening was at 
hand, the light was already fading, and the walk he 
had taken was one which even if he had not felt very 
tired, he would have thought it imprudent to attempt 
to repeat in the darkness. He made his way to the 
nearest village, where he was able to hire a rustic 
carriole, in which primitive conveyance, gaining the 
high-road, he jogged and jostled through the hours of 
the evening slowly back to his starting-point. It 
wanted an hour of midnight by the time he reached 
his inn, and there was nothing left for him but to go 
to bed. 

He went in the unshaken faith that he should 
leave Blanquais early on the morrow. But early on 
the morrow it occurred to him that it would be sim- 
ply grotesque to go off without taking leave of Mrs. 
Vivian and her daughter, and oflFering them some 
explanation of his intention. He had given them to 
understand that, so delighted was he to find them 

15 



226  

there, he would remain at Blanquais at least as long 
as they. He must have seemed to them wanting in 
civility, to spend a whole bright Sunday without 
apparently troubling his head about them, and if the 
unlucky fact of his being in love with the girl were a 
reason for doing his duty, it was at least not a reason 
for being rude. He had not yet come to that — to 
accepting rudeness as an incident of virtue ; it had 
always been his theory that virtue had the best man- 
ners in the world, and he flattered himself at any 
rate that he could guard his integrity without making 
himself ridiculous. So, at what he thought a proper 
hour, in the course of the morning, he retraced his 
steps along the little lane through which, two days 
ago, Angela Vivian had shown him the way to her 
mother's door. At this humble portal he knocked ; 
the windows of the little chalet were open, and the 
white curtains, behind the flower-pots, were fluttering 
as he had seen them before. The door was opened 
by a neat young woman, who informed him very 
promptly that Madame and Mademoiselle had left 
Blanquais a couple of hours earlier. They had gone 
to Paris — yes, very suddenly, taking with them but 
little luggage, and they had left her — she had the 
honor of being the femme de chambre of ces dames 
— to put up their remaining possessions and follow 
as soon as possible. On Bernard's expressing sur- 
prise and sayiug that he had supposed tliem to be 



 227 

fixed at the sea-side for the rest of the season^ the 
femme de chambre, who seemed a very inteUigent 
person, h^ged to remind him that the season was 
drawing to a close, that Madame had taken the chalet 
but for five weeks, only ten days of which period 
were yet to expire, that ces dames, as Monsieur per- 
haps knew, were great travellers, who had been half 
over the world and thought nothing of breaking 
camp at an hour's notice, and that, in fine, Madame 
might very well have received a telegram summoning 
W to another part of the country. 

'' And where have the ladies gone ? " asked Ber- 
nard. 

" For the moment, to Paris." 

" And in Paris where have they gone ?" 

''DavMy chez dies — to their house," said the 
femme de chambre, who appeared to think that Ber- 
nard asked too many questions. 

But Bernard persisted. 

" Where is their house ? " 

The waiting-maid looked at him from head to foot. 

" If Monsieur wishes to write, many of Msuiame's 
letters come to her banker," she said, inscrutably. 

" And who is her banker ? " 

" He lives in the Bue de Provence." 

" Very good — I will find him out," said our hero, 
turning away. 

The discriminating reader who has been so good as 



228  

to interest himself in this little narrative will per- 
haps at this point exclaim with a pardonable con- 
sciousness of shrewdness : " Of course he went the 
next day to the Kue de Provence ! " Of course, yes ; 
only as it happens Bernard did nothing of the kind. 
He did one of the most singular things he ever did 
in his life — a thing that puzzled him even at the 
time, and with regard to which he often afterward 
wondered whence he had drawn the ability for so 
remarkable a feat — he simply spent a fortnight at 
Blanquais-les-Galets. It was a very quiet fortnight ; 
he spoke to no one, he formed no relations, he was 
company to himself. It may be added that he had 
never found his own company half so good. He 
struck himself as a reasonable, delicate fellow, who 
looked at things in such a way as to make him re- 
frain — refrain successfully, that was the point — 
from concerning himself practically about Angela 
Vivian. His saying that he would find out the 
banker in the Kue de Provence hsui been for the 
benefit of the femme de chambre, whom he thought 
rather impertinent ; he had really no intention what- 
ever of entering that classic thoroughfare. He took 
long walks, rambled on the beach, along the base of 
the cliffs and among the brown sea-caves, and he 
thought a good deal of certain incidents which have 
figured at an earlier stage of this narrative. He had 
forbidden himself the future, as an object of contem- 



 229 

plation, and it was therefore a matter of necessity 
that his imagination should take refuge among the 
warm and familiar episodes of the past. He won- 
dered why Mrs. Vivian should have left the place so 
suddenly, and was of course struck with the analogy 
between this incident and her abrupt departure from 
Baden. It annoyed him, it troubled him, but it by 
no means rekindled the alarm he had felt on first 
perceiving the injured Angela on the beach. That 
alarm had been quenched by Angela's manner during 
the hour that followed and during their short talk in 
the evening. This evening was to be forever memo- 
rable, for it had brought with it the revelation which 
still, at moments, suddenly made Bernard tremble ; 
but it had also brought him the assurance that Angela 
cared as little as possible for anything that a chance 
acquaintance might have said about her. It is all 
the more singular, therefore, that one evening, after 
he had been at Blanquais a fortnight, a train of 
thought should suddenly have been set in motion in 
his mind. It was kindled by no outward occurrence, 
but by some wandering spark of fancy or of memory, 
and the immediate effect of it was to startle our hero 
very much as he had been startled on the evening I 
have described. The circumstances were the same ; 
he had wandered down to the beach alone, very late, 
and he stood looking at the duskily-tumbling sea. 
Suddenly the same voice that had spoken before 






230  

munnured aDother- phrase in the darkness, and it 
rang upon bis ear for the rest of the night. It 
startled him, as I have said, at first ; then, the next 
morning, it led him to take his departure for Paris. 
During the journey it lingered in his ear ; he sat in 
the corner of the railway-carriage with his eyes 
closed, abstracted, on purpose to prolong the rever- 
beration. If it were not true it was at least, as the 
Italians have it, hen trovato, and it was wonderful 
how well it bore thinking of. It beara telling less 
well ; but I can at least give a hint of it. The 
theory that Angela hated him had evaporated in her 
presence, and another of a very different sort had 
sprung into being. It fitted a great many of the 
facts, it explained a great many contradictions, anom- 
alies, mysteries, and it accounted for Miss Vivian's 
insisting upon her mother's leaving Blanquais at a 
few hours' notice, even better than the theory of her 
resentment could have done. At any rate, it obliter- 
ated Bernard's scruples veiy effectually, and led him 
on his arrival in Paris to repair instantly to the Eue 
de Provence. This street contains more than one 
banker, but there is one with whom Bernard deemed 
Mrs. Vivian most likely to have dealings. He found 
he had reckoned rightly, and he had no difficulty in 
procuring her euldress. Having done so, however, he 
by no means went immediately to see her ; he waited 
a couple of days — perhaps to give those obliterated 



 231 

scruples I have spoken of a chance to revive. They 
kept very quiet, and it must be confessed that Ber- 
nard took no great pains to recall them to life. After 
he had been in Paris three days« he knocked at Mrs. 
Vivian's door. 



XXII. 

It was opened by the little waiting-maid whom he 
had seen at Blanquais, and who looked at him very 
hard before she answered his inquiry. 

"You see I have found Mrs. Vivian's dwelling, 
though you would n*t give me the address," Bernard 
said to her, smiling. 

" Monsieur has put some time to it ! " the young 
woman answered dryly. And she informed him that 
Madame was at home, though Mademoiselle, for 
whom he had not asked, was not. 

Mrs. Vivian occupied a diminutive apartment at 
the summit of one of the tall white houses which 
ornament the neighborhood of the Arc de Triomphe. 
The early days of September had arrived, but Paris 
was still a city of absentees. The weather was warm 
and charming, and a certain savour of early autumn 
in the air was in accord with the somewhat melan- 
choly aspect of the empty streets and closed shutters 
of this honorable quarter, where the end of the mon- 
umental vistas seemed to be curtained with a hazy 
emanation from the Seine. It was late in the after- 
noon when Bernard was ushered into Mrs. Vivian's 



 233 

little high-nestling drawing-room, and a patch of 
sunset tints, faintly red, rested softly upon the 
gilded wall. Bernard had seen these ladies only 
in borrowed and provisional abodes ; but here was 
a place where they were really living and which 
was stamped with their tastes, their habits, their 
charm. The little salon was very elegant; it con- 
tained a multitude of pretty things, and it appeared 
to Bernard to be arranged in perfection. The long 
windows — the ceiling being low, they were really 
very short — opened upon one of those solid bal- 
conies, occupying the width of the apartment, which 
are often in Paris a compensation for living up five 
flights of stairs, and this balcony was filled with 
flowers and cushions. Bernard stepped out upon it 
to await the coming of Mrs. Vivian, and, as she was 
not quick to appear, he had time to see that his 
friends enjoyed a magnificent view. They looked up 
at the triumphal Arch, which presented itself at a 
picturesque angle, and near the green tree-tops of the 
Champs Elys^es, beyond which they caught a broad 
gleam of the Seine and a glimpse, blue in the dis- 
tance, of the great towers of Notre Dame. The 
whole vast city lay before them and beneath them, 
with its ordered brilliancy and its mingled aspect of 
compression and expansion ; and yet the huge Pari- 
sian murmur died away before it reached Mrs. 
Vivian's sky-parlor, which seemed to Bernard the 



234  

brightest and quietest little habitation he had ever 
known. 

His hostess came rustling in at last; she seemed 
agitated : she knocked over with the skirt of her 
dress a little gilded chair which was reflected in the 
polished jparquet as in a sheet of looking-glass. Mrs. 
Vivian had a fixed smile — she hardly knew, what to 
say. 

" I found your address at the banker's," said Ber- 
nard. "Your maid, at Blanquais, refused to give it 
to me." 

Mrs. Vivian gave him a little look — there was 
always more or less of it in her face — which seemed 
equivalent to an entreaty that her interlocutor should 
spare her. 

" Maids are so strange," she murmured ; " especially 
the Fifench I " 

It pleased Bernard for the moment not to spare 
her, though he felt a sort of delight of kindness for 
her. 

" Your going off from Blanquais so suddenly, with- 
out leaving me any explanation, any clue, any mes- 
sage of any sort — made me feel at first as if you 
did n*t wish that T should look you up. It reminded 
me of the way you left Baden — do you remember ? 
— three years ago." 

"Baden was so charming — but one couldn't stay 
forever," said Mrs. Vivian. 



 235 

'' I had a sort of theory one could. Our life was 
so pleasant that it seemed a shame to break the spell, 
and if no one had moved I am sure we might be sit- 
ting there now." 

Mrs. Vivian stared, still with her little fixed smile. 
. " I think we should have had bad weather." 

"Very likely," said Bernard, laughing. "Nature 
would have grown jealous of our good-humor — of 
our tranquil happiness. And after all, here we are 
together again — that is, some of us. But I have 
only my own audacity to thank for it I was quite 
free to believe that you were not at all pleased to 
see me re-appear — and it is only because I am not 
easy to discourage — am indeed probably a rather 
impudent fellow — that I have ventured to come 
here to-day." 

" I am very glad to see you re-appear, Mr. Longue- 
ville," Mrs. Vivian declared with the accent of ve- 
racity. 

" It was your daughter's idea, then, running away 
from Blanquais ? " \ 

Mrs. Vivian lowered her eyes. 

"We were obliged to go to Fontainebleau. We 
have but just come back. I thought of writing to 
you," she softly added. 

" Ah, what pleasure that would have given me ! " 

"I me^n, to tell you where we were, and that we 
should nSve been so happy to see you." 



236  

"I thank you for the intention. I suppose your 
daughter would n't let you carry it out." 

" Angela is so peculiar," Mrs. Vivian said, simply. 

*' You told me that the first time I saw you," 

" Yes, at Siena," said Mrs. Vivian. 

"I am glad to hear you speak frankly of that 
place ! " 

" Perhaps it 's better," Mrs. Vivian murmured. 
She got up and went to the window ; then stepping 
upon the balcony, she looked Aown a moment into 
the street. " She will come back in a moment," she 
said, coming into the room again. '' She has gone to 
see a friend who lives just beside us. We don't 
mind about Siena now," she added, softly. 

Bernard understood her — understood this to be a 
retraction of the request she had made of him at 
Baden. 

"Dear little woman," he said to himself, "she 
wants to marry her daughter still — only now she 
wants to marry her to me ! " 

He wished to show her that he understood her, 
and he was on the point of seizing her hand, to do 
he did n't know what — to hold it, to press it, to kiss 
it — when he heard the sharp twang of the bell at 
the door of the little apartment. 

Mrs. Vivian fluttered away. 

" It 's Angela," she cried, and she stood there wait- 
ing and listening, smiling at Bernard, with her hand- 
kerchief pressed to her lips. 



 237 

In a moment the girl came into the drawing-room, 
but on seeing Bernard she stopped, with her hand on 
the door-knob. Her mother went to her and kissed 
her. 

" It 's Mr. Longueville, dearest — he has found us 
out." 

" Found us out ? " repeated Angela, with a little 
laugh. " What a singular expression ! " 

She was blushing as she had blushed when she first 
saw him at Blanquais. She seemed to Bernard now 
to have a great and peculiar brightness — something 
she had never had before. 

" I certainly have been looking for you," he said. 
" I was greatly disappointed when I found you had 
taken flight from Blanquais." 

"Taken flight?" She repeated his words as she 
had repeated her mother's. *' That is also a strange 
way of speaking ! " 

" I don't care what I say," said Bernard, " so long 
as I make you understand that I have wanted very 
much to see you again, and that I have wondered 
every day whether I might venture — " 

" I don't know why you should n*t venture ! " she 
interrupted, giving her little laugh again. " We are 
not so terrible, are we, mamma ? — that is, when once 
you have climbed our five flights of stairs." 

" I came up very fast,*' said Bernard, " and I find 
your apartment magnificent" 



238  

*' Mr. Longaeville must come again^ must he not, 
dear ? " asked mamma. 

"I shall come very often, with your leave," Ber- 
nard declared. 

'' It will be immensely kind/' said Angela, looking 
away. 

*• I am not sure that you will think it that." 

" I don*t know what you are trying to prove," said 
Angela ; " first that we ran away from you, and then 
that we are not nice to our visitors." 

" Oh no, not that ! " Bernard exclaimed ; " for I 
assure you I shall not care how cold you are with 
me. 

She walked away toward another door, which was 
masked with a curtain that she lifted. 

'* I am glad to hear that, for it gives me courage to 
say that I am very tired, and that I beg you will ex- 
cuse me." 

She glanced at him a moment over her shoulder; 
then she passed out, dropping the curtain. 

Bernard stood there face to face with Mrs. Vivian, 
whose eyes seemed to plead with him more than ever. 
In his own there was an excited smile. 

"Please don*t mind that," she murmured. "I 
know it 's true that she is tired.' 

" Mind it, dear lady ? " cried the young man. " I 
delight in it. It 's just what I like." 

" Ah, she 's very peculiar I " sighed Mrs. Vivian, 



 239 

*" She is strange — yes. But I think I understand 

her a little." 

" You must come back to-morrow, theiL" 

" I hope to have many to-morrows ! " cried Bernard 

as he took his departure. 



XXIII. 

And he had them in fact. He called the next day 
at the same hour, and he found the mother and the 
daughter together in their pretty salon. Angela was 
very gentle and gracious ; he suspected Mrs. Vivian 
had given her a tender little lecture upon the manner 
in which she had received him the day before. After 
he had been there five minutes, Mrs. Vivian took a 
decanter of water that was standing upon a table and 
went out on the balcony to irrigate her flowers. Ber- 
nard watched her a while from his place in the room ; 
then she moved along the balcony and out of sight. 
Some ten minutes elapsed without her re-appearing, 
and then Bernard stepped to the threshold of the win- 
dow and looked for her. She was not there, and as 
he came and took his seat near Angela again, he an- 
nounced, rather formally, that Mrs. Vivian had passed 
back into one of the other windows. 

Angela was silent a moment — then she said — 

" Should you like me to call her ? " 

She was very peculiar — that was very true; yet 
Bernard held to his declaration of the day before that 
he now understood her a little. 



 24J 

" No, I don't desire it," he said. " I wish to see 
you alone; I have something particular to say to 
you." 

She turned her face toward him, and there was 
something in its expression that showed him that he 
looked to her more serious than he had ever looked. 
He sat down again ; for some moments he hesitated 
to go on. 

" You frighten me/' she said laughing ; and in spite 
of her laugh this was obviously true. 

" I assure you my state of mind is anything but 
formidabla I am afraid of you^ on the contrary ; I 
am humble and apologetic." 

"I am sorry for that," said Angela. "I paiticu- 
larly dislike receiving apologies, even when I know 
what they are for. What yours are for, I can't im- 
agine." 

"You don't dislike me — you don't hate me?" 
Bernard suddenly broke out 

"You don't ask me that humbly. Excuse me 
therefore if I say I have other, and more practical, 
things to do." 

"You despise me," said Bernard. 

"That is not humble either, for you .seem to insist 
upon it." 

"It would be after all a way of thinking of me, 
and I have a reason for wishing you to do that." 

"I remember very well that you used to have a 

16 



242  

reason for everything. It was not always a good 



one. 



" This one is excellent," said Bernard, gravely. " I 
have been in love with you for three years." 

She got up slowly, turning away. 

" Is that what you wished to say to me ? '* 

She went toward the open window, and he followed 
her. 

" I hope it does n't offend you. I don't say it lightly 
— it 's not a piece of gallantry. It 's the very truth 
of my being. I did n.*t know it till lately — strange 
as that may seem. I loved you long before I knew 
it — before I ventured or presumed to know it. I 
was thinking of you when I seemed to myself to be 
thinking of other things. It is very strange — there 
are things in it I don't understand. I travelled over 
the world, I tried to interest, to divert myself; but at 
bottom it was a perfect failure. To see you again — 
that was what I wanted. When I saw you last month 
at Blanquais I knew it ; then everything became clear. 
It was the answer to the riddle. I wished to read it 
very clearly — I wished to be sure ; therefore I did n't 
follow you immediately. I questioned my heart — I 
cross-questioned it. It has borne the examination, 
and now I am sure. I am very sure. I love you as 
my life — I beg you to listen to me ! " 

She had listened — she had listened intently, look- 
ing straight out of the window and without moving. 



 243 

" You have seen very little of me," she said, pres- 
ently, turning her illuminated eye on him. 

"I have seen enough," Bernard added, smiling. 
"You must remember that at Baden I 'saw a good 
deal of you." 

" Yes, but that did n't make you like me. I don't 
understand." 

Bernard stood there a moment, frowning, with his 
eyes lowered. 

" I can imagine that. But I think I can explain." 

"Don't explain now," said Angela. "You have 
said enough; explain some other time." And she 
went out on the balcony. 

Bernard, of course, in a moment was beside her, 
and, disregarding her injunction, he began to explain. 

" I thought I disliked you — but I have come to the 
conclusion it was just the contrary. In reality I was 
in love with you. I had been so from the first time 
I saw you — when I made that sketch of you at 
Siena." 

" That in itself needs an explanation. I was not 
at all nice then — I was very rude, very perverse. I 
was horrid ! " 

" Ah, you admit it ! " cried Bernard, with a sort of 
quick elation. 

She had been pale, but she suddenly blushed. 

" Your own conduct was singular, as I remember it. 

# 

It was not exactly agreeable." 



244  

*' Perhaps not ; but at least it was meant to be. I 
did n't know how to please you then, and I am far 
from supposing that I have learned now. But I 
entreat you to give me a chance." 

She was silent a while ; her eyes wandered over the 
great prospect of Paris. 

" Do you know how you can please me now ? " she 
said, at last. *' By leaving me alone." 

Bernard looked at her a moment, then came straight 
back into the drawing-room and took his hat. 

" You see I avail myself of the first chance. But I 
shall come back to-morrow." 

" I am greatly obliged to you for what you have 
said. Such a speech as that deserves to be listened 
to with consideration. You may come back to-mor- 
row," Angela added. 

On the morrow, when he came back, she received 
him alone. 

" How did you know, at Baden, that I did n't like 
you ? " he asked, as soon as she would allow him. 

She smiled, very gently. 

" You assured me yesterday that you did like me." 

" I mean that I supposed I did n't How did you 
know that ? " 

" I can only say that I observed." 

" You must have observed very closely, for, super- 
ficially, I rather had the air of admiring you," said 
Bernard. 



 245 

" It was very superficial." 

" You don't mean that ; for, after all, that is just 
what my admiration, my interest in you, were not. 
They were deep, they were latent. They were not 
superficial — they were subterranean." 

" You are contradicting yourself, and I am perfectly 
consistent," said Angela. " Your sentiments were so 
well hidden that I supposed I displeased you." 

" I remember that at B.iden, you used to contradict 
yourself," Bernard answered. 

" You have a terrible memory ! " 

*' Don't call it terrible, for it sees everything now 
in a charming light — in the light of this understand- 
ing that we have at last arrived at, which seems to 
shine backward — to shine fuU on those Baden days." 

"Have we at last arrived at an understanding?" 
she asked, with a grave directness which Bernard 
thought the most beautiful thing he had ever seen. 

" It only depends upon you," he declared ; and then 
he broke out again into a protestation of passionate 
tenderness. " Don't put me oflf this time," he cried. 
" You have had time to think about it ; you have had 
time to get over the surprise, the shock. I love you, 
and I offer you everything that belongs to me in this 
world." As she looked at him with her dark, clear 
eyes, weighing this precious vow and yet not com- 
mitting herself — "Ah, you don't forgive me!" he 
murmured. 



246  

She gazed at him with the same solemn brightness. 

" What have I to forgive you ? " 

This question seemed to him enchanting. He 
reached forward and took her hands, and if Mrs. 
Vivian had come in she would have seen him kneel- 
ing at her daughter's feet. 

But Mrs. Vivian remained in seclusion, and Bernard 
saw her only the next time he came. 

" I am very happy, because I think my daughter is 
happy," she said. 

" And what do you think of me ? " 

" I think you are very clever. You must promise 
me to be very good to her." 

" I &,m clever enough to promise that." 

" I thiiik you are good enough to keep it," said Mrs. 
Vivian. She looked as happy as she said, and her 
happiness gave her a communicative, confidential 
tendency. "It is very strange how things come 
about — how the wheel turns round," she went on. 
" I suppose there is no harm in my telling you that I 
believe she always cared for you." 

" Why did n't you tell me before ? " said Bernard, 
with almost filial reproachfulness. 

" How could I ? I don't go about the world offer- 
ing my daughter to people — especially to indifferent 
people." 

"At Baden you didn't think I was indifferent. 
You were afraid of my not being indifferent enough." 



 247 

Mrs. Vivian colored. 

" Ah, at Baden I was a little too anxious ! " 

" Too anxious I should n*t speak to your daughter ! " 
said Bernard, laughing. 

" At Baden," Mrs. Vivian went on, " I had views. 
But I have n't any now — I have given them up." 

" That makes your acceptance of me very flatter- 
ing ! " Bernard exclaimed, laughing stiU more gaily. 

" I have something better," said Mrs. Vivian, laying 
her finger-tips on his arm. " I have confidence." 

Bernard did his best to encourage this gracious 
sentiment, and it seemed to him that there was some- 
thing yet to be done to implant it more firmly in 
Angela's, breast. 

" I have a confession to make to you," he said to 
her one day. " I wish you would listen to it" 

" Is it something very horrible ? " Angela asked. 

"Something very horrible indeed. I once did you 
an injury." 

" An injury ? " she repeated, in a tone which seemed 
to reduce the offence to contemptible proportions by 
simple vagueness of mind about it. 

" I don't know what to call it," said Bernard. " A 
poor service — an ill-turn." 

Angela gave a shrug, or rather an imitation of a 
shrug ; for she was not a shrugging person. 

" I never knew it" 

" I misrepresented you to Gordon Wright," Bernard 
went on. 



248  

" Why do you speak to me of him ? " she asked 
rather sadly. 

" Does it displease you ? " 

She hesitated a little. 

"Yes, it displeases me. If your confession has 
anything to do with him/ 1 would rather not hear it." 

Bernard returned to the subject another time — he 
had plenty of opportunities. He spent a portion of 
every day in the company of these dear women ; and 
these days were the happiest of his life. The autumn 
weather was warm and soothing, the qtiartier was still 
deserted, and the uproar of the great city, which 
seemed a hundred miles away, reached them through 
the dense October air with a softened and muffled 
sound. The evenings, however, were growing cool, 
and before long they lighted the first fire of the sea- 
son in Mrs. Vivian's heavily draped little chimney- 
piece. On this occasion Bernard sat there with 
Angela, watching the bright crackle of the wood and 
feeling that the charm of winter nights had begun. 
These two young persons were alone together in the 
gathering dusk ; it was the hour before dinner, before 
the lamp had been lighted. 

" I insist upon making you my confession," said 
Bernard. " I shall be very unhappy until you let me 
do it." 

" Unhappy ? You are the happiest of men." 

" I lie upon roses, if you will ; but this memory. 



 249 

this remorse, is a folded rose-leaf. I was completely 
mistaken about you at Baden ; I thought all manner 
of evil of you — or at least I said it." 

" Men are dull creatures," said Angela. 

" I think they are. So much so that, as I look 
back upon that time, there are some things I don't 
understand even now." 

*' I don't see why you should look back. People in 
our position are supposed to look forward." 

" You don't like those Baden days yourself," said 
Bernard. " You don't like to think of them." 

"What a wonderful discovery!" 

Bernard looked at her a moment in the brighten- 
ing fire-light. 

" What part was it you tried to play there ? " 

Angela shook her head. 

" Men are dull creatures." 

"I have already granted that, and I am eating 
humble pie in asking for an explanation." 

" What did you say of me ? " Angela asked, after a 
silence. 

*' I said you were a coquette. Eemember that I 
am simply historical." ' 

She got up and stood in front of the fire, having 
her hand on the chimney-piece and looking down at 
the blaze. For some moments she remained there. 
Bernard could not see her fape. 

" I said you were a dangerous woman to marry," 



250  

he went on deliberately. " I said it because I thought 
it. I gave pordon an opinion about you — it was a 
very unfavorable one. I could n't make you out — 
I thought you were playing a double part. I believed 
that you were ready to marry him, and yet I saw — 
I thought I saw — " and Bernard paused again. 

" What did you see ? " and Angela turned toward 
him. 

"That you were encouraging me — playing with 
me." 

" And you did n*t like that ? " 

"I liked it immensely — for myself! But didn't 
like it for Gordon ; and I must do myself the justice 
to say that I thought more of him than of myself." 

"You were an excellent friend," said Angela, 
simply. 

" I believe I was. And I am so still," Bernard 
added. 

She shook her head sadly. 

" Poor Mr. Wright ! " 

" He is a dear good fellow," said Bernard. 

" Thoroughly good, and dear, doubtless to his wife, 
the affectionate Blanche." 

"You don't like him — you don'.t like her," said 
Bernard. 

" Those are two very different matters. I am very 
sorry for Mr. Wright." 

" You need n't be that He is doing very well" 



 251 

"So you have already informed me. But I am 
sorry for him, all the same." 

"That doesn't answer my question," Bernard ex- 
claimed, with a certain irritation. " What part were 
you playing ? " 
, " What part do you think ? " 

" Have n*t I told you I gave it up, long ago ? " 

Angela stood with her back to the fire, looking at 
him ; her hands were locked behind her. 

" Did it ever strike you that my position at Baden 
was a charming one ? — knowing that I had been 
handed over to you to be put under the microscope 
— like an insect with a pin stuck through it ! " 

" How in the world did you know it ? I thought 
we were particularly careful." 

" How can a woman help knowing such a thing ? 
She guesses it — she discovers it by instinct; espe- 
cially if she be a proud woman." 

" Ah," said Bernard, " if pride ii3 a source of in- 
fonnation, you must be a prodigy of knowledge !" 

" I don't know that you are particularly humble ! " 
the girl retorted. " The meekest and most submis- 
sive of her sex would not have consented to have 
such a bargain as that made about her — such a trick 
played upon her ! " 

"My dearest Angela, it was no bargain — no 
trick ! " Bernard interposed. 

" It was a clumsy trick — it was a bad bargain 1 " 



252  

she declared At any rate I hated it — I hated the 
idea of your pretending to pass judgment upon me ; 
of your having come to Baden for the purpose. It 
was as if Mr. Wright had been buying a horse and 
you had undertaken to put me through my paces ! " 

" I undertook nothing — I declined to undertake." 

" You certainly made a study of me — and I was 
determined you should get your lesson wrong. I de- 
termined to embarrass, to mislead, to defeat you. Or 
rather, I did n't determine ; I simply obeyed a 
natural impulse of self-defence — the impulse to 
evade the fierce light of criticism. I wished to put 
you in the wrong." 

" You did it all very welL You put me admirably 
in the wrong." 

^ The only justification for my doing it at all was 
my doing it well," said Angela. 

" You were justified then ! You must have hated 
me fiercely." 

She turned her back to him and stood looking at 
the fire again. 

" Yes, there are some things that I did that can be 
accounted for only by an intense aversion." 

She said this so naturally that in spite of a certain 
theory that was touched upon a few pages back, 
Bernard was a good deal bewildered. He rose from 
the sofa where he had been lounging and went and 
stood beside her a moment Then he passed his arm 



 253 

round her waist and munnured an almost tim- 
orous — 

" EeaUy ? " 

" I don't know what you are trying to make me 
say ! " she answered. 

He looked down at her for a moment as he held 
her close to him. 

" I don't see, after all, why I should wish to make 
you say it It would only make my remorse more 
acute." 

She was musing, with her eyes on the fire, and for 
a moment she made ]\o answer ; then, as if her atten- 
tion were returning — 

" Are you still talking about your remorse ? " she 
asked. 

" You see I put it very strongly." 

" That I was a horrid creature ? " 

" That you were not a woman to marry." 

"Ah, my poor Bernard," said Angela, "I can't 
attempt to prove to you that you are not inconsis- 
tent ! " 

The month of September drew to a close, and she 
consented to fix a day for their wedding. The last 
of October was the moment selected, and the selection 
was almost all that was wanting to Bernard's happi- 
ness. I say " almost," for there was a solitary spot in 
his consciousness which felt numb and dead — unper- 
vaded by the joy with which the rest of his spirit 



254  

seemed to thrill and tingle. The removal of this 
hard grain in the sweet savour of life was needed to j 

complete his felicity. Bernard felt that he had made 
the necessary excision when, at the end of the month, 
he wrote to Gordon Wright of his engagement. He 
had been putting off the performance of this duty 
from day to day — it seemed so hard to accomplish 
it gracefully. He did it at the end very briefly ; it 
struck him that this was the best way. Three days 
after he had sent his letter there anived one from 
Gordon himself, informing Bernard that he had sud- 
denly determined to bring Blanche to Europe. She 
was not well, and they would lose no time. They 
were to sail within a week after his writing. The S 

letter contained a postscript — " Captain Lovelock 
comes with us." 



XXIV. 

Bernard prepared for Gordon's arrival in Paris, 
which, according to his letter, would take place in a 
few days. He was not intending to stop in England ; 
Blanche desired to proceed immediately to the 
French capital, to confer with her man-milliner, after 
which it was probable that they would go to Italy or 
to the East for the winter. " I have given her a 
choice of Eome or the Nile," said Gordon, " but she 
tells me she does n't care a fig where we go." 

I say that Bernard prepared to receive his friends, 
and I mean that he prepared morally — or even in- 
tellectually. Materially speaking, he could simply 
hold himself in readiness to engage an apartment at 
a hotel and to go to meet them at the station. He 
expected to hear from Gordon as soon as this inter- 
esting trio should reach England, but the first noti- i 
fication he received came from a Parisian hotel. It 
came to him in the shape of a very short note, in 
the morning, shortly before lunch, and was to the 
effect that his friends had alighted in the Eue de la 
Paix the night before. 

"We were tired, and I have slept late," said 



J 



256  

Gordon; "otherwise you should have he^d from 
me earlier. Come to lunch, if possible. I want ex- 
tremely to see you." 

Bernard, of course, made a point of going to lunch. 
In as short a time as possible he found himself in 
Gordon's sitting-room at the Hotel Middlesex. The 
table was laid for the midday repast, and a gentleman 
stood with his back to the door, looking out of the 
window. As Bernard came in, this gentleman turned 
and exhibited the ambrosial beard, the symmetrical 
shape, the monocular appendage, of Captain Lovelock. 

The Captain screwed his glass into his eye, and 
greeted Bernard in his usual fashion — that is, as if 
he had parted with him overnight 

"Oh, good morning! Beastly morning, isn't it? 
I suppose you are come to luncheon — I have come 
to luncheon. It ought to be on table, you know — 
it's nearly two o'clock. But I dare say you have 
noticed foreigners are never punctual — it's only 
English servants that are punctual. And they don't 
understand luncheon, you know — they can't make 
out our eating at this sort of hour. You know they 
always dine so beastly early. Do you remember the 
soi*t of time they used to dine at Baden ? — half-past 
five, half-past six ; some unearthly hour of that kind. 
That 's the sort of time you dine in America. I found 
they 'd invite a man at half -past six. That 's what I 
call being in a hurry for your food. You know they 



 257 

always accuse the Americans of making a rush for 
their victuals. I am bound to say that in New York, 
and that sort of place, the victuals were very good 
when you got them. I hope you don't mind my say- 
ing anything about America ? You know the Am- 
ericans are so deucedly thin-skinned — they always 
bristle up if you say anything against their institu- 
tions. The English don't care a rap what you say — 
they've got a different sort of temper, you know. 
With the Americans I'm deuced careful — I never 
breathe a word about anything. While I was over 
there I went in for being complimentary. I laid it 
on thick, and I found they would take all I could 
give them. I did n't see much of their institutions, 
after all ; I went in for seeing the people. Some of 
the people were charming — upon my soul, I was 
surprised at some of the people. I dare say you 
know some of the people I saw ; they were as nice 
people as you would see anywhere. There were 
always a lot of people about Mrs. Wright, you 
know ; they told me they were all the best people. 
You know she is always late for everything. She 
always comes in after every one is there — looking so 
devilish pretty, pulling on her gloves. She wears the 
longest gloves I ever saw in my life. Upon my word, 
if they don't come, I think I will ring the bell and 
ask the waiter what 's the matter. Would n't you ring 
the bell ? It *8 a great mistake, their trying to carry 

17 



258  

out their ideas of lunching. That 's Wright's char- 
acter, you know; he's always trying to carry out 
some idea. When I am abroad, I go in for the for- 
eign breakfast myself. You may depend upon it 
they had better give up trying to do this sort of thing 
at this hour." 

Captain Lovelock was more disposed to conversa- 
tion than Bernard had known him before. His dis- 
course of old had been languid and fragmentary, and 
our hero had never heard him pursue a train of ideas 
through so many involutions. To Bernard's obser- 
vant eye, indeed, the Captain was an altered man. 
His manner betrayed a certain restless desire to be 
agreeable, to anticipate judgment — a disposition to 
smile, and be civil, and entertain his auditor, a ten- 
dency to move about and look out of the window and 
at the clock. He struck Bernard as a trifle nervous 
— as lesg solidly planted on his feet than when he 
lounged along the Baden gravel-walks by the side of 
his usual companion — a lady for whom, apparently, 
his admiration was still considerable. Bernard was 
curious to see whether he would ring the bell to in- 
quire into the delay attending the service of lunch ; 
but before this sentiment, rather idle under the cir- 
cumstances, was gratified, Blanche passed into the 
room from a neighboring apartment. To Bernard's 
perception Blanche, at least, was always Blanche ; she 
was a person in whom it would not have occurred to 



 259 

him to expect any puzzling variation, and the tone of 
her little, soft, thin voice instantly rang in his ear 
like an echo of yesterday's talk. He had already re- 
marked to himself that after however long an interval 
one might see Blanche, she re-appeared with an air of 
familiarity. This was in some sense, indeed, a proof 
of the agreeable impression she made, and she looked 
exceedingly pretty as she now suddenly stopped on 
seeing our two gentlemen, and gave a little cry of 
surprise. 

" Ah ! I did n't know you were here. They never 
told me. Have you been waiting a long time ? How 
d' ye do ? You must think -yye are polite." She held 
out her hand to Bernard, smiling very graciously. 
At Captain Lovelock she barely glanced. "I hope 
you are very well," she went on to Longueville ; " but 
I need n't ask that. You 're as blooming as a rose. 
What in the world has happened to you ? You look 
so brilliant — so fresh. Can you say that to a. man 
rr- that he looks fresh ? Or can you only say that 
about butter and eggs ? " 

" It depends upon the man," said Captain Lovelock. 
" You can't say that a man 's fresh who spends his 
time in running about after you ! " 

" Ah, are you here ? " cried Blanche with another 
little cry of surprise. "I didn't notice you — I 
thought you were the waiter. This is what he calls 
running about after me," she added, to Bernard; 



260  

"coming to breakfast without being asked How 
queerly they have arranged the table ! " she went on, 
gazing with her little elevated eyebrows at this piece 
of furniture. "I always thought that in Paris, if 
they couldn't do anything else, they could arrange 
a table. I don't like that at all — those horrid little 
dishes on each side ! Don't you think those things 
ought to be off the table, Mr. Longueville ? I don't 
like to see a lot of things I 'm not eating. And I told 
them to have some flowers — pray, where are the 
flowers ? Do they call those things flowers ? They 
look as if they had come out of the landlady's bonnet I 
Mr. Longueville, do look at those objects." 

" They are not like me — they are not very fresh," 
laughed Bernard. 

" It 's no great matter — we have not got to eat 
them," growled Captain Lovelock. 

'* I should think you would expect to — with the 
luncheon you usually make ! " rejoined Blanche. 
" Since you are here, though I did n't ask you, you 
might as well make yourself usefuL Will you be so 
good as to ring the bell? If Gordon expects that we 
are going to wait another quarter of an hour for him 
he exaggerates the patience of a long-suffering wife. 
If you are very curious to know what he is about, he 
is writing letters, by way of a change. He writes 
about eighty a day ; his correspondents must be 
strong people ! It's a lucky thing for me that I am 



 261 

married to Gordon ; if I were not he might write to 
me — to me, to whom it 's a misery to have to answer 
even an invitation to dinner ! To begin with, I don't 
know how to spell. If Captain Lovelock ever boasts 
that he has had letters from me, you may know it 's 
an invention. He has never had anything but tele- 
grams — three telegrams — that I sent him in Am- 
erica about a pair of slippers that he had left at our 
house and that I did n't know what to do with. Cap- 
tain Lovelock's slippers, are no trifle to have on one's 
hands — on one's feet, I suppose I ought to say. For 
telegrams the spelling does n't matter ; the people at 
the office correct it — or if they don't you can put it 
off on them. I never see anything nowadays but 
Gordon's back," she went on, as they took their places 
at table — *' his noble broad back, as he sits writing 
his letters. That 's my principal view pf my husband. 
I think that now we are in Paris I ought to have a 
portrait of it by one of the great artists. It would 
be such a characteristic pose. I have quite forgotten 
his face and I don't think I should know it." 

Gordon's face, however, presented itself just at this 
moment ; he came in quickly, with his countenance 
flushed with the pleasure of meeting his old friend 
again. He had the sun-scorched look of a traveller 
who has just crossed the Atlantic, and he smiled at 
Bernard with his honest eyes. 

** Don't think me a great brute for not being here 



262  

to receive you," he said, as he clasped his hand. " I 
was writing an important letter and I put it to my- 
self in this way: *If I interrupt my letter I shall 
have to come back and finish it : whereas if I finish 
it now, I can have all the rest of the day to spend 
with him.' So I stuck to it to the end, and now we 
can be inseparable/* 

" You may be sure Gordon reasoned it out," said 
Blanche, while her husband offered his hand in si- 
lence to Captain Lovelock. 

"Gordon's reasoning is as fine as gtlier people's 
feeling 1 " declared Bernard, who was conscious of a 
desire to say something very pleasant to Gordon, 
and who did not at all approve of Blanche's little 
ironical tone about her husband. 

"And Bernard's compliments are better than either," 
said Gordon, laughing and taking his seat at table. 

" I have been paying him compliments," Blanche 
went on. " I have been telling him he looks so bril- 
liant, so blooming — as if something had happened 
to him, as if he had inherited a fortune. He must 
have been doing something very wicked, and he 
ought to tell us all about it, to amuse us. I am sure 
you are a dreadful Parisian, Mr. Longueville. Eemem- 
ber that we are three dull, virtuous people, exceed- 
ingly bored with each other's society, and wanting to 
hear something strange and exciting. If it 's a little 
improper, that won't spoil it" 



 263 

" You certainly are looking uncommonly well," said 
Gordon, still smiling, across the table, at his friend. 
" I see what Blanche means — " 

" My dear Gordon, that *s a great event," his wife 
interposed. 

" It's a good deal to pretend, certainly," he went on, 
smiling always, with his red face and his blue eyes. 
"But this is no great credit to me, because Bernard's 
superb condition would strike any one. You look 
as if you were going to marry the Lord Mayor's 
daughter I " 

If Bernard was blooming, his bloom at this junc- 
ture must have deepened, and in so doing indeed have 
contributed an even brighter tint to his expression of 
salubrious happiness. It was one of the rare occa- 
sions of his life when he was at a loss for a verbal 
expedient. 

" It 's a great match," he nevertheless murmured, 
jestingly. "You must excuse my inflated appear- 



ance." 



" It has absorbed you so much that you have had 
no time to write to me,*' said Gordon. " I expected 
to hear from you after you arrived." 

"I wrote to you a fortnight ago — just before re- 
ceiving your own letter. You left New York before 
my letter reached it." 

" Ah, it will have crossed us," said Gordon. " But 
now that we have your society I don't care. Your 



264  

letters, of course, are delightful, but that is still 
better." 

lu spite of this sympathetic statement Bernard 
cannot be said to have enjoyed his lunch; he was 
thinking of something else that lay before him and 
that was not agreeable. He was like a man who has 
an acrobatic feat to perform — a wide ditch to leap, 
a high pole to climb — and who has a presentiment 
of fractures and bruises. Fortunately he was not 
obliged to talk much, as Mrs. Gordon displayed even 
more than her usual vivacity, rendering her compan- 
ions the graceful service of lifting the burden of con- 
versation from their shoulders. 

" I suppose you were surprised to see us rushing 
out here so suddenly," she observed in the course of 
the repast. " We had said nothing about it when you 
last saw us, and I believe we are supposed to tell you 
everything, ain't we ? I certainly have told you a 
great many things, and there are some of them I 
hope you haven't repeated. I have no doubt you 
have told them all over Paris, but I don't care what 
you tell in Paris — Paris isn't so easily shocked. 
Captain Lovelock does n*t repeat what I tell him ; I 
set him up as a model of discretion. I have told him 
some pretty bad things, and he has liked them so much 
he has kept them all to himself. I say my bad things 
to Captain Lovelock, and my good things to other 
people; he doesn't know the diiSerence and he is 
perfectly content." 



 265 

"Other people as well often don't know the differ- 
ence," said Gordon, gravely. " You ought always to 
tell us which are which." 

Blanche gave her husband a little impertinent 
stare. • 

" When I am not appreciated," she said, with an at- 
tempt at superior dryness, " I am too proud to point 
it out. I don't know whether you know that I 'm 
proud," she went on, turning to Gordon and glancing 
at Captain Lovelock ; " it *s a good thing to know. I 
suppose Gordon will say that I ought to be too proud 
to point that out ; but what are you to do when no 
one has any imagination ? You have a grain or two, 
Mr. Longueville; but Captain Lovelock hasn't a 
speck. " As for Gordon, /<; n'cn imrle pas ! But even 
you, Mr. Longueville, would never imagine that I am 
an interesting invalid — that we are travelling for my 
delicate health. The doctors haven't given me up, 
but I have given them up. I know I don't look as 
if I were out of health ; but that 's because I always 
try to look my best. My appearance proves nothing 
— absolutely nothing. Do you think my appearance 
proves anything. Captain Lovelock ? " 

Captain Lovelock scrutinized Blanche's appearance 
with a fixed and solemn eye ; and then he replied — 

•' It proves you are very lovely." 

Blanche kissed her finger-tips to him in return for 
this compliment 



266  

" You only need to give Captain Lovelock a chance," 
she rattled on, " and he is as clever as any one. That 's 
what I like to do to my friends — I like to make, 
chances for them. Captain Lovelock is like my dear 
little blue terrier that I left at home. If I hold out a 
stick he will jump over it. He won't jump without 
the stick ; but as soon as I produce it he knows what 
he has to do. He looks at it a moment and then he 
gives his little hop. He knows he will have a lump 
of sugar, and Captain Lovelock expects one as*welL 
Dear Captain Lovelock, shall I ring for a lump ? 
Wouldn't it be touching? Gargon, un morceau de 
Sucre pour Monsieur le Capttaine ! But what I give 
Monsieur le Capitaine is moral sugar ! I usually ad- 
minister it in private, and he shall have a good big 
morsel when you go away." 

Gordon got up, turning to Bernard and looking at 
his watch. 

" Let us go away, in that case," he said, smiling, 
" and leave Captain Lovelock to receive his reward. 
We will go and take a walk; we will go up the 
Champs Elys^es. Good morning, Monsieur le Capi- 
taine." 

Neither Blanche nor the Captain offered any oppo- 
sition to this proposal, and Bernard took leave of his 
hostess and joined Gordon, who had already passed 
into the antechamber. 



XXV. 

Gordon took his arm and they gained the street ; 
they strolled in the direction of the Champs Elys^es. 

" For a little exercise and a good deal of talk, it 's 
the pleasantest place," said Gordon. " I have a good 
deal to say ; I have a good deal to ask you." 

Bernard felt the familiar pressure of his friend's 
hand, as it rested on his arm, and it seemed to him 
never to have lain there with so heavy a weight. It 
held him fast — it held him to account; it seemed a 
physical symbol of responsibility. Bernard was not 
re-assured by hearing that Gordon had a great deal to 
say, and he expected a sudden explosion of bitter- 
ness on the subject of Blanche's irremediable triviality. 
The afternoon was a lovely one — ^^the day was a per- 
fect example of the mellowest mood of autumn. The 
air was warm and filled with a golden haze, which 
seemed to hang about the bare Parisian trees, as if 
with a tender impulse to drape their nakedness. A 
fine day in Paris brings out a wonderfully bright and 
appreciative multitude of strollers and loungers, and 
the liberal spaces of the Champs Elysees were on this 
occasion filled with those placid votaries of inexpen- 



268  

sive entertainment who abound in the French capital. 
The benches and chairs on the edge of the great 
fl.venue exhibited a dense fraternity of gazers, and up 
and down the broad walk passed the slow-moving 
and easily pleased pedestrians. Gordon, in spite of 
his announcement that he had a good deal to say, 
confined himself at first to sujjerficial allusions, and 
Bernard after a w^hile had the satisfaction of perceiv- 
ing that he was not likely, for the moment, to strike 
the note of conjugal discord. He appeared, indeed, 
to feel no desire to speak of Blanche in any manner 
whatever. He fell into the humor of the hour and 
the scene, looked at the crowd, talked about trifles. 
He remarked that Paris was a wonderful place after 
all, and that a little glimpse of the Parisian picture 
was a capital thing as a change; said he was very- 
glad they had come, and that for his part he was 
willing to stay three months. 

"And what have you been doing with yourself?" 
he asked. " How have you been occupied, and what 
are you meaning to do ? " 

Bernard said nothing for a moment, and Gordon 
presently glanced at his face to see why he was 
silent. Bernard, looking askance, met his compan- 
ion's eyes, and then, resting his own upon them, he 
stopped short. His heart was beating ; it was a ques- 
tion of saying to Gordon outright, " I have been oc- 
cupied in becoming engaged to Angela Vivian." But 



 269 

he couldn't say it, and yet he must say something. 
He tried to invent something ; but he could think of 
nothing, and still Gordon was looking at him. 

" I am so glad to see you ! " he exclaimed, for want 
of something better ; and he blushed — he felt foolish, 
he felt false — as he said it. 

" My dear Bernard ! " Gordon murmured gratefully, 
as they walked on. " It 's very good of you to say 
that ; I am very glad we are together again. I want 
to say something," he added, in a moment ; " I hope 
you won't mind it — " Bernard gave a little laugh 
at his companion's scruples, and Gordon continued. 
" To tell the truth, it has sometimes seemed to me 
that we were not so good friends as we used to be — 
that something had come between us — I don't know 
what, I don't know why. I don't know what to call 
it but a sort of lowering of the temperature. I don't 
know whether you have felt it, or whether it has been 
simply a fancy of mine. Whatever it may have been, 
it's all over, isn't it? We are too old friends — too 
good friends — not to stick together. Of course, the 
rubs of life may occasionally loosen the cohesion ; but 
it is very good to feel that, with a little direct contact, 
it may easily be re-established. Is n't that so ? But 
we shouldn't reason about these things; one feels 
them, and that 's enough." 

Gordon spoke in his clear, cheerful voice, and Ber- 
nard listened intently. It seemed to him there was 



270  

an undertone of pain and effort in his companion's 
speech ; it was that of an unhappy- man trying to be 
wise and make the best of things. 

" Ah, the rubs of life — the rubs of life ! " Bernard 
repeated vaguely. 

" We must n't mind them," said Gordon, with a con- 
scientious laugh. " We must toughen our hides ; or, 
at the worst, we must plaster up our bruises. But 
why should we choose this particular place and hour 
for talking of the pains of life ? " he went on. " Are 
we not in the midst of its pleasures ? I mean, hence- 
forth, to cultivate its pleasures. What are yours, just 
now, Bernard ? Is n't it supposed that in Paris one 
must amuse one's self ? How have you been amusing 
yourself ? " 

"I have been leading a very quiet life," said 
Bernard. 

" I notice that 's what people always say when they 
have been particularly dissipated. What have you 
done ? Whom have you seen that one knows ? " 

Bernard was silent a moment. 

" I have seen some old friends of yours," he said at 
last. " I have seen Mrs. Vivian and her daughter." 

" Ah ! " Gordon made this exclamation, and then 
stopped short. Bernard looked at him, but Gordon 
was looking away ; his eyes had caught some one in 
the crowd. Bernard followed the direction they had 
taken, and then Gordon went on : " Talk of the devil 



 271 

— excuse the adage ! Are not those the ladies in 
question ? " 

Mrs. Vivian and her daughter were, in fact, seated 
among a great many other quiet people, in a couple 
of hired chairs, at the edge of the great avenue. 
They were turned toward -our two friends, and when 
Bernard distinguished them, in the well-dressed 
multitude, they were looking straight at Gordon 
Wright. 

" They see you ! " said Bernard. 

" You say that as if I wished to run away," Gor- 
don answered. " I don't want to run away ; on the 
contrary, I want to speak to them." 

"That's easily done," said Bernard, and they ad- 
vanced to the two ladies. 

Mrs. Vivian and her daughter rose from their chairs 
as they came ; they had evidently rapidly exchanged 
observations, and had decided that it would facilitate 
their interview with Gordon Wright to receive him 
standing. He made his way to them through the 
crowd, blushing deeply, as he always did when ex- 
cited; then he stood there bare-headed, shaking 
hands with each of them, with a fixed smile, and 
with nothing, apparently, to say. Bernard watched 
Angela's face ; she was giving his companion a beau- 
tiful smile. Mrs. Vivian was delicately cordial. 

"I was sure it was you," said Gordon at last. 
" We were just talking of you." 



272 ^  

"Did Mr. Longueville deny it was we?" asked 
Mrs. Vivian, archly; "after we had supposed that we 
had made an impression on him !*' 

" I knew you were in Paris — we were in the act 
of talking of you," Gordon went on. " I am very 
glad to see you." 

Bernard had shaken hands with Angela, looking at 
her intently ; and in her eyes, as his own met them, 
it seemed to him that there was a gleam of mockery. 
At whom was she mocking — at Gordon, or at him- 
self ? Bernard was uncomfortable enough not to care 
to be mocked ; but he felt even more sorry that Gor- 
don should be. 

" We also knew you were coming — Mr. Longue- 
ville had told us," said Mrs. Vivian ; " and we have 
been expecting the pleasm-e of seeing Blanche. Dear 
little Blanche ! " 

"Dear little Blanche will immediately come and 
see you," Gordon replied. 

" Immediately, we hope," said Mrs. Vivian. " We 
shall be so veiy glad." Bernard perceived that she 
wished to say something soothing and sympathetic to 
poor Gordon ; having it, as he supposed, on her con- 
science that, after having once encouraged him to 
regard himself as indispensable (in the capacity of 
son-in-law) to her happiness, she should now present 
to him the spectacle of a felicity which had estab- 
lished itself without his aid. "We were so very 



 273 

much interested in your marriage," she went on. 
" We thought it so — so delightful." 

Gordon fixed his eyes on the ground for a moment. 

" I owe it partly to you," he answered. " You had 
done so much for Blanche. You had so cultivated 
her mind and polished her manners that her attrac- 
tions were doubled, and I fell an easy victim to 
them." 

He uttered these words with an exaggerated solem- 
nity, the result of which was to produce, for a mo- 
ment, an almost embarrassing silence. Bernard was 
rapidly becoming more and more impatient of his 
own embarrassment, and now he exclaimed, in a loud 
and jovial voice — 

" Blanche makes victims by the dozen ! I was a 
victim last winter ; we are all victims ! " 

"Dear little Blanche!" Mrs. Vivian murmured 
again. 

Angela had said nothing; she had simply stood 
there, making no attempt to address herself to Gor- 
don, and yet with no affectation of reserve or of 
indifference. Now she seemed to feel the impulse to 
speak to him. 

" When Blanche comes to see us, you must be sure 
to come with her," she said, with a friendly smile. 

Goi'don looked at her, but he said nothing. 

" We were so sorry to hear she is out of health," 
Angela went on. 

18 



274 *  

Still Gordon was silent, with his eyes fixed on her 
expressive and charming face. 

" It is not serious," he murmured at last. 

** She used to be so well — so bright," said Angela, 
who also appeared to have the desire to say some- 
thing kind and comfortable. 

Gordon made no response to this ; he only looked 
at her. 

" I hope you are well, Miss Vivian," he broke out 
at last. 

" Very well, thank you." 

" Do you live in Paris ? " 

" We have pitched our tent here for the present" 

" Do you like it ? " 

" I find it no worse than other places." 

Gordon appeared to desire to talk with her ; but 
he could think of nothing to say. Talking with her 
was a pretext for looking at her ; and Bernard, who 
thought she had never been so handsome as at that 
particular moment, smiling at her troubled ex-lover, 
could easily conceive that his friend should desire to 
prolong this privilege. - 

" Have you been sitting here long ? " Gordon asked, 
thinking of something at last. 

" Half an hour. We came out to walk, and my 
mother felt tired. It is time we should turn home- 
ward," Angela added. 

" Yes, I am tired, my daughter. We must take a 



 275 

voUure, if Mr. Longueville will be so good as to find 
us one," said Mrs. Vivian. 

Bernard, professing great alacrity, looked about him ; 
but he still lingered near his companions. Gordon 
had thought of something else. " Have you been to 
Baden again ? " Bernard heard him ask. But at this 
moment Bernard espied at a distance an empty hack- 
ney-carriage crawling up the avenue, and he was 
obliged to go and signal to it. When he came back, 
followed by the vehicle, the two ladies, accompanied 
by Gordon, had come to the edge of the pavement. 
They shook hands with Gordon before getting into 
the cab, and Mrs. Vivian exclaimed — 

" Be sure you give our love to your dear wife ! " 

Then the two ladies settled themselves and smiled 
their adieux, and the little victoria rumbled away at 
an easy pace, while Bernard stood with Gordon, 
looking after it They watched it a moment, and 
then Gordon turned to his companion. He looked at 
Bernard for some moments intently, with a singular 
expression. 

" It is strange for me to see her 1 " he said, pres- 
ently. 

" I hope it is not altogether disagreeabje," Bernard 
answered smiling. 

" She is delightfully handsome," Gordon went on. 

" She is a beautiful woman." 

*' And the strange thing is that she strikes me now 



276  

80 differently," Gordon continued. " I used to think 
her so mysterious — so ambiguous. She seems to be 
now so simple." 

"Ah," said Bernard, laughing, "that's an improve- 
ment 1 " 

" So simple and so good ! " Gordon exclaimed. 

Bernard laid his hand on his companion's shoulder, 
shaking his head slowly. 

. "You must not think too much about that," he 
said. 

"So simple — so good — so charming!" Gordon 
repeated. 

" Ah, my dear Gordon ! " Bernard murmured. 

But still Gordon continued. 

" So intelligent, so reasonable, so sensible." 

"Have you discovered all that in two minutes* 
talk?" 

" Yes, in two minutes' talk. I should n't hesitate 
about her now ! " 

" It 's better you should n't say that," said Bernard. 

" Why should n't I say it ? It seems to me it 's my 
duty to say it." 

"No — your duty lies elsewhere," said Bernard. 
"There are two reasons. One is that you have 
married another woman." 

" What difiference does that make ? " cried Gordon. 

Bernard made no attempt to answer this inquiry ; 
he simply went on — 



 277 

" The other is — the other is — " 

But here he paused. 

" What is the other ? " Gordon asked. 

" That I am engaged to marry Miss Vivian." 

And with this Bernard took his hand off Gordon's 
shoulder. 

Gordon stood staring. 

" To marry Miss Vivian ? " 

Now that Bernard had heard himself say it» 
audibly, distinctly, loudly, the spell of his apprehen- 
sion seemed broken, and he went on bravely. 

" We are to be married very shortly. It has all come 
about within a few weeks. It will seem to you very 
strange — perhaps you won't like it That's why I 
have hesitated to teU you." 

Gordon turned pale ; it was the first time Bernard 
had ever seen him do so ; evidently he did not like it. 
He stood staring and frowning. 

" Why, I thought — I thought," he began at last — 
" I thought that you disliked her ! " 

" I supposed so, too," said Bernard. " But I have 
got over that." 

Gordon turned away, looking up the great avenue 
into the crowd. Then turning back, he said — 

" I am very much surprised." 

" And you are not pleased ! " 

Gkmlon fixed his eyes on the ground a moment 

"* I congratulate you on your engagement," he said 



278  

at last, looking up with a face that seemed to Ber- 
nard hard and unnatural. 

" It is very good of you to say that, but of course 
you can't like it ! I was sure you wouldn't like it. 
But what could I do ? I fell in love with her, and I 
couldn't run away simply to spare you a surprise. 
My dear Gordon," Bernard added, " you will get used 
to it." 

" Very likely," said Gordon, dryly. " But you must 
give me time." 

" As long as you like ! " 

Gordon stood for a moment again staring down at 
the ground. 

" Very well, then, I will take my time," he said. 
" Good-bye ! " 

And he turned away, as if to walk off alone. 

" Where are you going ? " asked Bernard, stopping 
him. 

" I don't know — to the hotel, anywhere. To try 
to get used to what you have told me." 

" Don't try too hard ; it will come of itself," said 
Bernard. 

*' We shall see ! " 

And Gordon turned away again. 

" Do you prefer to go alone ? " 

" Very much — if you will excuse me ! " 

"I have asked you to excuse a greater want of 
ceremony ! " said Bernard, smiling. 



 279 

" I liave not done so yet ! " Gordon rejoined ; and 
marching oflf, he mingled with the crowd. 

Bernard watched him till he lost sight of him, and 
then, dropping into the first empty chair that he saw, 
he sat and reflected that his -friend liked it quite as 
little as he had feared. 



XXVI. 

Bernard sat thinking for a long time ; at first with 
a good deal of mortification — at last with a good deal 
of bitterness. He felt angry at last ; but he was not 
angry with himself. He was displeased with poor 
Gordon, and with Gordon's displeasure. He was un- 
comfortable, and he was vexed at his discomfort. It 
formed, it seemed to him, no natural part of his situ- 
ation; he had had no glimpse of it in the book of fate 
where he registered on a fair blank page his betrothal 
to a charming girl. That Gordon should be surprised, 
and even a little shocked and annoyed — this was his 
right and his privilege ; Bernard had been prepared 
for that, and had determined to make the best of 
it. But it must not go too far ; there were limits to 
the morsel of humble pie that he was disposed to 
swallow. Something in Gordon's air and figure, as 
he went off in a huff, looking vicious and danger- 
ous — yes, that was positively his look — left a sin- 
ister impression on Bernard's mind, and, after a while, 
made him glad to take refuge in being angry. One 
would like to know what Gordon expected, 'par ex- 
emple! Did he expect Bernard to give up Angela 



 281 

simply to save him a shock ; or to back out of his en- 
gagement by way of an ideal reparation ? No, it was 
too absurd, and, if Gordon had a wife of his own, 
why in the name of justice should not Bernard have 
one? 

Being angry was a relief, but it was not exactly a 
solution, and Bernard, at last, leaving his place, where 
for an hour or two he had been absolutely uncon- 
scious of everything that went on around him, wan- 
dered about for some time in deep restlessness and 
irritation. At one moment he thought of going back 
to Gordon's hotel, to see him, to explain. But then 
he became aware that he was too angry for that — to 
say nothing of Gordon's being too angry also ; and, 
moreover, that there was nothing to explain. He 
was to marry Angela Vivian ; that was a very simple 
fact — it needed no explanation. Was it so wonder- 
ful, so inconceivable, an incident so unlikely to hap- 
pen ? He went, as he always did on Sunday, to dine 
with Mrs. Vivian, and it seemed to him that he per- 
ceived in the two ladies *some symptoms of a dis- 
composure which had the same origin as his own. 
Bernard, on this occasion, at dinner, failed to make 
himself particularly agreeable ; he ate fast — as if he 
had no idea what he was eating, and talked little ; 
every now and then his eyes rested for some time 
upon Angela, with a strange, eagerly excited expres- 
sion, as if he were looking her over and trying to 



282  

make up his mind about her afresh. This young lady 
bore his inscrutable scrutiny with a deal of super- 
ficial composure; but she was also silent, and she 
returned his gaze, from time to time, with an air of 
unusual anxiety. She was thinking, of course, of 
Gordon, Bernard said to himself; and a woman's first 
meeting, in after years, with an ex-lover must always 
make a certain impression upon her. Gordon, how- 
ever, had never been a lover, and if Bernard noted 
Angela's gravity it was not because he felt jealous. 
"She is simply sorry for him," he said to himself; 
and by the time he had finished his dinner it began 
to come back to him that he was sorry, too. Mrs. 
Vivian was probably sorry as well, for she had a 
slightly confused and preoccupied look — a look from 
which, even in the midst of his chagrin, Bernard ex- 
tracted some entertainment. It was Mrs. Vivian's 
intermittent conscience that had been reminded of 
one of its lapses ; her meeting with Gordon Wright 
had recalled the least exemplary episode of her life 
— the time when she whispered mercenary counsel 
in the ear of a daughter who sat, grave and pale, 
looking at her with eyes that wondered. Mrs. Vivian 
blushed a little now, when she met Bernard's eyes ; 
and to remind herself that she was after all a virtuous 
woman, talked as much as possible about superior 
and harmless things — the beauty of the autumn 
weather, the pleasure of seeing French papas walking 



 283 

about on Sunday with their progeny in their hands, 
the peculiarities of the pulpit-oratory of the country 
as exemplified in the discourse of a Protestant pasteur 
whom she had been to hear in the morning. 

When they rose from table and went back into her 
little drawing-room, she left her daughter alone for 
awhile with Bernard. The two were standing together 
before the fire ; Bernard watched Mrs. Vivian close the 
door softly behind her. Then, looking for a moment 
at his companion — 

" He is furious ! " he announced at last 

"Furious?" said Angela. "Do you mean Mr. 
Wright ? " 

"The amiable,' reasonable Gordon. He takes it 
very hard." 

" Do you mean about me ? " asked Angela. 

" It 's not with you he *s furious, of course; it is with 
me. He won't let me off easily." 

Angela looked for a moment at the fire. 

" I am very sorry for him," she said, at last. 

" It seems to me I am the one to be pitied," said 
Bernard ; " and I don|t see what compassion you, of 
all people in the world, owe him." 

Angela again rested her eyes on the fire ; then 
presently, looking up — 

" He liked me very much," she remarked. 

" All the more shame to him 1 " cried Bernard. 

"What do you mean?" asked the girl, with her 
beautiful stare. 



284  

" If he liked you, why did he give you up ? '* 

"He didn't give me up." 

"What do you mean, please?" asked Bernard, 
staring back at her. 

"I sent him away — I refused him," said Angela. 

"Yes; but you thought better of it, and your 
mother had persuaded you that if he should ask you 
again, you had better accept him. Then it was that 
he backed out — in consequence of what I said to him 
on his return from England." 

She shook her head slowly, with a strange smile. 

"My poor Bernard, you are talking very wildly. 
He did ask me again." 

" That night ? " cried Bernard. 

" The night he came back from England — the last 
time I saw him, until to-day." 

" After I had denounced you ? " our puzzled hero 
exclaimed, frowning portentously. 

" I am soiTy to let you know the small effect of 
your words ! " 

Bernard folded his hands together — almost de- 
voutly — and stood gazing at her with a long, inartic- 
ulate murmur of satisfaction. 

"Ah! then, I didn't injure you — I didn't de- 
prive you of a chance ? " 

"Oh, sir, the intention on your part was the 
samel" Angela exclaimed. 

•"Then all my uneasiness, all my remorse, were 
wasted?" he went on. 



 . 285 

But she kept the same tone, and its tender arch- 
ness only gave a greater sweetness to his sense of 

relief. 

" It was a very small penance for you to pay." 

" You dismissed him definitely, and tlmt was why 
he vanislied ? " asked Bernard, wondering stilL 

"He gave me another 'chance,' as you elegantly 
express it, and I declined to take advantage of it." 

" Ah, well, now," cried Bernard, " I am sony for 
him ! " 

'' I was very kind — very respectful," said Angela. 
" I thanked him from the bottom of my heart ; I 
begged his pardon very humbly for the wrong — if 
wrong it was — that I was doing him. • I did n*t in 
the least require of liim that he should leave Baden 
at seven o'clock the next morning. I had no idea 
that he would do so, and that was the reason that I 
insisted to my mother that we ourselves should go 
away. When we went I knew nothing about his 
having gone, and I supposed he was still there. I 
didn't wish to meet him again." 

Angela gave this information slowly, softly, with 
pauses between the sentences, as if she were recalling 
the circumstances with a certain effort; and mean- 
while Bernard, with his transfigured face and his 
eyes fixed upon her lips, was moving excitedly about 
the room. 

" Well, he can't accuse me, then ! " he broke out 




286  

again. " If what I said had no more eflfect upon him 
than that, I certainly did him no wrong." 

" I think you are rather vexed he did n't believe 
you," said Angela: 

" I confess I don't understand it. He had all the 
air of it. He certainly had not the air of a man who 
was going to rush off and give you the last proof of 
his confidence." 

" It was not a proof of confidence," said Angela. 
" It had nothing to do with me. It was as between 
himself and you; it was a proof of independence. 
He did believe jou, more or less, and what you said 
fell in with his own impressions — strange impres- 
sions that they were, poor man ! At the same time, 
as I say, he liked me, too ; it was out of his liking me 
that all his trouble came ! He caught himself in the 
act of listening to you too credulously — and that 
seemed to him unmanly and dishonorable. The sen- 
sation brought with it a reaction, and to prove to 
himself that in such a matter he could be influenced 
by nobody, he marched away, an hour after he had 
talked with you, and, in the teeth of his perfect mis- 
xtrust, confirmed by your account of my irregularities 
^— heaven forgive you both ! — again asked me to be 
his wife. But he hoped I would refuse ! " 

" Ah, " cried Bernard, " the recreant ! He deserved 
— he deserved — " 

" That I should accept him ? " Angela asked, smil- 
ing still. 



 287 

Bernard was so much affected by this revelation, it 
seemed to him to make such a diflference in his own, 
responsibility and to lift such a weight off his con- 
science, that he broke out again into the liveliest 
ejaculations of relief. 

" Oh, I don't care for anything, now, and I can do 
what I please 1 Gordon may hate me, and I shall be 
sorry for him ; but it 's not my fault, and I owe him 
no reparation. No, no ; I am free ! " - 

" It 's only I who am not, I suppose," said Angela, 
"and the reparation must come from me! If he is 
unhappy, I must take the responsibility." 

" Ah yes, of course," said Bernard, kissing her. 

" But why should he be unhappy ? " asked Angela. 
If I refused him, it was what he wanted." 

" He is hard to please," Bernard rejoined. " He 
has got a wife of his own." 

"If Blanche doesn't please him, he is certainly 
difficult ; " and Angela mused a little. " But you 
told me the other day that they were getting on so 
weU." 

"Yes, I believe I told you," Bernard answered, 
musing a little too. 

" You are not attending to what I say." 

" No, I am thinking of something else — I am 
thinking of what it was that made you refuse him 
that way, at the last, after you liad let your mother 
hope." And Bernard stood there, smiling at her. 



288  

"Don't think any more ; you will not find out," the 
girl declared, turning away. 

'' Ah, it was cruel of you to let me think I was 
wrong all these years," he went on ; " and, at the 
time, since you meant to refuse him, you might 
have been more frank with me." 

"I thought my fault had been that I was too 
frank." 

" I was densely stupid, and you might have made 
me understand better." 

"Ah," said Angela, "you ask a great deal of a 
girl ! " 

" Why have you let me go on so long thinking 
that my deluded words had had an eflTect upon Gordon 
— feeling that I had done you a brutal wrong ? It 
was real to me, the wrong — and I have told you of 
the pangs and the shame which, for so many months, 
it has cost me ! Why have you never undeceived me 
until to-day, and then only by accident ? " 

At this question Angela blushed a little ; then she 
answered, smiling — 

" It was my vengeance." 

Bernard shook his head. 

" That won't do — you don't mean it You never 
cared — you were too proud to care; and when I 
spoke to you about my fault, you did n't even know 
what I meant. You might have told me, therefore, 
that my remorse was idle, that what I said to Gordon 



 289 

had not been of the smallest consequence, and that 
the rupture had come from yourself." 

For some time Angela said nothing, then at last 
she gave him one of the deeply serious looks with 
which her face was occasionally ornamented. 

" If you want really to know, then — can't you see 
that your remorse seemed to me connected in a certain 
way with your affection ; a sort of guarantee of it ? 
You thought you had injured some one or other, and 
that seemed to be mixed up with your loving me, and 
therefore I let it alone." 

" Ah," said Bernard, " my remorse is all gone, and 
yet I think I love you about as much as ever ! So 
you see how wrong you were not to tell me." 

" The wrong to you I don't care about. It is very 
true I might have told you for Mr. Wright's sake. 
It would perhaps have made him look better. But 
as you never attacked him for deserting me, it seemed 
needless for me to defend him." 

"I confess," said Bernard, "I am quite at sea 
about Gk)rdQn's look in the matter. Is he looking 
better now — or is he looking worse? You put it 
very well just now ; I was attending to you, though 
you said I was not. If he hoped you would refuse 
him, with whom is his quarrel at present ? And why 
was he so cool to me for months after we parted at 
Baden ? If that was his state of mind, why should 
he accuse me of inconsistency ? " 

19 



290  

" There is something in it, after all, that a woman 
can understand. I don't know whether a man can. 
He hoped I would refuse him, and yet when I had 
done so he was vexed. After a while his vexation 
subsided, and he married poor Blalnche; but, on 
learning to-day that I had accepted you, it flickered 
up again. I suppose that was natural enough ; but it 
won't be serious." 

" What will not be serious, my dear ? " asked Mrs. 
Vivian, who had come back to the drawing-room, and 
who, apparently, could not hear that the attribute in 
question was wanting in any direction, without some 
alarm. 

" Shall I tell mamma, Bernard ? " said Angela. 

"Ah, my dear child, I hope it's nothing that 
threatens your mutual happiness," mamma murmured, 
with gentle earnestness. 

" Does it threaten our mutual happiness, Bernard ? " 
the girl went on, smiling. 

" Let Mrs. Vivian decide whether we ought to let 
it make us miserable," said Bernard. "Dear Mrs. 
Vivian, you are a casuist, and this is a nice case." 

" Is it anything about poor Mr. Wright ? " the elder 
lady inquired. 

"Why do you say 'poor' Mr. Wright?" asked 
Bernard. 

" Because I am sadly afraid he is not happy with 
Blanche." 



 291 

"How did you discover that- — without seeing 
them together ? " 

" Well, perhaps you will think me very fanciful," 
said Mrs. Vivian ; " but it was by the way he looked 
at Angela. He has such an expressive face." 

" He looked at me very kindly, mamma," Angela 
observed. 

" He reguhgrly stared, my daughter. In any one else 
I should have said it was rude. But his situation is 
so peculiar ; and one could see that he admired you 
stilL" And Mrs. Vivian gave a little soft sigh. 

"Ah! she is thinking of the thirty thousand a 
year," Bernard said to himself. 

" I am sure I hope he admires me still," the girl 
cried, laughing. " There is no great harm in that." 

"He was comparing you with Blanche — and he was 
struck with the contrast." 

" It could n't have been in my favor. If it 's a 
question of being looked at, Blanche bears it better 
than I." 

" Poor little Blanche ! " murmured Mrs. Vivian, 
sweetly. 

"Why did you tell me he was so happy with her ? " 
Angela asked, turning to Bernard, abruptly. 

Bernard gazed at her a moment, with his eyebrows 
raised. 

" I never saw any one ask such sudden questions ! " 
he exclaimed. 



292  

" You can answer me at your leisure," she rejoined, 
turning away. 

" It was because I adored you." 

" You would n't say that at your* leisure," said the 
girl. 

Mrs. Vivian stood watching them. 

"You, who are so happy together, you ought to 
think kindly of others who are less fortunate." 

" That is very true, Mrs. Vivian ; and I have never 
thought of any one so kindly as I have of Gordon for 
the last year." 

Angela turned round again. 

" Is Blanche so very bad, then ? " 

" You will see for yourself 1 " 

" Ah, no," said Mrs. Vivian, " she is not bad ; she 
is only very light. I am so glad she is to be near us 
again. I think a great deal can be done by associa- 
tion. We must help her, Angela. I think we helped 
her before." 

" It is also very true that she is light, Mrs. Vivian," 
Bernard observed, "and if you could make her a 
little heavier, T should be tremendously grateful." 

Bernard's prospective mother-in-law looked at him 
a little. 

" I don't know whether you are laughing at me — 
I always think you are. But I shall not give up 
Blanche for that. I never give up any one that I have 
once tried to help. Blanche will come back to me." 



i 



 293 

Mrs. Vivian had hardly spoken when the sharp 
little vibration of her door-bell was heard in the hall. 
Bernard stood for a moment looking at the door of 
the drawing-room. 

"It is poor Gordon come to make a scene!" he 
announced. 

" Is that what you mean — that he opposed your 
marriage ? " asked Mrs. Vivian, with a frightened air. 

" I don't know what he proposes to do with 
Blanche," said Bernard, laughing. 

There were voices in the hall. Angela had been 
listening. 

" You say she wiU come back to you, mamma/' she 
exclaimed. " Here she is arrived ! " 



I 



XXVII. 

At the same moment the door was thrown open, 
and Mrs. Gordon appeared on the threshold with a 
gentleman behind her. Blanche stood an instant 
looking into the lighted room and hesitating — flushed 
a little, smiling, extremely pretty. 

" May I come in ? " she said, " and may I bring in 
Captain Lovelock ? " 

The two ladies, of course, fluttering toward her 
with every demonstration of hospitality, drew her into 
the room, while Bernard proceeded to greet the 
Captain, who advanced with a certain awkward and 
bashful majesty, almost sweeping with his great 
stature Mrs. Vivian's humble ceiling. There was a 
tender exchange of embraces between Blanche and 
her friends, and the charming visitor, losing no time, 
began to chatter with her usual volubility. Mrs. 
Vivian and Angela made her companion graciously 
welcome ; but Blanche begged they would n't mind 
him — she had only brought him as a watch-dog. 

"His place is on the rug," she said. ''Captain 
Lovelock, go and lie down on the rug." 

" Upon my soul, there is nothing else but rugs in 



 295 

these French places!" the Captain rejoined, look- 
ing round Mrs. Vivian's salon. " Which rug do you 
mean ? " 

Mrs. Vivian had remarked to Blanche that it was 
very kind of her to come first, and Blanche declared 
that she could not have laid her head on her pillow 
before she had seen her dear Mrs, Vivian. 

" Do you suppose 1 would wait because I am mar- 
ried ? " she inquired, with a keen little smile in her 
charming eyes. " I am not so much married as that, 
I can tell you ! Do you think I look much as if I 
were married, with no one to bring me here to-night 
but Captain Lovelock ? " 

"I am sure Captain Lovelock is a very gallant 
escort," said Mrs. Vivian. 

" Oh, he was not afraid — that is, he was not afraid 
of the journey, though it lay all through those dread- 
ful wild Champs Elys^es. But when we arrived, he 
was afraid to come in — to come up here. Captain 
Lovelock is so modest, you know — in spite of all the 
success he had in America. He will tell you about 
the success he had in America; it quite makes up 
for the defeat of the British army in the Eevolution. 
They were defeated in the Revolution, the British, 
were n't they ? I always told him so, but he insists 
they were not. ' How do we come to be free, then ? ' 
I always ask him ; * I suppose you admit that we are 
free.' Then he becomes personal and says that I am 



296  

free enough, certainly. But it's the general fact I 
mean ; I wish you would tell him about the general 
fact. I think he would believe you, because he 
knows you know a great deal about history and all 
that. I don't mean this evening, but some time when 
it is convenient He didn't want to come in — he 
wanted to stay in the carriage and smoke a cigar ; he 
thought you wouldn't like it, his coming with me 
the first time. But I told him he need n't mind that, 
for I would certainly explain. I would be very care- 
ful to let you know that I brought him only as a 
substitute. A substitute for whom? A substitute 
for my husband, of course. My dear Mrs. Vivian, of 
course T ought to bring you some pretty message 
from Gordon — that he is dying to come and see you, 
only that he had nineteen letters to write and that he 
could n't possibly stir from his fireside. I suppose a 
good wife ought to invent excuses for her husband — 
ought to throw herself into the breach; isn't that 
what they call it ? But I am afraid I am not a good 
ydfe. Do you think I am a good wife, Mr. Longue- 
ville ? You once stayed three months with us, and 
you had a chance to see. I don't ask you that seri- 
ously, because you never tell the truth. I always 
do ; so I will say I am not a good wife. And then 
the breach is too big, and I am too little. Oh, I am 
too little, Mrs. Vivian; I know I am too little. I 
am the smallest woman living ; Gordon can scarcely 



 297 

see me with a microscope, and I believe lie has the 
most powerful one in America. He is going to get 
another here; that is one of the things he came 
abroad for ; perhaps it will do better. I do tell the 
truth, don't I, Mrs. Vivian ? I have that merit, if I 
have n't any other. You once told me so at Baden ; 
you said you could say one thing for me, at any rate 
— that I did n't tell fibs. You were very nice to me 
at Baden," Blanche went on, with her little intent 
smile, laying her hand in that of her hostess. " You 
see, I have never forgotten it. So, to keep up my 
reputation, I must tell the truth about Gordon. He 
simply said he would n't come — voUct ! He gave no 
reason and he did n't send you any pretty message. 
He simply declined, and he went, out somewhere else. 
So you see he isn't writing letters. I don't know 
where he can have gone ; perhaps he has gone to the 
theatre. I know it is n't proper to go to the theatre 
on Sunday evening; but they say charity begins at 
home, and as Gordon's does n't begin at home, per- 
haps it does n't begin anywhere. I told him that if 
he would n't come with me I would come alone, and 
he said I might do as I chose — that he was not in 
a humor for making visits. I wanted to come to you 
very much; I had been thinking about it all day; 
and I am so fond of a visit like this in the evening, 
without being invited. Then I thought perhaps you 
had a salon — doesn't every one in Paris have a 



298  

salon t I tried to have a salon in New York, only 
Gordon said it would n't do. He said it was n*t in our 
manners. Is this a salon to-night, Mrs. Vivian ? Oh, 
do say it is ; I should like so much to see Captain 
Lovelock in a salon ! By good fortune he happened 
to have been dining with us ; so I told him he must 
bring me here. I told you I would explain, Captain 
Lovelock," she added, " and I hope you think I have 
made it clear." 

The Captain had turned very red during this wan- 
dering discourse. He sat pulling his beard and 
shifting the position which, with his stalwart person, 
he had taken up on a little gilded chair — a piece of 
furniture which every now and then gave a delicate 
creak. 

"I always understand you well enough till you 
begin to explain," he rejoined, with a candid, even if 
embarrassed, laugh. "Then, by Jove, I^m quite in 
the woods. You see such a lot more in things than 
most people. Does n't she. Miss Vivian ? " 

"Blanche has a fine imagination," said Angela, 
smiling frankly at the charming visitor. 

When Blanche was fairly adrift upon the current 
of her articulate reflections, it was the habit of her 
companions — indeed, it was a sort of tacit agree- 
ilient among them — simply to make a circle and 
admire. They sat about and looked at her — yawn- 
ing, perhaps, a little at times, but on the whole very 



 299 

well entertained, and often exchanging a smiling 
commentary with each other. She looked at them, 
smiled at them each, in succession. Every one had 
his turn, and this always helped to give Blanche an 
audience. Incoherent and aimless as much of her 
talk was, she never looked prettier than in the atti- 
tude of improvisation — or rather, I should say, than 
in the hundred attitudes which she assumed at such 
a time. Perpetually moving, she was yet constantly 
graceful, and while she twisted her body and turned 
her head, with charming hands that never ceased to 
gesticulate, and little, conscious, brilliant eyes that 
looked everywhere . at once — eyes that seemed to 
chatter even faster than her lips — she made you 
forget the nonsense she poured forth, or think of it 
only as a part of her personal picturesqueness. The 
thing was a regular performance ; the practice of un- 
limited chatter had made her perfect. She rested 
upon her audience and held it together, and the sight 
of half a dozen pairs of amused and fascinated faces 
led her from one piece of folly to another. On this 
occasion, her audience was far from failing her, for 
they were all greatly interested. Captain Lovelock's 
interest, as we know, was chronic, and our three other 
friends were much occupied with a matter with 
which Blanche was intimately connected. Bernard, 
as he listened to her, smiling mechanically, was not 
encouraged. He remembered what Mrs. Vivian had 



300  

said shortly before she came in, and it was not pleas- 
ant to him to think that Gordon had been occupied 
half the day in contrasting the finest girl in the 
world with this magnified butterfly. The contrast 
was sufficiently striking as Angela sat there near her, 
very still, bending her handsome head a little, with 
her hands crossed in her lap, and on her lips a kind 
but inscrutable smile. Mrs. Vivian was on the sofa 
next to Blanche^ one of whose hands, when it was 
not otherwise occupied, she occasionally took into her 
own. 

"Dear little Blanche!" she softly murmured, at 
intervals. 

These few remarks represent a longer pause than 
Mrs. Gordon often suffered to occur. She continued 
to deliver herself upon a hundred topics, and it 
hardly matters where we take her up. 

" I have n't the least idea what we are going to do. 
I have nothing to say about it whatever, Gordon 
teUs me every day I must decide, and then I ask 
Captain Lovelock what he thinks ; because, you see, 
he always thinks a great deal Captain Lovelock says 
he does n't care a fig — that he will go wherever I go. 
So you see that does n't carry us very far. I want to 
settle on some place where Captain Lovelock won't 
go, but he won't help me at all. I think it will look 
better for him not to follow us ; don't ygu think it 
will look better, Mrs. Vivian ? Not that I care in 



 301 



• 



the least where we go — or whether Captain Love- 
lock follows us, either. I don't take any interest in 
anything, Mrs. Vivian ; don't you think that is very 
sad? Gordon may go anywhere he likes — to St 
Petersburg, or to Bombay." 

"You might go to a worse place than Bombay," 
said Captain Lovelock, speaking with the authority of 
an Anglo-Indian rich in reminiscences. 

Blanche gave him a little stare. 

" Ah well, that 's knocked on the head ! From the 
way you speak of it, I think you would come after 
us ; and the more I think of that, the more I see it 
would n't do. But we have got to go to some south- 
em place, because I am very unwell I have n't the 
least idea what 's the matter with me, and neither has 
any one else ; but that does n't make any difference. 
It's settled that I am out of health. One might as 
well be out of it as in it, for all the advantage it is. 
If you are out of health, at any rate you can come 
abroad. It was Gordon's discovery — he's always 
making discoveries. You see it's because I'm so 
silly; he can always put it down to my being an 
invalid. What I should like to do, Mrs. Vivian, 
would be to spend the winter with you — just sitting 
on the sofa beside you and holding your hand. It 
would be rather tiresome for you ; but I really think 
it would be better for me than anything else. I have 
never forgotten how kind you were to me before my 



302  

marriage — that summer at Baden. You were every- 
thing to me — you and Captain Lovelock. I am sure 
I should be happy if t never went out of this lovely 
room. You have got it so beautifully arranged — I 
mean to do my own room just like it when I go home. 
And you have got such lovely clothes. You never 
used to say anything about it, but you and Angela 
always had better clothes than I. Are you always 
so quiet and serious — never talking about chiffons — 
always reading some wonderful book ? I wish you 
would let me come and stay with you. If you only 
ask me, Gordon would be too delighted. He would n't 
have to trouble about me any more. He could go and 
live over in the Latin Quarter — that *s the desire of 
his heart — and think of nothing but old bottles. I 
know it is n't very good manners to beg for an invita- 
tion," Blanche went on, smiling with a gentler radi- 
ance; "but when it's a question of one's healtL 
One wants to keep one's self alive — doesn't one? 
One wants to keep one's self going. It would be so 
good for me, Mrs. Vivian; it would really be very 
good for me!" 

She had turned round more and more to her host- 
ess as she talked ; and at last she had given both her 
hands to Mrs. Vivian, and sat looking at her with a 
singular mixture of earnestness and jocosity. It was 
hard to know whether Blanche were expressing a real 
desire or a momentary caprice, and whether this 



 303 

abrupt little petition were to be taken seriously, or 
treated merely as a dramatic 2>05e in a series of more 
or less effective attitudes. Her smile had become 
almost a grimace, she was flushed, she showed her 
pretty teeth ; but there was a little passionate quiver 
in her voice. 

" My dear child," said Mrs. Vivian, " we should be 
delighted to have you pay us a visit, and we should 
be so happy if we could do you any good. But I am 
afraid you would very soon get tired of us, and I 
ought to tell you, frankly, that our little home is to 
be — a — broken up. You know there is to be a — 
a change," the good lady continued, with a hesitation 
which apparently came from a sense of walking on 
uncertain ground, while she glanced with a smile at 
Bernard and Angela. 

Blanche sat there with her little excited, yet inno- 
cent — too innocent — stare; her eyes followed Mrs 
Vivian's. They met Bernard's for an instant, and for 
some reason, at this moment, Bernard flushed. 

He rose quickly and walked away to the window 
where he stood looking out into the darkness. " The 
devil — the devil 1 " he murmured to himself ; " she 
does n't even know we are to be married — Gordon 
has n't been able to trust himself to tell her ! " And 
this fact seemed pregnant with evidence as to Gor- 
don's state of mind ; it did not appear to simplify 
the situation. After a moment, while Bernard stood 



304  

there with his back turned — he felt rather awkward 
and foolish — he heard Blanche begin with her little 
surprised voice. 

*' Ah, you are going away ? You are going to travel ? 
But that 's charming ; we can travel together. You 
are not going to travel ? What then are you going to 
do ? You are going back to America ? Ah, but you 
must n't do that, as soon as I come abroad ; that 's not 
nice or friendly, Mrs. Vivian, to your poor little old 
Blanche. You are not going back to America ? Ah, 
then, I give it up » What 's the great mystery ? Is 
it something about Angela? There was always a 
mystery about Angela. I hope you won't mind my 
saying it, my dear ; but I was always afraid of you. 
My husband — he admires you so much, you know — 
has often tried to explain you to me ; but I have never 
understood. What are you going to do now ? Are 
you going ipto a convent ^ Are you going to be — 
A-a-h!" 

And, suddenly, quickly, interrupting herself, Mrs. 
Gordon gave a long, wondering cry. Bernard heard 
her spring to her feet, and the two other ladies rise 
from their seats. Captain Lovelock got up as well ; 
Bernard heard him knock over his little gilded chair. 
There was a pause, during which Blanche went 
through a little mute exhibition of amazement and 
pleasure. Bernard turned round, to receive half a 
dozen quick questions. 



 305 

" What are you hiding away for ? What are you 
blushing for ? I never saw you do anything like that 
before ! Why do you look so strange, and what are 
you making me say ? Angela, is it true — is there 
something like that ? " Without waiting for the an- 
swer to this last question, Blanche threw herself upon 
Mrs. Vivian. " My own Mrs. Vivian," she cried, " is 
she married ? " 

" My dear Blanche," said Bernard, coming forward. 
" has not Gordon told you ? Angela and I are not 
married, but we hope to be before long. Gordon only 
knew it this morning ; we ourselves have only known 
it a short time. There is no mystery about it, and 
we only want your congratulations." 

" Well, I must say you have been very quiet about 
it 1 " cried Blanche. " When I was engaged, I wrote 
you all a letter." 

"By Jove, she wrote to me!" observed Captain 
Lovelock. 

Angela went to her and kissed her. 

" Your husband does n't seem to have explained me 
very successfully ! " 

Mrs. Gordon held Bernard's intended for a moment 
at arm's length, with both her hands, looking at her 
with eyes of real excitement and wonder. Then she 
folded her in a prolonged, an exaggerated, embrace. 

" Why did n't he tell me — why did n't he tell me ? " 
she presently began. '' He has had aU day to tell me, 

20 



306  

and it was very cruel of him to let me come here with- 
out knowing it. Could anything be more absurd — 
more awkward ? You don't think it 's awkward — 
you don't mind it ? Ah well, you are very good ! 
But I like it, Angela — I like it extremely, immensely. 
I think it 's delightful, and I wonder it never occurred 
to me. Has it been going on long ? Ah, of course, 
it has been going on ! Did 'nt it begin at Baden^ and 
did n't I see it there ? Do you mind my alluding to 
that ? At Baden we were all so mixed up that one 
could n't tell who was attentive to whom ! But Ber- 
nard has been very faithful, my dear ; I can assure 

you of that. When he was in America he would n't 
look at another woman. I know something about 
that ! He stayed three months in my house and he 
never spoke to me. Now I know why, Mr. Bernard ; 
but you might have told me at the time. The rea- 
son was certainly good enough. I always want to 
know why, you know. Why Gordon never told me, 
for instance ; that 's what I want to know ! " 

Blanche refused to sit down again; she declared 
that she was so agitated by this charming news that 
she could not be quiet, and that she must presently 
take her departure. Meanwhile she congratulated 
each of her friends half a dozen times; she kissed 
Mrs. Vivian again, she almost kissed Bernard; she 
inquired about details ; she longed to hear all about 
Angela's " things." Of course they would stop for 



 307 

the wedding ; but meantime she must be very dis- 
creet; she must not intrude too much. Captain 
Lovelock addressed to Angela a few fragmentary, 
but well-intentioned sentences, pulling his beard and 
fixing his eyes on the door-knob — an implement 
which presently turned in his manly fist, as he opened 
the door for his companion to withdraw. Blanche 
went away in a flutter of ejaculations and protesta- 
tions which left our three friends in Mrs. Vivian's 
little drawing-room standing looking at each other as 
the door closed behind her. 

" It certainly would have been better taste in him 
to tell her," said Bernard, frowning, " and not let other 
people see how little communication there is between 
them. It has mortified her." 

" Poor Mr. Wright had his reasons," Mrs. Vivian 
suggested, and then she ventured to explain : " He 
still cares for Angela, and it was painful to him to 
talk about her marrying some one else." 

This had been Bernard's own reflection, and it was 
no more agreeable as Mrs. Vivian presented it ; though 
Angela herself seemed indifferent to it — seemed, in- 
deed, not to hear it, as if she were thinking of some- 
thing else. 

" We must simply marry as soon as possible ; to- 
morrow, if necessary," said Bernard, with some caus- 
ticity. " That 's the best thing we can do for every 
one. When once Angela is married, Gordon will stop 



308 ^  

thinkmg of her. He will never permit his imagina- 
tion to hover about a married woman ; I am very snre 
of that. He does n't approve of that sort of thing, and 
he has the same law for himself as for other people." 

" It does n't matter," said Angela, simply. 

" How do you mean, my daughter, it does n't mat- 
ter?" 

" I don't feel obliged to feel so sorry for him now." 

" Now ? Pray, what has happened ? I am more 
sorry than ever, since I have heard poor Blanche's 
dreadful tone about him." 

The girl was silent a moment ; then she shook her 
head, lightly. 

" Her tone — her tone ? Dearest mother, don't you 
see ? She is intensely in love with him T' 






XXVIII. 

This observation struck Bernard as extremely in- 
genious and worthy of his mistress's fine intelligence ; 
he greeted it with enthusiasm, and thought of it for 
the next twelve hours. The more he thought of it 
the more felicitous it seemed to him, and he went to 
Mrs. Vivian's the next day almost for the express pur- 
pose of saying to Angela that, decidedly, she was right. 
fle was admitted by his old friend, the little fmume 
de chambre, who had long since bestowed upon him, 
definitively, her confidence ; and as in the ante-cham- 
ber he heard the voice of a gentleman raised and 
talking with some emphasis, come to him from the 
salon, he paused a moment, looking at her with an 
interrogative eye. 

" Yes," said Mrs. Vivian's attendant, " I must tell 
Monsieur frankly that another gentleman is there. 
Moreover, what does it matter? Monsieur would 
perceive it for himself ! " 

" Has he been here long ? " asked Bernard. 

" A quarter of an hour. It probably does n't seem 
long to the gentleman ! " 

" Is he alone with Mademoiselle ? " 



310  

"He asked for Mademoiselle only. I introduced 
him into the salon, and Mademoiselle, after conversing 
t a little while with Madame, consented to receive him. 
They have been alone together, as I have told Mon- 
sieur, since about three o'clock. Madame is in her 
own apartment. The position of Monsieur," added 
this discriminating woman, " certainly justifies him in 
entering the salons 

Bernard was quite of this opinion, and in a moment 
more he had crossed the threshold of the little draw- 
ing-room and closed the door behind him. 

Angela sat there on a sofa, leaning back with her 
hands clasped in her lap and her eyes fixed iipon Gor- 
don Wright, who stood squarely before her, as if he 
had been making her- a resolute speech. Her face 
wore a look of distress, almost of alarm ; she kept her 
place, but her eyes gave Bernard a mute welcome. 
Gordon turned and looked at him slowly from head 
to foot. Bernard remembered, with a good deal of 
vividness, the last look his friend had given him in 
the Champs Elysees the day before ; and he saw with 
some satisfaction that this was not exactly a repetition 
of that expression of cold horror. It was a question, 
however, whether the horror were changed for the bet- 
ter. Poor Gordon looked intensely sad and grievously 
wronged. The keen resentment had faded from his 
face, but an immense reproach was there — a heavy, 
helpless, appealing reproach. Bernard saw that he 



 311 

had not a scene of violence to dread — and yet, when 
he perceived what was coming, he would almost have 
preferred violence. Gordon did not offer him his 
liand, and before Bernard had had time to say any- 
thing, began to speak again, as if he were going on 
with what he had been saying to Angela. 

" You have done me a great wrong — you have done 
me a cruel wrohg ! I have been telling it to Miss 
Vivian ; I came on purpose to tell her. I can't really 
tell her ; I can't tell her the details ; it *s too painful ! 
But you know what I mean ! I could n't stajid it any 
longer. I thought of going away — but I could n't do 
that. I must come and say what I feel. I can't bear 
it now.*' 

This outbreak of a passionate sense of injury in a 
man habitually so undemonstrative, so little disposed 
to call attention to himself, had in it something at 
once of the touching and the terrible. Bernard, for 
an instant, felt almost bewildered ; he asked himself 
whether he had not, after all, been a monster of du- 
plicity. He was guilty of the weakness of taking 
refuge in what is called, I believe, in legal phrase, a 
side-issue. 

" Don't say all this before Angela ! " he exclaimed, 
with a kind of artificial energy. " You know she is 
not in the least at fault, and that it can only give her 
pain. The thing is between ourselves." 

Angela was sitting there, looking up at both the 
men. " I like to hear it," she said. 



312  

" You have a singular taste ! " Bernard declared. 

" I know it 's between ourselves," cried Gordon, " and 
that Miss Vivian is not at fault. She is only top 
lovely, too wise, too good ! It is you and I that are 
at fault — horribly at fault ! You see I admit it, and 
you don't I never dreamed that I should live to say 
such things as this to you ; but I never dreamed you 
would do what you have done ! It 's horrible, most 
horrible, that such a difference as this should come 
between two men who believed themselves — or whom 
I believed, at least — the best friends in the world. 
For it is a difference — it 's a great gulf, and nothing 
will ever fill it up. I must say so ; I can't help it 
You know I don't express myself easily ; so, if I break 
out this way, you may know what I feeL I know it 
is a pain to Miss Vivian, and I beg her to forgive me. 
She has so much to forgive that she can forgive that, 
too. I can't pretend to accept it ; I can't sit down 
and let it pass. And then, it is n't only my feelings ; 
it 's the right ; it 's the justice. I must say to her that 
you have no right to marry her ; and beg of her to 
listen to me and let you go." 

" My dear Gordon, are you crazy ? " Bernard de- 
manded, with an energy which, this time at least, was 
sufficiently real. 

'* Very likely I am crazy. I am crazy with disap- 
pointment and the bitterness of what I have lost. 
Add to that the wretchedness of what I have found ! ** 



 313 

" Ah, don't say that, Mr. Wright," Angela begged 

He stood for an instant looking at her, but not heed- 
ing her words. " Will you listen to me again ? Will 
you forget the wrong I did you ? — my stupidity and 
folly and unworthiness ? Will you blot out the past 
and let me begin again. I see you as clearly now as 
the light of that window. WiU you give me another 
chance ? " 

Angela turned away her eyes and covered her face 
with her hands. " You do pain me ! " she murmured. 

*' You go too far," said Bernard. " To what position 
does your extraordinary proposal relegate your wife ? " 

Gordon turned his pleading eyes on his old friend 
without a ray of concession ; but for a moment he 
hesitated. " Don't speak to me of my wife. I have 
no wife." 

"Ah, poor girl!" said Angela, springing up from 
the sofa. 

" I am perfectly serious," Gordon went on, address- 
ing himself again to her. " No, after all, I am not 
crazy ; I see only too clearly — I see what should be ; 
when people see that, you call them crazy. Bernard 
has no right — he must give you up. If you really 
care for him, you should help him. He is in a very 
false position ; you should n't wish to see him in such 
a position. I can't explain to you — if it were even 
for my own sake. But Bernard must have told you ; 
it is not possible that he has not told you ? " 



314  

" I have told Angela everything, Gordon," said Ber- 
nard. 

" I don't know what you mfean by your having done 
me a wrong 1 " the girl exclaimed. 

" If he has told you, then — I may say it ! In lis- 
tening to him, in believing him." 

"But you didn't believe me," Bernard exclaimed, 
" since you immediately went and offered yourself to 
Miss Vivian ! " 

" I believed you all the same ! When did I ever 
not believe you ? " 

"The last words I ever heard from Mr. Wright 
were words of the deepest kindness," said Angela. 

She spoke with such a serious, tender grace, that 
Gordon seemed stirred to his depths again. 

" Ah, give me another chance 1 " he moaned. 

The poor girl could not help her tone, and it was in 
the same tone that she continued — 

" If you think so well of me, try and be reasona- 
ble." 

Gordon looked at her, slowly shaking his head. 

" Eeasonable — reasonable ? Yes, you have a right 
to say that, for you are full of reason. But so am I. 
What I ask is within reasonable limits." 

" Granting your happiness were lost," said Bernard 
— "I say that only for the argument — is that a 
ground for your wishing to deprive me of mine ? " 

" It is not yours — it is mine, that you have taken I 



 315 

You put me off my guard, and then you took it! 
Yours is elsewhere, and you are welcome to it ! " 

" Ah," murmured Bernard, giving him a long look 
and turning away, " it is well for you that I am will- 
ing still to regard you as my best friend ! " 

Gordon went on, more passionately, to Angela. 

" He put me off my guard — I can't call it anything 
else. I know I gave him a great chance — I encour- 
aged him, urged him, tempted him. But when once 
he had spoken, he should have stood to it. He 
should n*t have had two opinions — one for me, and 
one for himself ! He put me off my guard. It was 
because I still resisted him that I went to you again, 
that last time. But I was still afraid of you, and in 
my heart I believed him. As I say, I always be- 
lieved him ; it was his great influence upon me. He 
is the cleverest, the most intelligent, the most bril- 
liant of men. I don't think that a grain less than I 
ever thought it," he continued, turning again to Ber- 
nard. " I think it only the more, and I don't wonder 
that you find a woman to believe it. But what have 
you done but deceive me ? It was just my belief 
in your intelligence that reassured me. When Miss 
Vivian refused me a second time, and I left Baden, 
it was at first with a sort of relief. But there came 
back a better feeling — a feeling faint compared to 
this feeling of to-day, but strong enough to make me 
uneasy and to fill me with regret. To quench my 



316  

regret, I kept thinking of what you had said, and it 
kept me quiet. Your word had such weight with 
me!" 

" How many times more would you have wished to 
be refused, and how many refusals would have been 
required to give me my liberty ? " asked Bernard. 

" That question means nothing, because you never 
knew that I had again offered myself to Miss Vivian." 

" No ; you told me very little, considering all that 
you made me teU you." 

" I told you beforehand that I should do exactly as 
I chosa" 

" You should have allowed me the same liberty ! " 

" Liberty ! " cried Gordon. *' Had n't you liberty to 
range the whole world over ? Could n't he have 
found a thousand other women ? " 

" It is not for me to think so," said Angela, smiling 
a little. 

Gordon looked at her a moment. 

" Ah, you cared for him from the first ! " he cried. 

" I had seen him before I ever saw you," said the 
girL 

Bernard suppressed an exclamatioa There seemed 
to flash through these words a sort of retrospective 
confession which told him something: that she had 
never directly told him. She blushed as soon as she 
had spoken, and Bernard found a beauty in this of 
which the brightness blinded him to the awkward 



 317 

aspect of the fact she had just presented to Gordon. 
At this fact Gordon stood staring; then at last he 
apprehended it — largely. 

" Ah, then, it had been a plot between you ! " he 
cried out. 

Bernard and Angela exchanged a glance of pity. 

" We had met for five minutes, and had exchanged 
a few words before I came to Baden. It was in Italy 
— at Siena. It was a simple accident that I never 
told you," Bernard explained. 

"I wished that nothing should be said about it," 
said Angela. 

"Ah, you loved hini !" Gordon exclaimed. 

Angela turned away — she went to the window. 
Bernard followed her for three seconds with his eyes ; 
then he went on — 

" If it were so, I had no reason to suppose it. You 
have accused me of deceiving you, but I deceived only 
myself. You say I put you off your guard, but you 
should rather say you put me on mine. It was, 
thanks to that, that I fell into the most senseless, 
the most brutal of delusions. The delusion passed 
away — it had contained the germ of better things. 
I saw my error, and I bitterly repented of it ; and on 
the day you were married I felt free." 

"Ah, yes, I have no doubt you waited for that!" 
cried Gordon. "It may interest you to know that 
my marriage is a miserable failure." 



318  

"I am Sony to hear it — but I can't help it." 

" You have seen it with your own eyes. You know 
all about it, and I need n't tell you." 

" My dear Mr. Wright," said Angela, pleadingly, 
turning round, " in Heaven's name, don't say that ! " 

" Why should n't I say it ? I came here on purpose 
to say it. I came here with an intention — with a 
plan. You know what Blanche is — you need n't pre- 
tend, for kindness to me, that you don't. You know 
what a precious, what an inestimable wife she must 
make me — how devoted, how sympathetic she must 
be, and what a household blessing at every hour of 
the day. Bernard can tell you all about us — he has 
Been us in the sanctity of our home." Gordon gave a 
bitter laugh and went on, with the same strange, seri- 
ous air of explaining his plan. " She despises me, she 
hates me, she cares no more for me than for the but- 
ton on her glove — by which I mean that she does n't 
care a hundredth part as much. You may say that it 
serves me right, and that I have got what I deserve. 
I married her because she was silly. I wanted a silly 
wife ; I had an idea you were too wise. Oh, yes, that 's 
what I thought of you ! Blanche knew why I picked 
her out, and undertook to supply the article required. 
Heaven forgive her 1 She has certainly kept her en- 
gagement. But you can imagine how it must have 
made her like me — knowing why I picked her out ! 
She has disappointed me all the same. I thought 



 319 

she had a heart ; but that was a mistake. It does n't 
matter, though, because everything is over between 
us." 

" What do you mean, everything is over ? " Bernard 
demanded. . 

" Everything will be over in a few weeks. Then 
I can speak to Miss Vivian seriously." 

"All! I am glad to hear this is not serious/' said 
Bernard. 

" Miss Vivian, wait a few weeks," Gordon went on, 
" Give me another chance then. Then it will be per- 
fectly right ; I shall be free." 

"You speak as if you were going to put an end to 
your wife ! " 

"She is rapidly putting an end to herself. She 
means to leave me." 

" Poor, unhappy man, do you know what you are 
saying ? " Angela murmured. 

" Perfectly. I came here to say it. She means to 
leave me, and I mean to offer her every facility. She 
is dying to take a lover, and she has got an excellent 
one waiting for her. Bernard knows whom I mean ; 
I don't know whether you do. She was ready to take 
one three months after our marriage. It is really 
very good of her to have waited all this time ; but I 
don't think she can go more than a week or two 
longer. She is recommended a southern climate, and 
I am pretty sure that in the course of another ten 



320  

days I may count upon their starting together for the 
shores of the Mediterranean. The shores of the Medi- 
terranean, you know, are lovely, and I hope they will 
do her a world of good. As soon as they have left 
Paris I will let you know; and then you will of 
course admit that, virtually, I am free." 

" I don't understand you." 

" I suppose you are aware," said Gordon, " that we 
have the advantage of being natives of a country in 
which marriages may be legally dissolved." 

Angela stared; then, softly — 

"Are you speaking of a divorce ? " 

"I believe that is what they call it," Gordon'an- 

, swered, gazing back at her with his densely clouded 

blue eyes. " The lawyers do it for you ; and if she 

goes away with Lovelock, nothing will be more simple 

than for me to have it arranged." 

Angela stared, I say ; and Bernard was staring, too. 
Then the latter, turning away, broke out into a tre- 
mendous, irrepressible laugh. 

Gordon looked at him a moment ; then he said to 
Angela, with a deeper tremor in his voice — 

" He was my dearest friend." 

" I never felt more devoted to you than at this mo- 
ment ! " Bernard declared, smiling still. 

Gordon had fixed his sombre eyes upon the girl 
again. 

" Do you understand me now ? " 



 321 

Angela looked back at him for some instants. 

" Yes," she murmured at last. 

" And will you wait, and give me another chance? " 

" Yes," she said, in the same tone. 

Bernard uttered a quick exclamation, but Angela 
checked him with a glance, and Gordon looked from 
one of them to the other. 

" Can I trust you ? " Gordon asked. 

" I will make you happy," said Angela. 

Bernard wondered what under the sun she meant ; 
but he thought he might safely add — 

" I will abide by her choice." 

Gordon actually began to smile. 

" It won't be long, I think ; two or three weeks." 

Angela made no answer to this ; she fixed her eyes 
on the floor. 

" I shall see Blanche as often as possible," she pres- 
ently said. 

" By all means ! The more you see her the better 
you will understand me." 

" I understand you very well now. But you have 
shaken me very much, and you must leave me. I 
shall see you also — often." 

Gordon took up his hat and stick; he saw that 
Bernard did not do the same. 

"And Bernard?" he exclaimed. 

" I shall ask him to leave Paris," said Angela. 

" Wm you go ? " 

21 



322  

" I will do what Angela requests," said Bernard. 

" You have heard what she requests ; it *s for you to 
come now." • 

"Ah, you must at least allow me to take leave ! " 
cried Bernard. 

Gordon went to the door, and when he had opened 
it he stood for a while, holding it and looking at his 
companions. Then — 

" I assure you she won't be long ! " he said to An- 
gela, and rapidly passed out. 

The others stood silent till they heard the outer 
door of the apartment close behind him. 

"And now please to elucidate ! " said Bernard, fold- 
ing his arms. 

Angela gave no answer for some moments; then 
she turned upon him a smile which appeared incon- 
gruous, but which her words presently helped to 
explain. 

" He is intensely in love with his wife ! '* 



XXIX. 

This statement was very effective, but it might 
well have seemed at first to do more credit to her 
satiric powers than to her faculty of observation. 
This was the light in which it presented itself to 
Bernard; but, little by little, as she amplified the 
text, he grew to think well of it, and at last he was 
quite ready to place, as a triumph of sagacity, on a 
level with that other discovery which she had made 
the evening before and with regard to which his es- 
pecial errand to-day had been to congratulate her 
afresh. It brought him, however, less satisfaction 
than it appeared to bring to his clever companion; 
for, as he observed plausibly enough, Gordon was 
quite out of his head, and, this being the case, of 
what importance was the secret of his heart ? 

" The secret of his heart and the condition of his 
head are one and the same thing," said Angela. " He 
is turned upside down by the wretchedly false posi- 
tion that he has got into with his wife. She has 
treated him badly, but he has treated her wrongly. 
They are in love with each other, and yet they both 
do nothing but hide it. He is not in the least in love 



324  

with poor me — not to-day any more than he was 
three years ago. He thinks he is, because he is full 
of sorrow and bitterness, and because the news of our 
engagement has given him a shock. But that 's only 
a pretext — a chance to pour out the grief and pain 
which have been accumulating in his heart under a 
sense of his estrangement from Blanche. He is too 
proud to attribute his feelings to that cause, even to 
himself; but he wanted to cry out and say he was hurt, 
to demand justice for a wrong ; and the revelation of 
the state of things between you and me — which of 
course strikes him as incongruous; we must allow 
largely for that — came to him as a sudden opportu- 
nity. No, no," the girl went on, with a generous ardor 
in her face, following further the train of her argu- 
ment, which she appeared to find extremely attrac- 
tive, " I know what you are going to say and I deny it. 
I am not fanciful, or sophistical, or irrational, and I 
know perfectly what I am about. Men are so stupid ; 
it *s only women that have real discernment. Leave 
me alone, and I shall do something. Blanche is silly, 
yes, very silly ; but she is not so bad as her husband 
accused her of being, in those dreadful words which 
he wiU live to repent of. She is wise enough to care 
for him, greatly, at bottom, and to feel her little heart 
filled with rage and shame that he does n't appear to 
care for her. If he would take her a little more seri- 
ously — it 's an immense pity he married her because 



 325 

she was silly ! — she would be flattered by it, and she 
would try and deserve it. No, no, no ! she does n't, 
in reality, care a straw for Captain Lovelock, I assure 
you, I promise you she doesn't. A woman can tell. 
She is in danger, possibly, and if her present situation, 
as regards her husband, lasts, she might do something 
as horrid as he said. But she would do it out of spite 
— not out of affection for the Captain, who must be 
got immediately out of the way. She only keeps him 
to torment her husband and make Gordon come back 
to her. She would drop him forever to-morrow." 
Angela paused a moment, reflecting, with a kindled 
eye. " And she shall ! " 
Bernard looked incredulous. 
" How will that be. Miss Solomon ? '* 
" You shall see when you come back." 
" When I come back ? Pray, where am I going ? " 
" You will leave Paris for a fortnight — as I prom- 
ised our poor friend." 

Bernard gave an irate laugh. 
" My dear girl, you are ridiculous ! Your promis- 
ing it was almost as childish as his asking it." 

" To play with a child you must be childish. Just 
see the effect of this abominable passion of love, which 
you have been crying up to me so ! By its operation 
Gordon Wright, the most sensible man of our acquaint- 
ance, is reduced to the level of infamy ! If you will 
only go away, I will manage him." 



826  

" Tou certainly manage me I Pray, ■where shall I 
go?" 

" Wherever you choose. I will write to you fevery 
day," 

" That will be an inducement," said Bernard. " You 
know I have never received a letter from you." 

" I write the most delightful ones ! " Angela ex- 
claimed ; and she succeeded in making him promise 
to start that night for London. 

She had just done so when Mrs. Vivian presented 
herself, and the good lady was not a little astonished 
at being informed of his intention. 

" You surely are not going to give up my daughter 
to oblige Mr. Wright ? " she observed. 

" Upon my word, I feel as if I were ! " said Ber- 
nard. 

" I will explain it, dear mamma," said Angela. " It 
is very interesting. Mr. Wright has made a most 
feaiful scene ; the state of things between him and 
Blanche is dreadful." 

Mrs. Vivian opened her clear eyes. 

" You really speak as if you liked it ! " 

" She does like it — she told Gordon sp^^dd Ber- 
nard. " I don't know what she is up to ! Gordon 
has taken leave o put away 

his wife." 

" To put her 

" To repudiat f I " 



 327 

"To repudiate little Blanche!" murmured Mrs. 
Vivian, as if she were struck with the incongruity of 
the operation. 

" I mean to keep them together," said Angela, with 
a firm decision. 

Her mother looked at her with admiration. 

*' My dear daughter, I will assist you." 

The two ladies had such an air of mysterious com- 
petence to the task they had undertaken that it 
seemed to Bernard that nothing was left to him but 
to retire into temporary exile. He accordingly be- 
took himself to London, where he had social resources 
which would, perhaps, make exile endurable. He 
found himself, however, little disposed to avail him- 
self of these resources, and he treated himself to no 
pleasures but those of memory and expectation. He 
ached with a sense of his absence from Mrs. Vivian's 
deeply familiar sky-parlor, which seemed to him for 
the time the most sacred spot on earth — if on earth 
it could be called — and he consigned to those gen- 
erous postal receptacles which ornament with their 
brilliant hue the London street-corners, an inordinate 
number of the most voluminous epistles that had ever 
been dropped into them. He took long walks, alone, 
and thought all the way of Angela,, to whom, it seemed 
to him, that the character of ministering angel was ex- 
tremely becoming. She was faithful to her promise 
of writing to him every day, and she was an angel 



328  

who wielded — so at least Bernard thought, and he 
was particular about letters — a very ingenious pen. 
Of course she had only one topic — the success 'of her 
operations with regard to Gordon. ''Mamma has 
undertaken Blanche/' she wrote, " and I am devoting 
myself to Mr. W. It is really very interesting." She 
told Bernard all about it in detail, and he also found 
it interesting ; doubly so, indeed, for it must be con- 
fessed that the charming figure of the mistress of his 
affections attempting to heal a great social breach with 
her light and delicate hands, divided his attention 
pretty equally with the distracted, the distorted, the 
almost ludicrous, image of his old friend. 

Angela wrote that Gordon had X5ome back to see her 
the day after his first visit, and had seemed greatly 
. troubled on learning that Bernard had taken himself 
off. " It was because you insisted on it, of course," 
he said ; "it was not from feeling the justice of it him- 
self." " I told him," said Angela, in her letter, " that 
I had made a point of it, but that we certainly ought 
to give you a little credit for it. But I could n't in- 
sist upon this, for fear of sounding a wrong note and 
exciting afresh what I suppose he would be pleased 
to term his jealousy. He asked me where you had 
gone, and when I told him — ' Ah, how he must hate 
me ! ' he exclaimed. * There you are quite wrong,' I 
answered. ' He feels as kindly to you as — as I do.* 
He looked as if he by no means believed this ; but, 



 329 

indeed, lie looks as if he believed nothing at all. He 
is quite upset and demoralized. He stayed half an 
hour and paid me his visit — trying hard to 'please' 
me again ! Poor man, he is in a charming state to 
please the fair sex ! But if he does n*t please me, he 
interests me more and more ; I make bold to say that 
to you. You would have said it would be very awk- 
ward ; but, strangely enough, I found it very easy. I 
suppose it is because I am so interested. Very likely it 
was awkward for him, poor fellow, for I can certify that 
he was not a whit happier at the end of his half-hour, 
in spite of the privilege he had enjoyed. He said 
nothing more about you, and we talked of Paris and 
New York, of Baden and Eome. Imagine the situa- 
tion ! I shall make no resistance whatever to it ; I 
shall simply let him perceive that conversing with me 
on these topics does not make him feel a bit more 
comfortable, and that he must look elsewhere for a 
remedy. I said not a word about Blanche." 

She spoke of Blanche, however, the next time. " He 
came again this afternoon," she said in her second let- 
ter, " and he wore exactly the same face as yesterday 
— namely, a very unhappy one. If I were not en- 
tirely too wise to believe his account of himself, I 
might suppose that he was unhappy because Blanche 
shows symptoms of not taking flight. She has been 
with us a great deal — she has no idea what is going 
on — and I can't honestly say that she chatters any 



330  

less than usual. But she is greatly interested in cer- 
tain shops that she is buying out, and especially in 
her visits to her tailor. Mamma has proposed to her 
— in view of your absence — to come and stay with us, 
and she does n't seem afraid of the idea. I told her 
husband to-day that we had asked her, and that -we 
hoped he had no objection. * None whatever ; but 
she won't come.' * On the contrary, she says she will' 
* She will pretend to, up to the last minute ; and then 
she will find a pretext for backing out.' ' Decidedly, 
you think very ill of her/ I said. ' She hates me,' he 
answered, looking at me strangely. ' You say that of 
every one,' I said. * Yesterday you said it of Bernard.' 
' Ah, for him there would be more reason 1 ' he ex- 
claimed. ' I won't attempt to answer for Bernard,' I 
went on, ' but I will answer for Blanche. Your idea 
of her hating you is a miserable delusion. She cares 
for you more than for any one in the world. You 
only misunderstand each other, and with a little good 
will on both sides you can easily get out of your tai)- 
gle.' But he would n't listen to me ; he stopped me 
short. I saw I should excite him if I insisted ; so I 
dropped the subject. But it is not for long ; he shcdl 
listen to me." 

Later she wrote that Blanche had in fact " backed 
out," and would not come to stay with them, having 
given as . an excuse that she was perpetually trjdng 
on dresses, and that at Mrs. Vivian's she should be at 



 331 

an inconvenient distance from the temple of these 
sacred rites, and the high priest who conducted the 
worship. " But we see her every day," said Angela, 
"and mamma is constantly with her. She likes 
mamma better than me. Mamma listens to her a 
great deal and talks to her a little — I can't do either 
when we are alone. I don't know what she says — 
I mean what mamma says; what Blanche says I 
know as well as if I heard it. We see nothing of 
Captain Lovelock, and mamma tells me she has not 
spoken of him for two days. She thinks this is a bet- 
ter symptom, but I am not so sure. Poor Mr. Wright 
treats it as a great triumph that Blanche should be- 
have as he foretold. He is welcome to the comfort 
he can get out of this, for he certainly gets none from 
anything else. The society of your correspondent is 
not that balm to his spirit which he appeared to ex- 
pect, and this in spite of the fact that I have been as 
gentle and kind with him as I know how to be. He 
is very silent — he sometimes sits for ten minutes 
without speaking; I assure you it isn't amusing. 
Sometimes he looks at me as if he were going to 
break out with that crazy idea to which he treated me 
the other day. But he says nothing, and then I see 
that he is not thinking of me — he is simply thinking 
of Blanche. The more he thinks of her the better." 

" My dear Bernard," she began on another occasion, 
" I hope you are not dying of ennui, etc. Over here 



332  

things are going so-so. He asked me yesterday to go 
with him to the Louvre, and we walked about among 
the pictures for half an hour. Mamma thinks it a 
very strange sort of thing for me to be doing, and 
though she delights, of all things, in a good cause, she 
is not sure that this cause is good enough to justify 
the means. I admit that the means are very sin- 
gular, and, as far as the Louvre is concerned, they 
were not successful. We sat and looked for a quarter 
of an hour at the great Venus who has lost her arms, 
and he said never a word. I think he does n't know 
what to say. Before we separated he asked me if I 
heard from you. * Oh, yes,' I said, * every day.' * And 
does he speak of me ? ' ' Never ! ' I answered ; and I 
think he looked disappointed." Bernard had, in fact, 
in writing to Angela, scarcely mentioned his nama 
" He had not been here for two days," she continued, 
at the end of a week ; " but last evening, very late — 
too late for a visitor — he came in. Mamma had left 
the drawing-room, and I was sitting alone ; I imme- 
diately saw that we had reached a crisis. I thought 
at first he was going to tell me that Blanche 'had car- 
ried out his prediction ; but I presently saw that this 
was not where the shoe pinched ; and, besides, I 
knew that mamma was watching her too closely. 
* How can I have ever been such a duU-souled idiot? ' 
he broke out, as soon as he had got into the room. 
'I like to hear you say that,' I said, 'because it 



 333 

doesn't seem to me that you have been at all wise/ 
' You are cleverness, kindness, tact, in the most per- 
fect form ! ' he went on. As a veracious historian I 
am bound to tell you that he paid me a bushel of 
compliments, and thanked me in the most flattering 
terms for my having let him bore me so for a week. 
* You have not bored me,' I said ; * you have inter- 
ested me.' 'Yes,' he cried, 'as a curious case of 
monomania. It's a part of your kindness to say 
that; but I know I have bored you to death; and 
the end of it all is that you despise me. You can't 
help despising me; I despise myself. I used to 
think that I was a man, but I have given that up ; 
I am a poor creature ^ I used to think I could take 
things quietly and bear them bravely. But I can't ! 
If it were not for very shame I could sit here and cry 
to you.' ' Don't mind me,' I said ; ' you know it is a 
part of our agreement that I was not to be critical.' 
' Our agreement ? ' he repeated, vaguely. ' I see you 
have forgotten it,' I answered ; ' but it does n't in the 
least matter ; it is not of that I wish to talk to you. 
All the more that it hasn't done you a particle of 
good. I have been extremely nice with you for a 
week ; but you are just as unhappy now as you were 
at the beginning. Indeed, I thmk you are rather 
worse.' ' Heaven forgive me. Miss Vivian, I believe 
I am ! ' he cried. ' Heaven will easily forgive you ; 
you are on the wrong road. To catch up with your 



334  

happiness, which has been running • away from you, 
you must take another ; you must travel in the same 
direction as Blanche ; you must not separate yourself 
from your wife/ At the sound of Blanche's name 
he jumped up and took his usual tone ; he knew all 
about his wife, and needed no information. But I 
made liim sit down again, and I made him listen to 
me. I made him listen for half an hour, and at the 
end of the time he was interested. He had all the 
appearance of it; he sat gazing at me, and at last 
the tears came into his eyes. I believe I had a 
moment of eloquence. I don't know what I said, nor 
how I said it, to what point it would bear examina- 
tion, nor how, if you had been there, it would seem 
to you, as a disinterested critic, to hang together; 
but I know that after a while there were tears in my 
own eyes. I begged him not to give up Blanche ; 
I assured him that she is not so foolish as she 
seems ; that she is a very delicate little creature to 
handle, and that, in reality, whatever she does, she 
is thinking only of him. He had been all good- 
ness and kindness to her, I knew that ; but he had 
not, from the first, been able to conceal from her that 
he regarded her chiefly as a pretty kitten. She 
wished to be more than that, and she took refuge in 
flirting, simply to excite his jealousy and make him 
feel strongly about her. . He has felt strongly, and he 
was feeling strongly now ; he was feeling passionately 



 335 

— that was my whole contention. But he had per- 
haps never made it plain to those rather near-sighted 
little mental eyes of hers, and he had let her suppose 
something that could n't fail to rankle in her mind 
and torment it. ' You have let her suppose/ I said, 

* that you were thinking of me, and the poor girl has 
been jealous of me. I know, it, but from nothing 
she herself has said. She has said nothing ; she has 
been too proud and too considerate. If you don't 
think that *s to her honor, I do. She has had a 
chance every day for a week, but she has treated me 
without a grain of spite. I have appreciated it, I 
have understood it, and it has touched me very much. 
It ought to touch you, Mr. Wright. When she heard 
I was engaged to Mr. Longueville, it gave her an im- 
mense relief. And yet, at the same moment you 
were protesting, and denouncing, and saying those 
horrible things about her ! I know how she appears 

— she likes admiration. But the admiration in the 
world which she would most delight in just now 
would be yours. She plays with Captain Lovelock 
as a child does with a wooden harlequin, she pulls a 
string and he throws up his arms and legs. She has 
about as much intention of eloping with him as a 
little girl might have of eloping with a pasteboard 
Jim Crow. If you were to have a frank explanation 

* with her, Blanche would very soon throw Jim Crow 
out of the window. I very humbly entreat you to 



336  

cease thinking of me. I don't know what wrong you 
have ever done me, or what kindness I have ever 
done you, that you should feel obliged to trouble your 
head about me. You see all I am — I tell you now. 
I am nothing in the least remarkable. As for your 
thinking ill of me at Baden, I never knew it nor 
cared about it. If it had been so, you see how I 
should have got over it. Dear Mr. Wright, we might 
be such good friends, if you would only believe me. 
She 's so pretty, so charming, so universally admired. 
You said just now you had bored me, but it 's noth- 
ing — in spite of all the compliments you have paid 
me — to the way I have bored you. If she could 
only know it — that I have bored you ! Let her see 
for half an hour that I am out of your mind — the 
rest will take care of itself. She might so easily 
have made a quarrel with me. The way she has 
behaved to me is one of the prettiest things I have 
ever seen, and you shall see the way I shall always 
behave to her ! Don't think it necessary to say out of 
politeness that I have not bored you ; it is not in the 
least necessary. You know perfectly well that you 
are disappointed in the charm of my society. And 
I have done my* best, too. I can honestly affirm 
that ! ' For some time he said nothing, and then he 
remarked that I was very clever, but he did n't see a 
word of sense in what I said. ' It only proves,' I 
said, * that the merit of my conversation is smaller 



I 



 337 

than you had taken it into your head to fancy. But 
I have done you good, all the same. Don't contra- 
dict me ; you don't know yet ; and it's too late for us 
to argue about it. You will tell me to-morrow.' " 



n 



I 



XXX. 

Some three evenings after he received this last re- 
port of the progress of affairs in Paris, Bernard, upon 
whom the burden of exile sat none the more lightly 
as the days went on, turned out of the Strand into 
one of the theatres. He had been gloomily pushing 
his way through the various London densities — the 
November fog, the nocturnal darkness, the jostling 
crowd. He was too restless to do anything but walk, 
and he had been saying to himself, for the thousandth 
time, that if he had been guilty of a misdemeanor in 
succumbing to the attractions of the admirable girl 
who showed to such advantage in letters of twelve 
pages, his fault was richly expiated by these days of 
impatience and bereavement. He gave little heed to 
the play; his thoughts were elsewhere, and, while 
they rambled, his eyes wandered round the house. 
Suddenly, on the other side of it, he beheld Captain 
Lovelock, seated squarely in his orchestra-stall, but, 
if Bernard was not mistaken, paying as little atten- 
tion to the stage as he himself had dona The Cap- 
tain's eyes, it is true, were fixed upon the scene ; his 
head was bent a little, his magnificent beard rippled 



 339 

over the expanse of his shirt-front But Bernard was 
not slow to see that his gaze was heavy and opaque, 
and that, though he was staring at the actresses, their 
charms were lost upon him. He saw that, like him- 
self, poor Lovelock had matter for reflection in his 
manly breast, and he concluded that Blanche's pon- 
derous swain was also suffering from a sense of dis- 
junction. Lovelock sat in the same posture all the 
evening, and that his imagination had not projected 
itself into the play was proved by the fact that dur- 
' ing the entractes he gazed with the same dull fixed- 
ness at the curtain. Bernard forebore to interrupt 
him ; we know that he was not at this moment so- 
cially inclined, and he judged that the Captain was as 
little so, inasmuch as causes even more imperious than 
those which had operated in his own case must have 
been at the bottom of his sudden appearance in Lon- 
don. On leaving the theatre, however, Bernard found 
himself detained with the crowd in the vestibule near 
the door, which, wide open to the street, was a scene 
of agitation and confusion. It had come on to rain, 
and the raw dampness mingled itself with the dusky 
uproar of the Strand. At last, among the press of 
people, as he was passing out, our hero became aware 
that he had been brought into contact with Lovelock, 
who was walking just beside him. At the same mo- 
ment Lovelock noticed him — looked at him for an 
instant, and^ then looked away. But ho looked back 



340  

again the next instant, and the two men then uttered 
that inarticulate and inexpressive exclamation which 
passes for a sign of greeting among gentlemen of the 
Anglo-Saxon race, in their moments of more acute 

self-consciousness. 

*' Oh, are you here ? " said Bernard. " I thought 

you were in Pans." 

" No ; I ain't in Paris," Lovelock answered with 
some dryness. " Tired of the beastly hole I " 

'* Oh, I see," said Bernard. " Excuse me while I 
put up my umbrella." 

He put up his umbrella, and from under it, the 

4 

next moment, he saw the Captain waving two fingers 
at him out of the front of a hansom. When he re- 
turned to his hotel he found on his table a letter 
superscribed in Gordon Wright's hand This commu- 
nication ran as follows : 

"I believe you are making a fool of me. In 
Heaven's name, come back to Paris! G. W/* 

Bernard hardly knew whether to regard these few 
words as a further declaration of war, or as an over- 
ture to peace ; but he lost no time in complying with 
the summons they conveyed. He started for Paris 
the next -morning, and in the evening, after he had 
removed the dust of his journey and swallowed a 
hasty dinner, he rang at Mrs. Vivian's door. This 
lady and her daughter gave him a welcome which — 
I will not say satisfied him, but which, at least, did 



 341 

6oniething toward aoothing the still unhealed wounds 
of separation. 

" And what is the news of Gordon ? " he presently- 
asked. 

" We have not seen him in three days," said Angela. 

" He is cured, dear Bernard ; he must be. Angela 
has been wonderful," Mrs. Vivian declared. 

" You should have seen mamma with Blanche," her 
daughter said, smiling. " It was most remarkable." 

Mrs. Vivian smiled, too, very gently. 

" Dear little Blanche ! Captain Lovelock has gone 
to London." 

" Yes, he thinks it a beastly hole. Ah, no," Ber- 
nard added, " I have got it wrong." 

But it little mattered. Late that night, on his re- 
turn to his own rooms, Bernard sat gazing at his fire. 
He had not begun to undress ; he was thinking of a 
good many things. He was in the midst of his re- 
flections when there came a rap at his door, which 
the next moment was flung open. Gordon Wright 
stood there, looking at him — with a gaze which Ber- 
nard returned for a moment before bidding him to 
come in. Gordon came in and came up to him ; then 
he held out his hand. Bernard took it with great 
satisfaction; his last feeling had been that he was 
very weary of this ridiculous quarrel, and it was an 
extreme relief to find it was over. 

" It was very good of you to go to London," said 



342  

Grordon, looking at him with all the old serious hon- 
esty of his eyes. 

" I have always tried to do what I could to oblige 
you," Bernard answered, smiling. 

" You must have cui'sed me over there," Gordon 
went on. 

'* I did, a little. As you were cursing me here, it 
was permissible." 

" That 's over now," said Gordon. " I came to wel- 
come you back. It seemed to me I could n't lay my 
head on my pillow without speaking to you." 

" I am glad to get back," Bernard admitted, smil- 
ing stilL "I can't deny that And I find you as 
I believed I should." Then he added, seriously — "I 
knew Angela would keep us good friends." 

For a moment Gordon said nothing. Then, at 
last — 

"Yes, for that purpose it didn't matter which 
of us should marry her. If it had been I," he added, 
" she would have made you accept it." 

" Ah, I don't know ! " Bernard exclaimed. 

" I am sure of it," said Gordon earnestly — almost 
argumentatively. " She 's an extraordinary woman." 

"Keeping you good friends with me — that's a 
great thing. But it's nothing to her keeping you 
good friends with your wife." 

Gordon looked at Bernard for an instant ; then he 
fixed his eyes for some time on the fire. 



 343 

" Yes, that is the greatest of all things. A man 
should value his wife. He should believe in her. 
He has taken her, and he should keep her — espe- 
cially when there is a great deal of good in her. I was 
a great fool the other day," he went on. " 1 don*t re- 
member what I said. It was very weak." 

" It seemed to me feeble," said Bernard. " But it 
is quite within a man's rights to be a fool once in a 
while, and you had never abused of the license." 

" Well, I have done it for a lifetime — for a life- 
time." And Gordon took up his hat. He looked 
into the crown of it for a moment, and then he fixed 
his eyes on Bernard's again. " But there is one thing 
I hope you won't mind my saying. I have come back 
to my old impression of Miss Vivian." 

" Your old impression ? " 

And Miss Vivian's accepted lover frowned a little. 

" I mean that she 's not simple. She 's very strange." 

Bernard's frown cleared away in a sudden, almost 
eager smile. 

" Say at once that you dislike her ! That will do 
capitally." 

Gordon shook his head, and he, too, almost smiled 
a little. 

" It 's not true. She 's very wonderful And if I 
did dislike her, I should struggle with it. It would 
never do for me to dislike your wife ! " 

After he had gone, when the night was half over. 



344  

Bernard, lying awake a while, gave a laugh in the 
still darkness, as this last sentence oame back to him. 

On the morrow he saw Blanche, for he went to see 
Gordon. The latter, at first, was not at home ; but 
he had a quarter of an hour's talk with his wife, 
who^e powers of conversation were apparently not 
in the smallest degree affected by anything that had 
occurred. 

"I hope you enjoyed your visit to London," she 
said. **Did you go 'to buy Angela a set of diamonds 
in Bond Street? You didn't buy anything — you 
did n*t go into a shop ? Then pray what did you go 
for ? Excuse my curiosity — it seems to me it 's 
rather flattering. I never know anything unless I 
am told. I haven't any powers of observation, I 
noticed you went — oh, yes, I observed that very 
much ; and I thought it very strange, under the cir- 
cumstances. Your most intimate friend arrived in 
Paris, and you choose the next day to make a little 
tour ! I don't like to see you treat my husband so ; 
he would never have done it to you. And if you 
did n't stay for Gordon, you might have staid for 
Angela. I never heard of anything so monstrous as a 
gentleman rushing away from the object of his affec- 
tion, for no particular purpose that any one eould 
discover, the day after she has accepted him. It was 
not the day after ? Well, it was too soon, at any rate. 
Angela could n't in the least tell me what you had 




 345 

gone for ; she said it was for a ' change.* That was a 
charming reason ! But she was very much ashamed 
of you — and so was I ; and at last we all sent 
Captain Lovelock after you to bring you back. You 
came back without him ? Ah, so much the better ; I* 
suppose he is still looking for you, and, as he is n't 
very clever, that will occupy him for some time. We 
want to occupy him ; we don't approve of his being 
so idle. However, for my own part, I am very glad 
you were away* I was a great deal at Mrs, Vivian's, 
and I should n't have felt nearly so much at liberty 
to go if I had known I should always find you there 
making love to Mademoiselle. It wouldn't have 
seemed to me discreet, — I know what you are going 
to say — that it's the first time you ever heard of 
my wishing to avoid an indiscretion. It 's a taste I 
have taken up lately, — for the same reason you went 
to London, for a ' change.' " Here Blanche paused 
for an appreciable moment; and then she added — 
*Well, I must say, I have never seen anything so 
lovely as Mrs. Vivian's influence. I hope mamma 
won't be disappointed in it this time !" 

When Bernard next saw the other two ladies, he 
said to them that he was surprised at the way in 
which clever women incurred moral responsibilities. 

" We like them," said Mrs. Vivian. " We delight in 
them 1 " 

" Well," said Bernard, " I would n't for the world 



346  

have it on my conscience to have reconciled poor 
Gordon to Mrs. Blanche." 

"You are not to say a word against Blanche," 
Angela declared. " She 's a little miracle." 

"It will be all right, dear Bernard," Mrs. Vivian 
added, with soft authority. 

" I have taken a great fancy to her," the younger 
lady went on. 

Bernard gave a little laugh. 

" Gordon is right in his ultimate opinioa You are 
very strange ! " 

" You may abuse me as much as you please ; but I 
will never hear a word against Mrs. Gordon." 

And she never would in future ; though it is not 
recorded that Bernard availed himself in any special 
degree of the license offered him in conjunction with 
this warning. 

Blanche's health within a few days had, according 
to her own account, taken a marvellous turn for the 
better ; but her husband appeared still to think it 
proper that they should spend the winter beneath a 
brilliant sun, and he presently informed his friends 
that they had at last settled it between them that a 
voyage up the Nile must be, for a thoroughly imited 
couple, a very agreeable pastime. To perform this 
expedition advantageously they must repair to Cairo 
without delay, and for this reason he was sure that 
Bernard and Angela would easily understand their 



 347 

not making a point of waiting for the wedding. 
These happy people quite understood it. Their nup- 
tials were to be celebrated with extreme simplicity. 
If, however, Gordon was not able to be present, he, 
in conjunction with his wife, bought for Angela, as a 
bridal gift, a necklace of the most beautiful pearls 
the Rue de la Paix could furnish; and on his ar- 
rival at Cairo, while he waited for his dragoman to 
give the signal for starting, he found time, in spite of 
the exactions of that large correspondence which has 
been more than once mentioned in the course of our 
narrative, to write Bernard the longest letter he had 
ever addressed to him. The letter reached Bernard 
in the middle of his honeymoon. 




